The other day, a friend of mine asked me whether CEOs were born or made. I said, “That’s kind of like asking if Jolly Ranchers are grown or made. CEO is a very unnatural job.” After saying it and seeing the surprised look on his face, I realized that perhaps it wasn’t as obvious as I’d originally thought.  After thinking further, I realized that most people actually assume the opposite—CEOs are born not made. I often listen as other Venture Capitalists and board members rapidly evaluate a founder and conclude that she’s not “CEO material”. I am not sure how they figure these things out so fast. It generally takes years for a founder to develop the CEO skill set and it is usually extremely difficult for me to tell whether or not she will make it.  In athletics, some things like becoming a sprinter can be learned relatively quickly because they take a natural motion and refine it. Others, like boxing, take much longer to master, because they require lots of unnatural motions. For example, when going backwards in boxing, it’s critically important to pick up your back foot first, because if you get hit while walking backwards the natural way—picking up your front foot first—often leads to getting knocked cold. Learning to make this unnatural motion feel natural takes a great deal of practice. If you do what feels most natural as a CEO, then you may also get knocked cold.  Being CEO requires lots of unnatural motion. From an anthropological standpoint, it is natural to do things that make people like you. It enhances your chances for survival. Yet to be a good CEO, in order to be liked in the long run, you must do many things that will upset people in the short run. Unnatural things.  In fact, even the most basic CEO building blocks will feel unnatural at first. If your buddy tells you a funny story, it would feel quite weird to evaluate her performance. It would be totally unnatural to say: “Gee, I thought that story really sucked. It had potential, but you were underwhelming on the build up then you totally flubbed the punch line. I suggest that you go back, rework it and present it to me again tomorrow.” Doing so would be quite bizarre, but evaluating people’s performances and constantly giving feedback is precisely what a CEO must do. If she doesn’t, then the more complex motions such as writing reviews, taking away territory, handling politics, setting compensation and firing people will be either impossible or handled rather poorly.  Giving feedback turns out to be the unnatural atomic building block atop which the unnatural skill set of the management gets built. But how does one master the unnatural?  The Shit Sandwich A popular and sometimes effective technique for feedback beginners is something that experienced managers call The Shit Sandwich. The technique is marvelously described in the classic management text, The One Minute Manager. The basic idea is that people open up to feedback far more if you start by complimenting them (slice of bread #1), then you give them the difficult message (the shit), then wrap up by reminding them how much you value their strengths (slice of bread #2). The shit sandwich also has the positive side effect of focusing the feedback on the behavior rather than the person, because you establish up front that you really value the person. This is a key concept in giving feedback.  The shit sandwich can work well with junior employees, but has the following challenges:  It tends to be overly formal. Because you have to preplan and script the sandwich to make it come out correctly, the process can feel formal and judgmental to the employee. After you do it a couple of times, it will lack authenticity. The employee will think: “Oh boy, she’s complimenting me again. I know what’s coming next, the shit.” More senior executives will recognize the shit sandwich immediately and it will have an instant negative effect. Early in my career, I attempted to deliver a carefully crafted shit sandwich to a senior employee and she looked at me like I was a little kid and said: “Spare me the compliment, Ben, and just tell me what I did wrong.” At that point, I thought that I was definitely not born to be a CEO.  The Keys To become elite at giving feedback, you must elevate yourself beyond a basic technique like the shit sandwich. You must develop a style that matches your own personality and values. Here are the keys to being effective:  Be authentic. It’s extremely important they you believe in the feedback that you give and not say anything to manipulate the recipient’s feelings. You can’t fake the funk. Come from the right place. It’s important that you give people feedback because you want them to succeed and not because you want them to fail. If you really want someone to succeed, then make her feel it. Make her feel you. If she feels you and you are in her corner, then she will listen to you. Don’t get personal. If you decide to fire somebody, fire her. Don’t prepare her to get fired. Prepare her to succeed. If she doesn’t take the feedback, then that’s a different conversation. Don’t clown people in front of their peers. While it’s OK to give certain kinds of feedback in a group setting, you should strive never to embarrass someone in front of their peers. If you do so, then your feedback will have little impact other than to a) cause the employee to be horribly ashamed and b) cause the employee to hate your guts. Feedback is not one size fits all. Everybody is different. Some employees are extremely sensitive to feedback while others have particularly thick skin and often thick skulls. Stylistically, your tone should match the employee’s personality not your mood. Be direct, but not mean. Don’t be obtuse. If you think somebody’s presentation sucks, don’t say: “It’s really good, but could use one more pass to tighten up the conclusion.” While it may seem harsh, it’s much better to say: “I couldn’t follow it and I didn’t understand your point and here are the reasons why.” Watered down feedback can be worse than no feedback at all because it’s deceptive and confusing to the recipient. But don’t beat them up or attempt to show your superiority. Doing so will defeat your purpose because when done properly feedback is dialogue, not a monologue. Feedback is a dialogue, not a monologue You may be the CEO and you may be telling somebody about something that you don’t like or disagree with, but that doesn’t mean that you’re right. Your employee should know more about her function than you. She should have more data than you. You may be wrong.  As a result, your goal should be for your feedback to open up rather than close down discussion. Encourage people to challenge your judgment and argue the point to conclusion. Culturally, you want super high standards thoroughly discussed. You want to apply tremendous pressure to get the highest quality thinking, yet be open enough to find out when you are wrong.  High frequency feedback Once you’ve mastered the keys, you should practice what you’ve mastered all the time. As CEO, you should have an opinion on absolutely everything. You should have an opinion on every forecast, every product plan, every presentation and even every comment. Let people know what you think. If you like someone’s comment, give her the feedback. If you disagree, give her the feedback. Say what you think. Express yourself.  This will have two critically important positive effects:  Feedback won’t be personal in your company. If the CEO constantly gives feedback, then everyone she interacts with will just get used to it. Nobody will think: “Gee, what did she really mean by that comment? Does she not like me?” Everybody will naturally focus on the issues, not an implicit random performance evaluation. People will become comfortable discussing bad news. If people get comfortable talking about what each other are doing wrong, then it will be very easy to talk about what the company is doing wrong. High quality company cultures get their cue from data networking routing protocols: bad news travels fast and good news travels slowly. Low quality company cultures take on the personality of the Wicked Witch of the East in The Wiz: “Don’t nobody bring me no bad news.” Making the CEO Being CEO requires also a broad set of more advanced skills—I’ve written about many in this blog—but the key to reaching the advanced level and feeling like you were born to be CEO is mastering the unnatural.  If you are a founder CEO and you feel awkward or incompetent when doing some of these things and believe there is no way that you’ll be able to do it when your company is 100 or 1,000 people, welcome to the club. That’s exactly how I felt.  So did every CEO that I’ve ever met. This is the process. This is how you get made.
At Opsware I used to teach a management expectations course because I deeply believed in training. In it, I made it clear that I expected every manager to meet with her people on a regular basis. I even gave instructions on how to conduct a 1:1 meeting so there could be no excuses.  Then one day while I happily went about my job, it came to my attention that one of my managers hadn’t had a 1:1 with any of his employees in over six months. While I knew to “expect what I inspect,” I did not expect this. No 1:1 in over six months? How was it possible for me to invest so much time thinking about management, preparing materials and personally training my managers and then get no 1:1s for six months? Wow, so much for CEO authority. If that’s how the managers listen to me, then why do I even bother coming to work?  I thought that leading by example would be the sure way to get the company to do what I wanted. Lord knows the company picked up all of my bad habits, so why didn’t they pick up my good habits? Had I lost the team? I recalled a conversation I’d had with my father many years ago regarding Tommy Heinsohn, the Boston Celtics basketball coach at the time. Heinsohn had been one of the most successful coaches in the world, including being named “coach of the year” and winning two NBA championships. However, he had gone downhill fast and now had the worst record in the league. I asked my father what happened. He said: “The players stopped paying attention to his temper tantrums. Heinsohn used to yell at the team and they’d respond. Now they just ignore him.” Was the team now ignoring me? Had I yelled at them one time too many?  The more that I thought about it, the more I realized that while I had told the team “what” to do, I had not been clear about “why” I wanted them to do it. Clearly, my authority alone was not enough to get them to do what I wanted. Given the large number of things that we were trying to accomplish, managers couldn’t get to everything and came up with their own priorities. Apparently, this manager didn’t think that meeting with his people was all that important and I hadn’t explained to him why it was so important.  So why did I force every manager through management training? Why did I demand that managers have 1:1s with employees? After much deliberation with myself, I settled on an articulation of the core reason and I called up the offending manager’s boss—I’ll call him Steve—and I told him that I needed to see him right away.  When Steve came into my office I asked him a question: “Steve, do you know why I came to work today?” Steve: “What do you mean, Ben?” Me: “Why did I bother waking up? Why did I bother coming in? If it was about the money, couldn’t I sell the company tomorrow and have more money than I ever wanted? I don’t want to be famous, in fact just the opposite. ” Steve: “I guess.” Me: “Well, then why did I come to work.” Steve: “I don’t know.” Me: “Well, let me explain. I came to work, because it’s personally very important to me that Opsware be a good company. It’s important to me that the people who spend 12 to 16 hours/day here, which is most of their waking life, have a good life.  It’s why I come to work.” Steve: “OK.” Me: “Do you know the difference between a good place to work and a bad place to work?” Steve: “Umm, I think so.” Me: “What is the difference?” Steve: “Umm, well…” Me: “Let me break it down for you. In good organizations, people can focus on their work and have confidence that if they get their work done, good things will happen for both the company and them personally. It is a true pleasure to work in an organization such as this. Every person can wake up knowing that the work they do will be efficient, effective and make a difference both for the organization and themselves. These things make their jobs both motivating and fulfilling. “In a poor organization, on the other hand, people spend much of their time fighting organizational boundaries, infighting and broken processes. They are not even clear on what their jobs are, so there is no way to know if they are getting the job done or not. In the miracle case that they work ridiculous hours and get the job done, they have no idea what it means for the company or their careers. To make it all much worse and rub salt in the wound, when they finally work up the courage to tell management how fucked up their situation is, management denies there is a problem, then defends the status quo, then ignores the problem.” Steve: “OK.” Me: “Are you aware that your manager Tim has not met with any of his employees in the past six months?” Steve: “No.” Me: “Now that you are aware, do you realize that there is no possible way for him to even be informed as to whether or not his organization is good or bad?” Steve: “Yes.” Me: “In summary, you and Tim are preventing me from achieving my one and only goal. You have become a barrier blocking me from achieving my most important goal.  As a result, if Tim doesn’t meet with each one of his employees in the next 24 hours, I will have no choice but to fire him and to fire you. Are we clear?” Steve: “Crystal.” Was that really necessary? You might argue that no matter how well managed a company is, it will fail without product/market fit. You might argue further that horribly managed companies that achieve massive product/market fit succeed just fine. And you would be right on both accounts. So was it really necessary for me to make such a dramatic speech and threaten one of my executives?  I think it was for the following three reasons:  Being a good company doesn’t matter when things go well, but it can be the difference between life and death when things go wrong. Things always go wrong. Being a good company is itself an end. The difference between life and death When things go well, the reasons to stay at company are many:  Your career path is wide open because as the company grows lots of interesting jobs naturally open up. Your friends and family think you are a genius for choosing to work at the “it” company before anyone else knew it was “it”. Your resume gets stronger by working at a blue chip company in its heyday. Oh, and, you are getting rich. When things go poorly, all those reasons become reasons to leave. In fact, the only thing that keeps an employee at a company when things go horribly wrong—other than needing a job, which isn’t so applicable in the current macro environment—is that she likes her job.  Things always go wrong There has never been a company in the history of the world that had a monotonically increasing stock price. In bad companies, when the economics disappear, so do the employees. In technology companies, when the employees disappear, the spiral begins: the company declines in value, the best employees leave, the company declines in value, the best employees leave. Spirals are extremely difficult to reverse.  Being a good company is an end itself When I first met my friend Bill Campbell, he was chairman of Intuit, on the board of Apple and a mentor to many of the top CEOs in the industry, including Steve Jobs and Jeff Bezos. However, those things did not impress me nearly as much as his time running a company called GO Corporation. GO essentially attempted to build an iPhone in 1992. The company raised more money than almost any other venture capital back startup in history and lost nearly all of it before selling itself for nearly nothing to AT&T in 1994.  Now that probably doesn’t sound impressive. In fact, it probably sounds like a horrible failure. But I’d met tens of GO employees in my career, including great people like Mike Homer, Danny Shader, Frank Chen and Stratton Sclavous, and the amazing thing was that every GO employee that I’d ever met counted GO as one of the greatest work experiences of their lives. The best work experience ever despite the fact that their careers stood still, they made no money and they were front-page failures. GO was a good place to work.  This made me realize what an amazingly effective CEO Bill was. Apparently, John Doerr thought that too, because when Scott Cook needed a CEO for Intuit, John recommended Bill even though Bill lost a ton of John’s money at GO. And for years, everyone who ever came into contact with GO employees knew what Bill was about. He was about building good companies.  If you do nothing else, be like Bill and build a good company.  
By far the most difficult skill for me to learn as CEO was the ability to manage my own psychology. Organizational design, process design, metrics, hiring and firing were all relatively straightforward skills to master compared to keeping my mind in check. Over the years, I’ve spoken to hundreds of CEOs all with the same experience. Nonetheless, very few people talk about it and I have never read anything on the topic. It’s like the fight club of management: The first rule of the CEO psychological meltdown is don’t talk about the psychological meltdown.  At risk of violating the sacred rule, I will attempt to describe the condition and prescribe some techniques that helped me. In the end, this is the most personal and important battle that any CEO will face.  If I’m Doing a Good Job, Why Do I Feel So Bad? Generally, someone doesn’t become CEOs unless she has a high sense of purpose and cares deeply about the work she does. In addition, a CEO must be accomplished enough or smart enough that people will want to work for her. Nobody sets out to be a bad CEO, run a dysfunctional organization, or create a massive bureaucracy that grinds her company to a screeching halt. Yet no CEO ever has a smooth path to a great company. Along the way, many things go wrong and all of them could have and should have been avoided.  The first problem is that everybody learns to be a CEO by being a CEO. No training as a manager, general manager or any other job actually prepares you to run a company. The only thing that prepares you to run a company is running a company. This means that you will face a broad set of things that you don’t know how to do that require skills that you don’t have. Nevertheless, everybody will expect you to know how to do them, because, well, you are the CEO. I remember when I first became CEO, an investor asked me to send him the “cap table.” I had a vague idea of what he meant, but I didn’t actually know what the format was supposed to look like or what should be included or excluded. It was a silly little thing and I had much bigger things to worry about, but everything is hard when you don’t actually know what you are doing and I wasted quite a bit of time sweating over that stupid spreadsheet.  Even if you know what you are doing, things go wrong. Things go wrong, because building a multi-faceted human organization to compete and win in a dynamic, highly competitive market turns out to be really hard. If CEOs were graded on a curve, the mean on the test would be 22 out of a 100. This kind of mean can be psychologically challenging for a straight A student. It is particularly challenging, because nobody tells you that the mean is 22.  If you manage a team of 10 people, it’s quite possible to do so with very few mistakes or bad behaviors. If you manage an organization of 1,000 people it is quite impossible. At a certain size, your company will do things that are so bad that you never imagined that you’d be associated with that kind of incompetence. Seeing people fritter away money, waste each other’s time, and do sloppy work can make you feel bad. If you are the CEO, it may well make you sick.  And to rub salt into the wound and make matters worse, it’s your fault.  Nobody to Blame You can’t blame Jazz Musicians or David Stern with his NBA fashion issues —Nas, Hip Hop is Dead  When people in my company would complain about something or other being broken such as the expense reporting process, I would joke that it was all my fault. The joke was funny, because it wasn’t really a joke. Every problem in the company was indeed my fault. As the founding CEO, every hire and every decision that the company ever made happened under my direction. Unlike a hired gun that comes in and blames all of the problems on the prior regime, there was literally nobody for me to blame.  If someone was promoted for all the wrong reasons, that was my fault. If we missed the quarterly earnings target, that was my fault. If a great engineer quit, that was my fault. If the sales team made unreasonable demands on the product organization, then that was my fault. If the product had too many bugs, that was my fault. It kind of sucked to be me.  Being responsible for everything and getting a 22 on the test starts to weigh on your consciousness.  Too Much Broken Stuff Given this stress, CEOs often make the one of the following two mistakes:  They take things too personally They do not take things personally enough In the first scenario, the CEO takes every issue incredibly seriously and personally and urgently moves to fix it. Given the volume of the issues, this motion usually results in one of two scenarios. If the CEO is outwardly focused, she ends up terrorizing the team to the point where nobody wants to work at the company any more. If the CEO is inwardly focused, she ends up feeling so sick from all of the problems that she can barely make it to work in the morning.  In the second scenario, in order to dampen the pain of the rolling disaster that is the company, the CEO takes a Pollyannaish attitude: it’s not so bad. In this view, none of the problems are actually that bad and they needn’t be dealt with urgently. By rationalizing away the issues, the CEO feels better about herself. The problem is that she doesn’t actually fix any of the problems and the employees eventually become quite frustrated that the Chief Executive keeps ignoring the most basic problems and conflicts. Ultimately, the company turns to crap.  Ideally, the CEO will be urgent yet not insane. She will move aggressively and decisively without feeling emotionally culpable. If she can separate the importance of the issues from how she feels about them, she will avoid demonizing her employees or herself.  It’s a Lonely Job And this loneliness won’t leave me alone —Otis Redding, (Sittin’ On) The Dock of the Bay  In your darkest moments as CEO, discussing fundamental questions about the viability of your company with your employees can have obvious negative consequences. On the other hand, talking to your board and outside advisors can be fruitless. The knowledge gap between you and them is so vast that you cannot actually bring them fully up to speed in a manner that’s useful in making the decision. You are all alone.  At Loudcloud, when the dot com bubble burst and subsequently sent most of our customers into bankruptcy, it crippled our business and devastated our balance sheet. Or rather, that was one interpretation. Another interpretation, and necessarily the official story for the company, was that we still had plenty of money in the bank and were signing up traditional enterprise customers at an impressive rate. Which interpretation was closer to the truth? In the absence of someone to talk to, that’s a question that I asked myself about 3,000 times. As an aside, asking oneself anything 3,000 times turns out to be a bad idea. In this case, I had two specific difficult questions:  What if the official interpretation was wrong?  What if I was misleading everyone from investors to employees? In that case, I should be removed from my position immediately. What if the official interpretation was right? What if I was grinding my brain into sawdust for no reason at all? What if I was taking the company off track by questioning my own direction? In that case, I should be removed from my position immediately. As is usually the case, there was no way to know which interpretation was right until much later. It turned out that neither was actually right. The new customers didn’t save us, but we figured out another way to survive and ultimately succeed. The key to getting to the right outcome was to keep from getting married to either the positive or the dark narrative.  My friend Jason Rosenthal took over as CEO of Ning about a year ago. As soon as he became CEO, he faced a cash crisis and had to choose amongst three difficult choices: 1. Radically reduce the size of the company or 2. Sell the company or 3. Raise money in a highly dilutive way.  Think about those choices:  Lay off a large set of talented employees whom he worked very hard to recruit and, as a result, likely severely damage the morale of the remaining people. Sell out all of the employees who he had been working side-by-side with for the past several years (Jason was promoted into the position), by selling the company without giving them a chance to perform or fulfill their mission. Drastically reduce the ownership position of the employees and make their hard work economically meaningless. Choices like these separate the women from the girls. Tip to aspiring entrepreneurs: if you don’t like choosing between horrible and cataclysmic, don’t become CEO. Jason sought advice from some of the best minds in the industry, but ultimately he was completely alone in the final decision. Nobody had the answer and whatever the answer, Jason was the one who had to live with the consequences. So far his decision to reduce staff by letting go of primarily the most recent hires has paid off. Revenue at Ning is soaring and team morale is high. If it had gone worse (or ultimately goes bad), it will be all Jason’s fault and it will be up to Jason to find a new answer. Whenever I see Jason, I like to say: “welcome to the show.”  At times like the above, it’s important to understand that nearly every company goes through life-threatening moments. My partner Scott Weiss relayed that it’s so common that there is an acronym for it: WFIO which stands for We’re F#%ked, It’s Over (it’s pronounced whiff-ee-yo). As he describes it, every company goes through at least two and up to five of these episodes (although, I’m pretty sure that I went through at least a dozen at Opsware). In all cases, WFIOs feel much worse than they are—especially for the CEO.  Techniques to Calm Your Nerves The problem with psychology is that everybody’s is slightly different. With that as a caveat, over the years I developed a few techniques for dealing with myself. Hopefully, you find them useful too.  Make some friends—Although it’s nearly impossible to get high quality advice on the tough decisions that you make, it is extremely useful from a psychological perspective to talk to people who have been through similarly challenging decisions. My friend Bill Campbell was a huge help to me as CEO, but interestingly it wasn’t his great success running Intuit that I found most useful; it was his disastrous experience running Go. Through that experience and his most traumatic days at Intuit (like laying off 1/3 of the company), Bill learned a tremendous amount about how to think about excruciatingly difficult decisions from a psychological perspective.  Get it out of your head and onto paper—When I had to explain to Bill and the rest of my board that, as a public company, I thought that it would be best if we sold all of our customers and all of our revenue and changed business, it was messing with my mind. In order to finalize that decision, I wrote down a detailed explanation of my logic. The process of writing that document separated me from my own psychology and enabled me to make the decision swiftly.  Focus on the road not the wall—When they train racecar drivers, one of the first lessons is when you are going around a curve at 200 MPH, do not focus on the wall; focus on the road. If you focus on the wall, you will drive right into it. If you focus on the road, you will follow the road. Running a company is like that. There are always a thousand things that can go wrong and sink the ship. If you focus too much on them, you will drive yourself nuts and likely capsize your company. Focus on where you are going rather than on what you hope to avoid.  A Final Word of Advice—Don’t Punk Out and Don’t Quit As CEO, there will be many times when you feel like quitting. I have seen CEOs try to cope with the stress by drinking heavily, checking out, and even quitting. In each case, the CEO has a marvelous rationalization why it was OK for him to punk out or quit, but none them will ever be great CEOs. Great CEOs face the pain. They deal with the sleepless nights, the cold sweat, and what my friend the great Alfred Chuang (legendary founder and CEO of BEA Systems) calls “the torture.” Whenever I meet a successful CEO, I ask them how they did it. Mediocre CEOs point to their brilliant strategic moves or their intuitive business sense or a variety of other self-congratulatory explanations. The great CEOs tend to be remarkably consistent in their answers. They all say: “I didn’t quit.”
Every entrepreneur starts her company with a clear vision for success. You will create an amazing environment and hire the smartest people to join you. Together you will build a beautiful product that delights customers and makes the world just a little bit better. It’s going to be absolutely awesome.  Then, after working night and day to make your vision reality, you wake up to find that things did not go as planned. Your company did not unfold like the Jack Dorsey keynote that you listened to when you started. Your product has issues that will be very hard to fix. The market isn’t quite where it was supposed to be. Your employees are losing confidence and some of them have quit. Some of the ones that quit were quite smart and have the remaining ones wondering if staying makes sense. You are running low on cash and your venture capitalist tells you that it will be difficult to raise money given the impending European catastrophe. You lose a competitive battle. You lose a loyal customer. You lose a great employee. The walls start closing in. Where did you go wrong? Why didn’t your company perform as envisioned? Are you good enough to do this? As your dreams turn into nightmares, you find yourself in The Struggle.  About The Struggle Life is struggle. —Karl Marx The Struggle is when you wonder why you started the company in the first place.  The Struggle is when people ask you why you don’t quit and you don’t know the answer.  The Struggle is when your employees think you are lying and you think they may be right.  The Struggle is when food loses its taste.  The Struggle is when you don’t believe you should be CEO of your company. The Struggle is when you know that you are in over your head and you know that you cannot be replaced. The Struggle is when everybody thinks you are an idiot, but nobody will fire you. The Struggle is where self-doubt becomes self-hatred.  The Struggle is when you are having a conversation with someone and you can’t hear a word that they are saying because all you can hear is The Struggle.  The Struggle is when you want the pain to stop. The Struggle is unhappiness.  The Struggle is when you go on vacation to feel better and you feel worse.  The Struggle is when you are surrounded by people and you are all alone. The Struggle has no mercy.  The Struggle is the land of broken promises and crushed dreams. The Struggle is a cold sweat. The Struggle is where your guts boil so much that you feel like you are going to spit blood.  The Struggle is not failure, but it causes failure. Especially if you are weak. Always if you are weak.  Most people are not strong enough.  Every great entrepreneur from Steve Jobs to Mark Zuckerberg went through The Struggle and struggle they did, so you are not alone. But that does not mean that you will make it. You may not make it. That is why it is The Struggle.  The Struggle is where greatness comes from.  Some stuff that may or may not help There is no answer to The Struggle, but here are some things that helped me:  Don’t put it all on your shoulders – It is easy to think that the things that bother you will upset your people more. That’s not true. The opposite is true. Nobody takes the losses harder than the person most responsible. Nobody feels it more than you. You won’t be able to share every burden, but share every burden that you can. Get the maximum number of brains on the problems even if the problems represent existential threats. When I ran Opsware and we were losing too many competitive deals, I called an all-hands and told the whole company that we were getting our asses kicked, and if we didn’t stop the bleeding, we were going to die. Nobody blinked. The team rallied, built a winning product and saved my sorry ass. This is not checkers; this is mutherfuckin’ chess – Technology businesses tend to be extremely complex. The underlying technology moves, the competition moves, the market moves, the people move. As a result, like playing three-dimensional chess on Star Trek, there is always a move. You think you have no moves? How about taking your company public with $2M in trailing revenue and 340 employees, with a plan to do $75M in revenue the next year? I made that move. I made it in 2001, widely regarded as the worst time ever for a technology company to go public. I made it with six weeks of cash left. There is always a move. Focus on the road – When they teach you how to drive a racecar, they tell you to focus on the road when you go around a turn. They tell you that because if you focus on the wall, then you will drive straight into the wall. If you focus on how you might fail, then you will fail. Even if you only have one bullet left in the gun and you have to hit the target, focus on the target. You might not hit it, but you definitely won’t hit if you focus on other things. Play long enough and you might get lucky – In the technology game, tomorrow looks nothing like today. If you survive long enough to see tomorrow, it may bring you the answer that seems so impossible today. Don’t take it personally – The predicament that you are in is probably all your fault. You hired the people. You made the decisions. But you knew the job was dangerous when you took it. Everybody makes mistakes. Every CEO makes thousands of mistakes. Evaluating yourself and giving yourself an “F” doesn’t help. Remember that this is what separates the women from the girls. If you want to be great, this is the challenge. If you don’t want to be great, then you never should have started a company. The end When you are in The Struggle, nothing is easy and nothing feels right. You have dropped into the abyss and you may never get out. In my own experience, but for some unexpected luck and help, I would have been lost.  So to all of you in it, may you find strength and may you find peace.
After I wrote A Good Place to Work, people flooded me with feedback about one-on-ones. About half the responders chastised me, saying that one-on-ones were useless and that I shouldn’t put so much emphasis on them. The other half wanted to know how to run more effective one-on-ones. It seems to me that both groups are likely talking about two sides of the same coin.  Perhaps the CEO’s most important operational responsibility is designing and implementing the communication architecture for her company. The architecture might include the organizational design, meetings, processes, email, yammer and even one-on-one meetings with managers and employees. Absent a well-designed communication architecture, information and ideas will stagnate and your company will degenerate into a bad place to work. While it is quite possible to design a great communication architecture without one-on-one meetings, in most cases one-on-ones provide an excellent mechanism for information and ideas to flow up the organization and should be part of your design.  Generally, people who think one-on-one meetings are a bad idea have been victims of poorly designed one-on-one meetings. The key to a good one-on-one meeting is the understanding that it is the employee’s meeting rather than the manager’s meeting. This is the free-form meeting for all the pressing issues, brilliant ideas and chronic frustrations that do not fit neatly into status reports, email and other less personal and intimate mechanisms.  If you are an employee, how do you get feedback from your manager on an exciting, but only 20% formed idea that you’re not sure is relevant without sounding like a fool? How do you point out that a colleague that you do not know how to work with is blocking your progress without throwing her under the bus? How do you get help when you love your job, but your personal life is melting down? Through a status report? On email? Yammer? Asana? Really? For these and other important areas of discussions, one-on-ones can be essential.  If you like structured agendas, then the employee should set the agenda. A good practice is to have the employee send you the agenda in advance. This will give her a chance to cancel the meeting if nothing is pressing. It also makes clear that it is her meeting and will take as much or as little time as she needs. During the meeting, since it’s the employee’s meeting, the manager should do 10% of the talking and 90% of the listening. Note that this is the opposite of most one-on-ones.  While it’s not the manager’s job to set the agenda or do the talking, the manager should try to draw the key issues out of the employee. The more introverted the employee, the more important this becomes. If you manage engineers, drawing out issues will be an important skill to master.  Some questions that I’ve found to be very effective in one-on-ones:  If we could improve in any way, how would we do it? What’s the No. 1 problem with our organization? Why? What’s not fun about working here? Who is really kicking ass in the company? Who do you admire? If you were me, what changes would you make? What don’t you like about the product? What’s the biggest opportunity that we’re missing out on? What are we not doing that we should be doing? Are you happy working here? In the end, the most important thing is that the best ideas, the biggest problems and the most intense employee life issues make their way to the people that can deal with them. One-on-ones are a time-tested way to do that, but if you have a better one, go ahead with your bad self.  
In retrospect revolutions appear self-evident, yet at the time they seem unlikely. Today, the end of Communism in Eastern Europe seems so obvious, but in my home country of Romania, until the day Nicolae Ceausescu was shot dead, I thought he would rule forever. Technological revolutions follow a similar psychological dynamic. In 2012, most everyone takes the Internet for granted and believes its emergence to be a logical, evolutionary step. People point to Marc Andreessen’s Mosaic browser as the point at which everything changed, but that’s not what actually happened. Marc released Mosaic in 1993. A review of the technology press in 1993 and 1994 reveals that almost nobody believed the Internet would be important. In the late year of 1995, IBM acquired Lotus Development, makers of the Lotus 123 spreadsheet and a proprietary Internet predecessor, Lotus Notes, for $3.5B—more than the combined market capitalizations of Amazon.com, eBay, Yahoo, Netscape and the entire Internet sector.  Leading up to a revolution, each contributing variable seems unrelated until suddenly there is a convergence, which ignites radical change until the truth becomes self-evident. When change occurs, the great uncertainty transforms into tremendous creativity. This results in the utter destruction of the old and emergence of the new: new insights, new markets, new rules, new leaders and a wealth of new opportunities. But to have such a birth, we must first have a funeral.  Today we stand on the verge of a revolution in enterprise computing. In five years, the old guard will go away as the explosive new regime takes over. Which side of history will you be on?  The nature of the IT revolution Unlike political regimes, technological rulers are comprised of products rather than people. These aging products, developed in earlier times now represent bankrupt ideologies, weak paradigms and byzantine complexity.  The people of IT—CIOs, network engineers, system administrators, IT developers and their brethren—get captured and held hostage by the technological dictators. This reminds me of one of the most unbelievable vestiges of communist Romania: the so-called “Department for the Betterment of the People”. It had of course nothing to do with “betterment”, but rather oppression, and it was one of the first places the revolution touched.  Today’s IT departments separate their efforts into two categories: development of new capabilities and maintenance of the current capabilities. In a clear expression of the current regime’s brutality, IT shops spend anywhere from a whopping 50 to 80 percent of their resources maintaining the status quo. Specifically, IT deploys huge workforces to:  Maintain virus-ridden, windows-registry-rotting desktops Keep hand-rolled, brittle server, storage and network infrastructures working reliably Install, upgrade and train people on hard to use slow, ancient-looking enterprise software Theses efforts result from neither neglect nor incompetence, but are simply taxes imposed by vicious technology regimes that have outlived their usefulness.  The king is dead, long live the king Three revolutionaries will replace the current IT dictators: Cloud, Mobile and Social.  Cloud While the cloud concepts first emerged in the late 1990s, the technology only recently matured to the point where it is poised to break the chains of handcrafted infrastructure and enterprise application software.  On the infrastructure front, modern programmers can completely separate the code they develop from the infrastructure that it runs on. This opens incredibly powerful, once unheard of capabilities such as elastic applications and economically efficient infrastructure outsourcing. More importantly, it frees the army previously assigned to maintaining the massive custom infrastructure to pursue higher purposes.  On the application side, cloud computing magically removes the largest organizational constraints to adopting new capabilities: the costs to deploy, maintain and train people on enterprise software. Freed from these horrors, modern IT organizations, which previously could only introduce 1 or 2 new capabilities per year, can now introduce two new applications in a week, unleashing massive efficiencies and competitive advantage for their companies.  Mobile Back in the mid-1990s, in order to escape the horrors of every employee having their own kind of computer complete with different hardware, operating systems and software, IT standardized on the Windows PC leading to a Wintel duopoly. The duopoly dictated the capabilities and constraints of end user computing for the next 15 years, rendering creativity in the ecosystem moot and increasingly slowing desktop innovation to a crawl.  Then Apple introduced the iPhone, leading to a revolution in full-blown computing devices that were completely mobile. In Q2 of 2012, 362 million mobile phones shipped and it is increasingly rare to see business users who don’t have smartphones or tablet devices. With the pending arrival of the iPhone 5 in September, as well as new tablets from Amazon, Microsoft and Apple expected in the fall, the world is progressively mobile first and the Windows duopoly has been completely cracked, resulting in more end user computing device application development in the last two years than in the previous 10.  In addition, a whole new world of usability and mobility has emerged, leading to technologies that can knowledge-enable much larger portions of the workforce, creating new opportunities for IT organizations to create advantage for their companies.  Social The rise of Facebook and Twitter made clear that communication in the enterprise—despite many attempts—had made little progress since email’s introduction in the early 1990s. This spawned a social enterprise market with companies like Jive, Salesforce.com’s Chatter, Yammer, 37 Signals, Do and Asana emerging to bring modern benefits to enterprises.  The revolution at the edge The combination of these changes leads to a systemic change happening at the edge.  Users are now in control. They can buy and deploy applications, choose what’s usable and useful, and collaborate fully with zero IT support. Users are now buyers—as the always-excellent Vinnie Mirchandani points out. In fact, many new companies employ no IT people at all. In the Andreessen Horowitz portfolio, no companies deploy applications on premise, every employee has a mobile device and all deploy modern social software. So what will become of IT?  Power to the people, the new role of IT With the largest functions of the old IT regime—desktop support, system administration, network engineering and training—becoming obsolete, what is the future of IT?  Let’s begin to answer by contrasting the old world with the new:  Old World               New World  IT Driven                    User Driven Email                           In-context collaboration Static tools                 Actionable apps Laptop                         Mobile first On-premise                Cloud Limited few                Everyone  Clearly the old paradigms will not work in such a different reality. As a result, we propose a new IT paradigm. In modern IT, the CIO will become the CCAO or the Chief Competitive Advantage Officer, unlocking data, devices and processes to unleash new levels of productivity and business value. How will the CIO do this?  By redeploying her efforts around a new motion focusing on new activities:  Analyze – Advances in cloud computing have lead to a great breakthrough in a company’s ability to gain transformational insights by analyzing huge amounts of relevant internal and external data in smart ways. Great CIOs will take full advantage of this change enabling business users to deliver key advantages to their businesses as they figure out where their markets are headed well before the competition.  Develop – Freed from the never-ending quest to keep the lights on, winning CIOs will aggressively develop and acquire new capabilities to boost their teams. If the new applications prove unproductive, these CIOs will simply discard them and move to the next capability. In a world with little maintenance friction and pay-as-you-go business models, we enter the age of the disposable application.  Enable – In the new world rather than controlling technology and application choices, CIOs will enable dimensions that add real value:  The flow of proprietary, mission critical data – e.g. did material, non-public information make its way into an unsecured dropbox? Access to data and applications based on – e.g. when an employee is fired, do they get removed from all applications, including ones purchased from cloud providers without IT’s consent? Costs – e.g. how many of the licenses that were purchased for the various cloud applications are being used as anticipated? What’s the ROI? Experience – e.g. are the cloud vendors performing as advertised? Do users get the information that they need, when they need it, where they need it, in the most consumable way possible? Communicate – The most important challenge in managing any large organization is communication. In the new world, winning CIOs will partner with CEOs to design state-of-the-art communication infrastructures designed to optimize any company’s most important resource—its people.  Final thought Napoleon Bonaparte said, “Revolution is an idea, taken up by bayonets.” In today’s world, the intersection of cloud computing, mobile devices and social networking replace the bayonet. The question for everyone is, “Which side of the bayonet will you be on?”  To have a birth requires a funeral.  
Six months ago, I wrote a blog post called “The Future of Networking” about Nicira Inc., a company that I said would turn the data networking market upside down. Today, VMware arrived at the same conclusion and acquired Nicira for $1.26B in cash.  Since Nicira only recently shipped its first production ready systems, this acquisition may stun observers. However, those who fully understand the depth of Nicira’s technology and the implications of the combination of Nicira and VMware will recognize the brilliance of VMware’s move.  In one bold step, VMware moves from a footnote in the networking market to the clear technology leader in Software Defined Networking and more specifically—and importantly—Cloud Networking. By combining Nicira’s technology with VMware’s market-leading server virtualization and cloud products, VMware today creates a clear path to becoming the most important infrastructure company across servers, networks and storage for the next 10 years.  As current networking architectures migrate to cloud architectures, VMware has the opportunity to eat a good portion of the $37B data networking market. In that light, $1.26B is a great price.  Nonetheless, since VMware acquired primarily a product and a team—as opposed to a fully developed company and a large, cash-generating business—it’s useful to understand how a new company built such a valuable product and team.  Like many successful technology companies, Nicira started with a brilliant engineer who had the right experience to see the future more clearly than anyone else. Unlike consumer startups, where engineers tend to be their own first and best customers, most data networking engineers have never run large-scale networks. As a result, they never develop a clear picture of the real operational challenges of running a network. Most people who run large-scale networks, on the other hand, don’t have the product creation skills to solve those same problems.  Enter Martin Casado, the one man who had both the knowledge and the skill required to solve problems that vexed the networking world for three decades.  Because Martin began his career running large-scale, highly secure networks, he had the knowledge. He then took that knowledge to Stanford, where he developed the skill, working with legendary networking computer science professors Nick Mckeown and Scott Shenker.  But to build the next generation data networking company, he had to replace 30 years of functionality and needed to build a phenomenal team to do so. Martin recruited networking veteran Steve Mullaney as CEO, and together they assembled an all-star crew of the very best engineers in the business. That team brought to market a product that is so far ahead of the competition and clearly the future of data networking that VMware had to have it—and was smart enough to seize it.  In the future, all computing, networking and storage infrastructure will be infinitely elastic, totally reliable and perfectly flexible. VMware just took a giant step towards bringing the future forward.  I am grateful to have been part of the Nicira team and story. I look forward to seeing what happens next.  
Every entrepreneur starts her company with a clear vision for success. You will create an amazing environment and hire the smartest people to join you. Together you will build a beautiful product that delights customers and makes the world just a little bit better. It’s going to be absolutely awesome.  Then, after working night and day to make your vision reality, you wake up to find that things did not go as planned. Your company did not unfold like the Jack Dorsey keynote that you listened to when you started. Your product has issues that will be very hard to fix. The market isn’t quite where it was supposed to be. Your employees are losing confidence and some of them have quit. Some of the ones that quit were quite smart and have the remaining ones wondering if staying makes sense. You are running low on cash and your venture capitalist tells you that it will be difficult to raise money given the impending European catastrophe. You lose a competitive battle. You lose a loyal customer. You lose a great employee. The walls start closing in. Where did you go wrong? Why didn’t your company perform as envisioned? Are you good enough to do this? As your dreams turn into nightmares, you find yourself in The Struggle.  About The Struggle Life is struggle. —Karl Marx The Struggle is when you wonder why you started the company in the first place.  The Struggle is when people ask you why you don’t quit and you don’t know the answer.  The Struggle is when your employees think you are lying and you think they may be right.  The Struggle is when food loses its taste.  The Struggle is when you don’t believe you should be CEO of your company. The Struggle is when you know that you are in over your head and you know that you cannot be replaced. The Struggle is when everybody thinks you are an idiot, but nobody will fire you. The Struggle is where self-doubt becomes self-hatred.  The Struggle is when you are having a conversation with someone and you can’t hear a word that they are saying because all you can hear is The Struggle.  The Struggle is when you want the pain to stop. The Struggle is unhappiness.  The Struggle is when you go on vacation to feel better and you feel worse.  The Struggle is when you are surrounded by people and you are all alone. The Struggle has no mercy.  The Struggle is the land of broken promises and crushed dreams. The Struggle is a cold sweat. The Struggle is where your guts boil so much that you feel like you are going to spit blood.  The Struggle is not failure, but it causes failure. Especially if you are weak. Always if you are weak.  Most people are not strong enough.  Every great entrepreneur from Steve Jobs to Mark Zuckerberg went through The Struggle and struggle they did, so you are not alone. But that does not mean that you will make it. You may not make it. That is why it is The Struggle.  The Struggle is where greatness comes from.  Some stuff that may or may not help There is no answer to The Struggle, but here are some things that helped me:  Don’t put it all on your shoulders – It is easy to think that the things that bother you will upset your people more. That’s not true. The opposite is true. Nobody takes the losses harder than the person most responsible. Nobody feels it more than you. You won’t be able to share every burden, but share every burden that you can. Get the maximum number of brains on the problems even if the problems represent existential threats. When I ran Opsware and we were losing too many competitive deals, I called an all-hands and told the whole company that we were getting our asses kicked, and if we didn’t stop the bleeding, we were going to die. Nobody blinked. The team rallied, built a winning product and saved my sorry ass. This is not checkers; this is mutherfuckin’ chess – Technology businesses tend to be extremely complex. The underlying technology moves, the competition moves, the market moves, the people move. As a result, like playing three-dimensional chess on Star Trek, there is always a move. You think you have no moves? How about taking your company public with $2M in trailing revenue and 340 employees, with a plan to do $75M in revenue the next year? I made that move. I made it in 2001, widely regarded as the worst time ever for a technology company to go public. I made it with six weeks of cash left. There is always a move. Focus on the road – When they teach you how to drive a racecar, they tell you to focus on the road when you go around a turn. They tell you that because if you focus on the wall, then you will drive straight into the wall. If you focus on how you might fail, then you will fail. Even if you only have one bullet left in the gun and you have to hit the target, focus on the target. You might not hit it, but you definitely won’t hit if you focus on other things. Play long enough and you might get lucky – In the technology game, tomorrow looks nothing like today. If you survive long enough to see tomorrow, it may bring you the answer that seems so impossible today. Don’t take it personally – The predicament that you are in is probably all your fault. You hired the people. You made the decisions. But you knew the job was dangerous when you took it. Everybody makes mistakes. Every CEO makes thousands of mistakes. Evaluating yourself and giving yourself an “F” doesn’t help. Remember that this is what separates the women from the girls. If you want to be great, this is the challenge. If you don’t want to be great, then you never should have started a company. The end When you are in The Struggle, nothing is easy and nothing feels right. You have dropped into the abyss and you may never get out. In my own experience, but for some unexpected luck and help, I would have been lost.  So to all of you in it, may you find strength and may you find peace.  Note: I will be speaking at PandoMonthly on 6/20. Get your tickets here. 
Conventional wisdom among smart technology entrepreneurs says not to hire people with Masters in Business Administration (MBAs) into startups. Aaron Patzer, founder of Mint, expressed the sentiment well when he said: “When valuing a startup, add $500k for every engineer, and subtract $250k for every MBA.” My friend Peter Thiel once warned a young entrepreneur: “Never ever hire an MBA; they will ruin your company.” I chimed in myself with this Quora answer. At Andreessen Horowitz, we believe that once everyone thinks that something is true, that might be a good time to do the opposite. So, with everyone convinced that MBAs are useless, I wonder: Is now the time to hire MBAs?  When considering this question, the first thing to understand is that MBAs have not always been the scourge of startup society. When I began my career in the late 80s and early 90s, MBAs ran most of the best new technology companies. Scott McNealy and Ed McCracken, Stanford MBAs, ran the two best new computer companies, Sun and Silicon Graphics, respectively. John Morgridge, Stanford MBA, ran Cisco, the best new networking company. Bill Campbell, Columbia MBA, ran a hot new consumer software company, Intuit, and Dave Duffield, Cornell MBA, ran the premier new enterprise software company, PeopleSoft.  So, what happened? How did startup world grow to loathe MBAs?  It turns out that the success of the MBAs from the late 80s and early 90s created an insatiable demand from startup companies and their backers to hire MBAs from top schools. With only a small number of top schools, the newly minted MBAs became the belles of the of the startup ball. Every Stanford and Harvard MBA received multiple offers from top startups and, not surprisingly, many MBAs developed a strong sense of entitlement and overconfidence.  They began to stroll into startups with insane lists of demands. They wanted lofty titles, they wanted to manage hundreds of people even though they had no management experience, and they wanted salaries that matched people with 10 years more experience. And the MBAs got what they wanted, which ironically precipitated the MBA’s long and painful fall from the penthouse to the outhouse.  It turns out, as I pointed out in my Quora post, you can’t learn management exclusively from a class or a book. It takes real world practice. Many of the MBAs who got the big management positions turned out to be some of the worst managers that Silicon Valley has ever seen. While understandable given their total lack of experience, the people assigned to work for them did not understand. When these employees asked themselves how such incompetent imbeciles could acquire such important jobs, all evidence pointed back to an all too familiar culprit: The miserable, sorry, weak manager that you suffer under got his position not by merit, but by MBA.  To make matters worse, the entitlement bug spread through the MBA community like a social game with full access to the Facebook feed controls. It got so bad that at one point an MBA employee of mine asked for a promotion because most of his classmates at Stanford had been promoted and he felt left out. Had I been a more experienced CEO, I would have fired him on the spot. Being young and naïve, I simply replied: “I’m sorry. You must have me confused with somebody who gives a crap.” In any case, the episode did not make me want to hire more MBAs.  Perhaps worst of all, many MBAs carried intense ambition for themselves, but no strong bond to the company’s mission. While everyone else in the company was “ride or die,” these MBAs could be seen carefully plotting their next career move. When you’re working 16 hours/day with a team of dedicated people driven towards achieving a nearly impossible goal, this does not sit well.  Finally, the MBA schools of the late 90s and early 2000s did a relatively poor job of preparing people for startups. MBAs learned how to analyze existing markets, but knew nothing about creating new markets. In general, the MBA education was geared towards attaining positions in large, established companies rather than new entrepreneurial ventures.  At this point, it’s probably not difficult to understand why MBAs carry little credibility in startup world. So why am I even asking the question? I think we have thrown the babies out with the bathwater. More specifically, we’ve thrown the outstanding talent out with the bad behavior of an old, irrelevant sub group. Broad categorizations usually tend to be a bad idea when it comes to people and in this case, the trends that led to the negative characterization have reversed. In my observation, there are four key reasons to consider hiring today’s MBAs.  The world largely beat the arrogance, overconfidence and sense of entitlement out of the current crop of MBAs. Most now exhibit a level of humility and willingness to learn that was unheard of 10 years ago. The course material has become much more relevant. Innovative instructors like Tom Eisenmann and Alison Wagonfeld at Harvard explore the challenges of scaling new companies. Mark Leslie and Andy Rachleff at Stanford teach key lessons in building enterprise sales channels. Bob Sutton and Huggy Rao at Stanford teach novel approaches to incentives. Today’s MBAs bring some interesting knowledge and relevant skills to the table. This is in stark contrast to the old curriculum, which focused on big company problems. The kids are still smart. Even in the late 90s and early 2000s, you had to be extremely smart and ambitious to get into the Stanford or Harvard MBA programs. That’s still true today. A different perspective can be helpful. Engineers run most technology startups and that’s great. But it is important to recognize that engineers tend to look at the world from the product out. Having a few people in the company who see the world from the market in can be enlightening. In the public equities market, everyone knows to buy low and sell high. However, the momentum of the day usually overwhelms that obvious strategy. In practice, public market investors pile into stocks as they become overvalued and abandon high quality companies at the first sign of trouble. Similarly, when it comes to hiring MBAs, technology companies have historically bought high and sold low. The current price is low.  
My father, Alfred “Bud” Weiss, owned a car dealership—“Bud’s Cadillacs” of Miami, Florida. When I’d drop by the office, he would usually pepper me with bits of business wisdom, but as a kid, I wasn’t very receptive. My father and I are pictured here:    My head was usually buried in a comic book, only half listening. However, there was one story that stuck with me and I have struggled to make sense out of it throughout my business career:  Son, you never, ever promote your best salesperson to be the sales manager. This is a classic mistake that other car dealers make. A bunch of my top producers came from their failed attempts as sales managers at other places. You commit two wrongs with these promotions: First, you take your top producer—someone raking in two to five times the average salesperson—off the sales floor. Second, you put them in a new job that they are totally unqualified to do successfully. This usually ends in disaster for everyone involved. His advice seemed to make sense until later in my career when I was actually faced with the problem. Some of our best salespeople and engineers at IronPort wanted to move into management and if we didn’t give them the opportunity, then it was clear they would go elsewhere. Of course, there’s not much of a dilemma when the high performer is a natural leader and people-person. Promoting great people from within is preferable on so many dimensions: there’s context, history, relationships and it all leads to a much better chance of success than hiring from the outside. The difficult corner case is the high-performing individual contributor that you can tell will likely fail in a leadership position. I’m talking about the sharp-elbowed, passive aggressive salesperson with little self-awareness. Or the my-way-or-the-highway, smartest-guy-in-the-room, workaholic engineer with horrific personal hygiene. How do you deal with that?  If they were really that good and were hell-bent on being a manager, then I came to believe that you had to give them a shot. That said, in my own experience, only about 25% of these experiments succeed in leadership. However, if managed carefully, the majority of the failures can ultimately be coached back into individual contributor roles, which is still a win. The key to all of it is making sure that there’s a sponsoring executive that is willing to spend a boatload of time coaching the budding leader. Here are some specific suggestions:  It all starts out with hard, raw conversation about the shortcomings you’ve observed and how they need to be grinded off for them to be a successful manager. E.g. “You can’t keep answering all the questions; leading is getting others to contribute.” The coach needs to meet weekly and do frequent check-ins with peers and subordinates in almost a constant 360 degree-feedback loop. Even if it isn’t working out, the constant coaching and feedback will ensure a soft landing back into their old role. It helps to have some great leadership training. In my experience, most leadership training courses suck. You get two hours of useful information spread out over two weeks of mind-numbing presentations. We put together a rapid fire, two-day course and had our leadership team teach it. Interviewing, performance reviews, 1:1s, career planning, holding staff meetings, etc. We all got together and boiled down the best practices for all the important areas into short, punchy presentations/role plays. Every new manager went through it to give them some tools that were culturally consistent with what we were doing. Develop a legit dual-career track. Bestowing a new title like Principal Engineer or Fellow along with a commensurate bump in salary and equity can help take the sting out of being removed from a leadership role. I know this all sounds like a ton of work but some people are just that special and totally worth it. Some of our best managers came out on the other side of these experiments and we had at least a handful of failures that we were able to retain as employees. My father built his business with castoffs from these experiments gone wrong at competitors. Perhaps because they had already failed elsewhere, his top performers didn’t aspire to try management again. Only in this context can I make sense of his guidance, as my experience has been quite the opposite.
When I started Loudcloud, I hired the best people that I knew—people whom I respected, trusted and liked. Like me, many of them did not have deep experience in the jobs that I gave them, but they worked night and day to make it work and they made great contributions to the company. Yet for many of them, there came a day when it was clear that I needed to hire someone with more experience to run the function I had previously entrusted to my loyal friend. Damn. How do you do that?  Should you do it at all? The first question that always comes to mind is: “Do I really need to do this?” Who could I possibly hire who will work this hard and bleed the company colors like this?” Sadly, if you’re asking the question, you very likely already know the answer. If you need to build a worldwide sales organization, your buddy who did the first few deals is almost certainly not the best choice. As hard as it may be, you need to take a Confucian approach. You must consider first all of the other employees and second your friend. The good of the individual must be sacrificed for the good of the whole.  How do you break the news? Once you make the decision, breaking the news will not be easy. It’s important to consider two deep emotions that the employee will feel:  Embarrassment – Do not underestimate what a large factor this will be in his thinking. All of his friends, relatives and colleagues know his current position. They know how hard he’s worked and how much he’s sacrificed for the company. How will he possibly explain to them that he will no longer be part of the executive team? Betrayal – I’ve been there from the beginning, I’ve worked side by side with you. How could you do this? It’s not like you’re perfect in your job either? How can you be so comfortable selling me out? Those are some powerful emotions, so get ready for an intense discussion. Ironically, the key to an emotional discussion is to take the emotion out of it. To do that, you must be very clear in your mind what you’ve decided and what you want to do.  The most important thing to decide is that you really want to do this. If you walk into a demotion discussion with an open decision, you will walk out with a mess: a mess of a situation and a mess of a relationship. As part of that decision, you need to be OK with the employee quitting the company. Given the intense emotions he will feel, there is no guarantee that he will want to stay. If you cannot afford to lose him, you cannot make this change.  Finally, you must decide the best role for him in your company. The obvious thing is to have him continue under his new boss, but this may not be the best thing for him, his boss, or his career. Your loyal employee will continue to have lots of knowledge about your company, competition, customers, and market that his new boss lacks. On the one hand, this can be a good thing—he can help get the new boss up to speed. On the other hand, when mixed with the intense emotions of embarrassment and betrayal, you might end up with a sabotage cocktail.  Another problem with this approach is that there is no way to paint him reporting to his old boss as anything but a demotion from a career path perspective. An alternative, if appropriate, would be to move him to another area of the company where his skills, talent, and knowledge will help. This kind of move will give him a chance to develop a new set of skills and help the company while he’s doing it. For young employees, getting experience in different areas can be super valuable.  Sadly, this is not a silver bullet since he might not want to work in another job; he might be hell bent on keeping his current job, so prepare for that as well.  Once you’ve decided to hire someone above your friend and decided on the alternatives that you’d like to offer him, you can have the conversation. Keep in mind that you cannot let him keep his job, but you can be fair and you can be honest. Some keys to doing that:  Use appropriate language – Make clear with your language that you’ve decided. In fact, use phrases like “I have decided” rather than “I think” or “I’d like.” By doing this, you will avoid putting the employee in the awkward position of wondering whether or not he should lobby for his old job. You can’t tell him what he wants to hear, but you can be honest. Admit reality – If you are a founder/CEO like I was, it probably won’t be lost on the employee that you are just as under-skilled for your job as he is for his. Don’t dodge this fact. In fact, it’s fine to admit that if you were a more experienced CEO, you might be able to develop him into the role, but two people who don’t know what they are doing is a recipe for failure. Acknowledge the contributions – If you want him to stay in the company, you should say that and make it crystal clear that you want to help him develop in his career and contribute to the company. Let him know that you appreciate what he’s done and that your decision is a result of what’s next more than what’s previous. The best way to do this, if appropriate, is to couple the demotion with an increase in compensation. Doing so will let him know that he’s both appreciated and valued going forward. Through all of this, keep in mind that it is what is and nothing you can say will change that or stop it from being deeply upsetting. Your goal should not be to take the sting out of it, but to be honest, clear, and effective. Your friend may not appreciate that in the moment, but he will appreciate it over time.  
Two years ago we invested $250,000 in Instagram. Thanks to the spectacular vision and effort of Kevin Systrom and the Instagram team, the investment will be worth $78,000,000 when the Faceboook acquisition closes. The work that Kevin and team did will go down as legend in the industry and we thank them immensely. We also thank our co-investors Steve Anderson of Baseline and Matt Cohler of Benchmark.  Despite Instagram’s awesome performance and our monstrous return, a number of articles have come out criticizing us for not making even more money on our investment. Ordinarily, when someone criticizes me for only making 312 times my money, I let the logic of their statement speak for itself. However, in this case, the narrative that some critics put forth has the nasty side effect of casting two outstanding entrepreneurs—Kevin and Dalton Caldwell—in an unfair light and glosses over an important ethical issue that we faced. As a result, I will clarify what happened and why we didn’t make even more money.  When we invested in Instagram, it wasn’t actually Instagram. It was a company called Burbn, and the idea was roughly to build a mobile micro blogging service. Technologically, it was also different: an HTML 5 application rather than a native app. As Kevin iterated on Burbn, we made another investment in an excellent entrepreneur, Dalton Caldwell. Dalton’s company, Mixed Media Labs, initially built a product called PicPlz. PicPlz aimed to be a mobile photo sharing service built on its own social graph. Furthermore, the graph would be public like Twitter rather than private like Facebook.  Subsequently, Kevin noticed that while Burbn wasn’t taking off, the photo-sharing component of it was doing quite well. As a result, he pivoted Burbn into Instagram, which then competed directly with PicPlz. It’s important to note that Kevin did not steal Dalton’s idea—Kevin came to it organically based on the Burbn data.  Still, we needed to make a decision. Should we fund the venture round of PicPlz, Instagram, both or neither? We loved both entrepreneurs, but they were building the exact same product. Since we were less than a year old ourselves at the time, this kind of conflict—which happens frequently in the venture capital business as companies evolve—was brand new to us.  Here’s how it looked then:  We liked both entrepreneurs very much, so there was no issue there—we would gladly back either. Instagram’s numbers were much better at the time as it had already begun its rocket run. From the perspective of the entrepreneurs, we’d invested in Dalton when he planned to build a photo sharing service, but we’d invested in a different initial product from Kevin. After speaking with both entrepreneurs and much internal discussion, we concluded that funding Kevin to compete with Dalton would be a violation of the original implicit commitment we made to Dalton—to not fund competitors to PicPlz. On the other hand, funding Dalton did not violate our implicit agreement with Kevin because he changed his business—we’d funded Burbn not Instagram.  So our choices were: a) invest in Dalton b) invest in neither or c) invest in Kevin and violate our commitment to Dalton. As soon as we fully recognized those were the choices, we ruled out option c and elected option a.  However, we still had a problem: because we had invested in Kevin’s seed round, we had both information rights and pro rata rights to the series B. These are important and valuable rights, but it seemed completely unethical to us to exercise them since we funded a competitor. As a result, we unilaterally and without compensation or consideration gave Kevin back those rights and did not invest further in Instagram.  And that’s the thing that we did that many writers think was really stupid. Despite that, if we had to do it again, we would.  As an epilogue, Dalton later pivoted out of PicPlz and is now building an exciting new service called App.Net.  I’d like to make two things absolutely clear that some writers, in their zeal to find something wrong with our investment, have gotten completely wrong:  Kevin absolutely did not steal Dalton’s idea. He pivoted to Instagram because that’s where his users were—period, end of story. We are excited and enthusiastic investors in Dalton’s company. Several reporters implied that we regret funding Dalton, because he did not sell his company to Facebook for $1 billion after two years. News to world: it generally takes longer than two years to create a billion dollars in value. What Kevin and team did was special and unique. We expect great things from Dalton and look forward to another massive return from his new idea. So, write what you will about us, but please get that right.  Share this:
In it, Jim Gilliam gives us a short tour of his life’s story. I encourage you to watch the entire mind-blowing twelve minutes. In it, Jim tells the story of how after contracting life-threatening cancer, he went from following a popular movement—Jerry Falwell-branded fundamentalist Christianity—to creating two of his own. First, following the tragedy of September 11, 2001, Jim became an activist for a better America and produced a series of compelling documentary films to further his cause. In order to promote these films, Jim developed a series of techniques using the Internet to basically create a movement—i.e. to organize a group of people to do something. In this case, learn from his films and strive to improve the country. Later, we find that the cancer treatment that Jim received earlier in the story burned out his lungs requiring that he receive a double lung transplant or die. Finding a donor for two healthy lungs and a doctor willing to perform the insanely risky surgery is the mother of all long shots, so Jim had to start a new movement to get new lungs. Organizing people to save his own life profoundly impacted Jim’s view of how he should spend the rest of it. So much so that his personal domain is called 3dna.us to represent the 3 different DNAs that combine to keep him alive, a constant reminder that he cannot do it alone.  After recovering from the operation, Jim had a defining revelation. He realized that everything good comes from people working together to accomplish something important and, furthermore, that the Internet would be the great enabler of the most important endeavors. Unfortunately, harnessing the power of the Internet to start a movement turned out to be extremely complex. Nobody knew this better than Jim because he had to coordinate everything from email to social networking to blogging to rally people to his own cause. Being a world-class inventor and entrepreneur, he felt that it was up to him to step up and solve the problem. Furthermore, he believed that a company was probably the best vehicle to do it.  So Jim created a company to develop software to organize communities and get results and he called it NationBuilder. By the time NationBuilder was ready to raise money, Jim’s software implementation of his vision became ultra compelling. So much so that my friend Joe Green, who had an important history of organizing groups of people through his work as founder/CEO of causes, was so impressed that he joined NationBuilder as its president.  The product’s initial results were as impressive as the vision. Before getting to 10 employees, NationBuilder had over 300 paying customers. More importantly, the customers kept getting stunning results. Alex Torpey, a twenty-four-year-old with a breakthrough vision for using technology to improve government, ran for mayor of South Orange, New Jersey and defeated the far older incumbent. Alex is now the youngest mayor in the history of New Jersey. And he ran with no party affiliation.  But it was not really the early results that compelled me to invest in NationBuilder and go on the board; it was Jim’s vision that people connected and focused on a goal create everything great in the world. As he described the vision, I thought of every musician that needed to organize her fans, every author that needed to reach readers, every pastor that needed to encourage his members, and every person who wanted to make a difference, but didn’t know how. And then I thought of Jim’s personal story and I was in.  Never doubt that a small group of thoughtful, committed citizens can change the world; indeed, it’s the only thing that ever has. ―Margaret Mead 
When a company starts to lose its major battles, the truth often becomes the first casualty. CEOs and employees work tirelessly to develop creative narratives that help them avoid dealing with the obvious facts. Despite their intense creativity, many companies often end up with the exact same false explanations.  Some familiar lies “She left, but we were going to fire her, or give her a bad performance review” – High tech companies tend to track employee attrition in three categories:  People who quit People who got fired People who quit, but it’s OK because the company didn’t want them anyway Fascinatingly, as companies begin to struggle, the third category always seems to grow much faster than the first. In addition, the sudden wave of “semi-performance-related attrition” usually happens in companies that claim to have a “super high talent bar”. How do all these superstar employees suddenly go from great to crap? How is it possible that when you lose a top-rated employee before you can say “unwanted attrition”, the manager carefully explains how her performance fell off?   “We would have won, but the other guys gave the deal away” – “The customer selected us technically and thinks we are the better company, but our competitor just gave the product away. We would never sell so cheaply as it would hurt our reputation.” Anybody who has ever run an enterprise sales force has heard this lie before. You go into an account, you fight hard, and you lose. The Sales Rep, not wanting to shine the light on himself blames the “used car dealer” Rep from the other company. The CEO, not wanting to believe that she’s losing product competitiveness, believes the Rep. If you hear this lie, try to validate this claim with the actual customer. I’ll bet you can’t.  “Just because we missed the intermediate milestones doesn’t mean we won’t hit our product schedule” – In engineering meetings where there is great pressure to ship on time—a customer commitment, a quarter that depends on it, or a competitive imperative—everybody hopes for good news. When the facts don’t align with the good news, a clever manager will find the narrative to make everybody feel better—until the next meeting.  “We have a very high churn rate, but as soon as we turn on email marketing to our user base, people will come back” – Yes, of course. The reason that people leave our service and don’t come back is that we have not been sending them enough spam. That makes total sense to me, too.  Where do lies come from? To answer that question, I thought back to a conversation that I had years ago with the incomparable Andy Grove.  Back at the tail end of the Great Internet Bubble in 2001, as all the big technology companies began missing their quarters by giant amounts, I found myself wondering how none of them saw it coming. One would think after the great dot-com crash of April 2000, companies like Cisco, Siebel, and HP would realize that they would soon face a slowdown as many of their customers hit the wall, but despite perhaps the most massive and public early warning system of all time, each CEO reiterated strong guidance right up until the point where they dramatically whiffed their quarters.  I asked Andy why these great CEOs would lie about their impending fate.  He said they were not lying to investors, but rather, they were lying to themselves.  Andy explained that humans, particularly those who build things, only listen to leading indicators of good news. For example, if a CEO hears that engagement for her application increased an incremental 25% beyond the normal growth rate one month, she will be off to the races hiring more engineers to keep up with the impending tidal wave of demand. On the other hand, if engagement decreases 25%, she will be equally intense and urgent in explaining it away: “The site was slow that month, there were 4 holidays, we made a UI change that caused all the problems. For gosh sakes, let’s not panic!”  Both leading indicators may have been wrong, or both may have been right, but our hypothetical CEO—like almost every other CEO—only took action on the positive indicator and only looked for alternative explanations on the negative leading indicator.  So if you read this and it all sounds too familiar and you find yourself wondering why your honest employees are lying to you, the answer is they are not. They are lying to themselves.  And if you believe them, you are lying to yourself.  
Major technology platforms tend to last about 25 to 30 years. This gives them time to gather sufficient developer momentum, enable a set of transformational ideas, build those ideas, and form a large industry around it. The platforms then sustain for an additional 5-10 years due to inertia and lock-in. Finally, when the shortcomings of the old platform become too much to bear — ­as with the Mainframe, Hierarchical Databases, and more recently the PC — a new platform emerges to take the old platform’s place and bring the future forward.  When I was a young man in 1990, I designed and deployed Silicon Graphics’ first wide area network using technology from a little known networking startup called Cisco Systems. The technologies and techniques that I used would prove to be the basis for the next 2 decades of networking architecture. Through the years, the platform that I grew up on has served the world extremely well, enabling the massive build out of the Internet itself. However, certain characteristics of the platform have remained remarkably closed and stagnant over the years.  The hubs and routers I first worked with did little besides forward packets. Switches have become smarter and smarter over time, but the dark side of these advances is that they have been made in an exceptionally proprietary and brittle way. As a result, only a select few companies have any ability to add new functionality and those that do, do so in a manner that makes customers wary to make even the simplest changes to their networks.  To make matters worse, the brittle nature of today’s networking platform severely hamstrings cloud computing. Amazon’s AWS, the largest cloud offering in the world, runs an embarrassingly feature poor network in order to maintain enough flexibility to support its service. Networking functionality that has been around for over twenty years such as multicasting, traffic isolation, and security isolation are absent from Amazon’s offering. When people ask me why more enterprises haven’t moved to the cloud, I point out that doing so would require reversing out the last 15 years of networking features from their applications.  This is why the data networking architecture of the past 30 years — characterized by extremely smart but highly propriety switches that are closed to 99.99% of would-be network developers — has finally run its course.  The Time is Now In order to overcome the massive inertia associated with a dominant platform technology, two conditions must exist. First, there must be new, overwhelmingly important functionality that the old platform cannot support in a reasonable way. Second, the new platform must be able to coexist and interoperate with the old. Until recently, neither of these pre-conditions held for networking, but in past few years, changes in the surrounding ecosystem have made both true:  The Rise of Cloud Computing – The current architecture was developed to deliver packets between two stationary hosts, in a network under unified administrative control. Thus, globally distributed routing protocols along with manual configuration and scripting were largely sufficient. Today’s datacenter networks must cope with multiple tenants, each requiring stringent performance and isolation guarantees for their migrating VMs. The current architecture simply cannot handle these requirements. The Rise of Server Virtualization – Previously, introducing new network functionality in a datacenter required a forklift upgrade. In a modern virtualized environment, all traffic passes through a software switch in the hypervisor before entering the physical network. By controlling these software switches at the edge, a new platform can assume control of the network without requiring a customer to change any parts of the physical networking infrastructure. Thus, the new architecture can be introduced without displacing the old platform. Clearly, the time is now.  Enter the Innovator Martin Casado began his career auditing networks at a government intelligence agency.  While trying to secure our nation against terrorist attacks, he became increasingly frustrated that current networking technology prevented him from solving mission critical problems. He needed a better platform that was so radically different that he knew that he’d have to build it himself. To do so, he journeyed to Stanford University where he connected with like-minded people in Stanford Professor Nick McKeown and UC Berkeley Professor Scott Shenker. McKeown and Shenker were equally frustrated with the current state of the networking art, but for a different reason. They taught network innovation, but it was almost impossible to innovate on the network. You see, real network innovation requires being able to work with real networks – i.e. real production traffic. Sadly, today’s networks are so fragile that no right-minded network administrator would ever allow experimental traffic and programs on her production networks. In fact, even the network administrators at Stanford said “no” to experimental traffic.  Once they joined forces, Casado, McKeown and Shenker sought a platform that:  Completely virtualized the network making the network every bit as flexible as a virtualized server Decoupled networking software from proprietary hardware, so that any company could add any kind of functionality to the network – not just the major networking companies. Was infinitely scalable using commodity hardware Building this new platform was a humongous effort – too big an effort to fund at the University level, so Casado, McKeown, and Shenker started a company, Nicira Networks.  Today Nicira Networks publicly unveiled its widely anticipated first product, the Network Virtualization Platform along with 5 major customers – AT&T, eBay, NTT, Rackspace and Fidelity Investments, who are currently deploying NVP.  I am thrilled to be a part of it and welcome all of you to the future of networking.  Disclaimer: Andreessen Horowitz is the major investor in Nicira and I am on the Board of Directors. 
Since Marc and I founded Andreessen Horowitz three years ago, we have raised $2.7 billion. That statement begs a few questions. The two most obvious are:  Why did such a new venture capital firm raise so much money? How did such a new venture capital firm raise so much money? To get to the answers, it’s useful to go back to the original motivation for starting Andreessen Horowitz.  After raising our first round of funding for Loudcloud in 1999, we went to visit our new venture capital firm and meet their full team. As founding CEO, I remember being quite excited to meet our financial backers and talk about how we could partner to build a great company. That excitement took a sharp downhill turn when one of the top partners said to me, in front of my co-founders, “When are you going to get a real CEO?”  I was completely stunned—the comment knocked the wind out of me. Our largest investor had basically called me a fake CEO in front of my team. I said, “What do you mean?”—hoping he would revise his statement and enable me to save face. Instead he pressed on: “Someone who has designed a large organization, someone who knows great senior executives and brings prebuilt customer relationships, someone who knows what they are doing.”  I could hardly breathe. It was bad enough that he undermined my standing as CEO, but to make matters worse, I knew that at some level he was right. I didn’t have those skills.  I had never done those things. And I did not know those people. I was the founding CEO, not a professional CEO. I could almost hear the clock ticking in the background as my time running the company quickly ran out.  Could I learn the job and build my network fast enough or would I lose the company? That question tortured me for months.  In the years that followed, I remained CEO, for better or worse. I worked incredibly hard to close the gap between what the partner had described and where I was at the start. Thanks to a lot of effort and help from friends and mentors, especially Bill Campbell, the company survived and ultimately became quite successful and valuable.  However, not a day went by when I didn’t think about that interaction. I always wondered how long I had to grow up and how I could find help to build my skills and make the necessary connections along the way.  Marc and I discussed this often. We wondered aloud why as founders we had to prove to our investors beyond a shadow of a doubt that we could run the company, rather than our investors assuming that we would run the company we’d created. This conversation ultimately became the inspiration for Andreessen Horowitz.  Marc and I share a simple belief that became the basis for our new venture capital firm: in general, founding CEOs perform better than professional CEOs over the long term, and a venture capital firm that enables founding CEOs to succeed would help build the best companies and yield superior investment returns.  As we set out to design a venture capital firm that would enable founders to run their own companies, we began by asking: In what ways are professional CEOs superior to founder CEOs?  Professional CEOs bring two core advantages to the table:  Superior skill set – Being CEO requires vast know-how that is very difficult to gain without extensive experience actually being CEO. Founders with no CEO experience naturally make many critical mistakes during their “on the job training” period. Excellent professional CEOs already have those skills. Superior network – Great professional CEOs know lots of outstanding executives and employees. They also know key reporters and analysts, important potential customers and top industry players. Founders tend not to have enough industry experience to know all these people and need to build their networks almost from scratch. Next, we asked: How might a venture capital firm help close those gaps?  Addressing the skill set issue proved to be difficult because sadly the only way to learn how to be a CEO is to be a CEO. Sure, we might try to teach some skills, but I know from experience that learning to be a CEO through classroom training would be like learning to be an NFL quarterback through classroom training. Even if Peyton Manning and Tom Brady were your instructors, with no experience, you’d get killed the moment you took the field.  We decided that while we would not be able to give a founder CEO all the skills she needed, we would be able to provide the kind of mentorship that would accelerate the learning process. As a result, our first requirement for General Partners is to be an effective mentor for a founder striving to be a CEO. This is why so many of our General Partners are former founders or CEOs or both, and they are all highly focused on helping founders become outstanding CEOs.  Of course, not all founders want to be CEO—there are companies for which the right thing is to bring in a professional CEO. For those companies, we focus on helping the founders identify the right CEO, and then helping the CEO successfully integrate into the company and partner with the founders to retain their unique strengths.  Next, we went after the network.  Existing venture capitalists with whom we had worked with had important industry relationships, but we found them to be lacking in the following ways:  Siloed – As an entrepreneur, you can often count on the General Partner on your board to introduce you to customers or executives, but you can’t count on the venture capital firm itself. Each General Partner has his own distinct network, and it’s not really feasible or practical to access the other partners’ networks because those partners prioritize their own companies and in practice you will never see them—they are not available to help you. So, there is no firm-wide network you can plug into. Hard to access – As CEO it’s always a bit weird to say to your VC, “Please introduce me to some potential customers.” First, it seems like an inconvenience—VCs are clearly busy people with many other things to do. Second, there isn’t any easy process to execute that introduction. Where will this introduction take place? Will the VC set up the meeting? Will you have to fly out to see the prospect? Will the VC come with you? Will the prospect be qualified well enough to do that? If not, then should you even ask? To make matters worse, the need to meet customers is not a one-time event. How do you ask your VC the second, third and tenth times? And at what point does your VC start to judge you as incapable of reaching customers (or partners, distributors, suppliers, investors or acquirers) on your own? Incomplete – Finally, VC networks tend to be incomplete. A certain General Partner might know a certain type of customer like telecom carriers, but not others like pharmaceutical companies or government agencies. They may know customers, but not have deep relationships with key reporters. They may know key reporters, but not know executives you would want to hire. They might know executives, but not engineers. As founding CEO, one tends to be busy. If you spend time trying to tap a network and come up empty, you probably won’t bother trying again. To address these issues, we designed Andreessen Horowitz’s network to be firm-wide, dead simple to access and comprehensive—supported by operating partners who work full-time to develop and manage each branch of the network.  This approach has already lead to some stunning results:  In 2011, we hosted over 600 portfolio presentations to corporate customers and partners at our office in Menlo Park. These presentations resulted in more than 3,000 introductions between portfolio companies and prospective Fortune 500/Global 2000 senior executives. We’ve built relationships with over 4,000 engineers, designers and product managers, and we’ve made more than 1,300 introductions to our portfolio companies, resulting in 130 hires within the portfolio. We added over 550 executives to our network in 2011 and made more than 300 executive introductions to our portfolio companies. We’ve had nearly 400 interactions with media on behalf of our portfolio companies. Through these practices, we’ve been able to help founders develop critical CEO skills and wield networks as broad and powerful as the best professional CEOs. And that is why we have become a popular firm among founders.  Our reputation with founders has then enabled us to invest in great entrepreneurs building the great new technology companies. Interestingly, the demand from entrepreneurs has come in all stages and sizes. From seed stage entrepreneurs like JR Rivers at Cumulus Networks to entrepreneurs with fast growing enterprises like Brian Chesky at Airbnb, great founders everywhere want to be the best CEO that they can be and work with us to help them do that.  And that’s both how and why we raised $2.7 billion. We are uniquely positioned to help the greatest technology entrepreneurs in the world build the best technology companies in the world, and that’s just what we’re going to do.
Many years ago, I encountered a particularly tricky management situation. Two excellent organizations in the company, Customer Support and Sales Engineering, went to war with each other. The Sales Engineers escalated a series of blistering complaints arguing that the Customer Support team did not respond with urgency, refused to fix issues in the product, and generally inhibited sales and customer satisfaction. Meanwhile, the Customer Support group claimed that the sales engineers submitted bugs without qualification, did not listen to valid suggested fixes, and were alarmists who assigned every issue the top priority. Beyond the actual complaints, the teams genuinely did not like each other. To make matters worse, these groups had to work together constantly in order for the company to function. Both teams boasted superb personnel and outstanding managers, so there was nobody to fire or demote. I could not figure out what to do.  During this time, I miraculously happened to watch the motion picture classic Freaky Friday starring the underrated Barbara Harris and the incomparable Jodie Foster—note: there is also a high quality remake starring Jamie Lee Curtis and the troubled, but talented Lindsey Lohan. In the film, mother and daughter grow completely frustrated with each other’s lack of understanding and wish that they could switch places and they do:   Through the course of the movie, by being inside each other’s bodies, both characters develop an excellent understanding of the challenges that the other faces. As a result, the two women become great friends when they switch back. After watching both the original and the remake, I knew that I had found the answer: I would employ a Freaky Friday management technique.  The very next day I informed the head of Sales Engineering and the head of Customer Support that they would be switching jobs. I explained that, like Jodie Foster and Barbara Harris, they would keep their minds, but get new bodies. Permanently. Their initial reactions were not unlike the remake:   However, after just one week walking in the other’s moccasins, both executives quickly diagnosed the core issues causing the conflict. They then swiftly acted to implement a simple set of processes that cleared up the combat and got the teams working harmoniously. From that day to the day we sold the company, the sales engineering and support organizations worked better together than any other major groups in the company—all thanks to Freaky Friday, perhaps the most insightful management training film ever made.
Thanks to Ward Cunningham, the metaphor technical debt is now a well-understood concept. While you may be able to borrow time by writing quick and dirty code, you will eventually have to pay it back—with interest. Often this trade-off makes sense, but you will run into serious trouble if you fail to keep the trade-off in the front of your mind. There also exists a less well-understood parallel concept, which I will call management debt.  Like technical debt, management debt is incurred when you make an expedient, short-term management decision with an expensive, long-term consequence. Also like technical debt, the trade-off sometimes makes sense, but often does not. More importantly, if you incur the management debt without accounting for it, then you will eventually go management bankrupt.  Like technical debt, management debt comes in too many different forms to elaborate entirely, but a few salient examples will help explain the concept. For this post, I choose 3 of the more popular types among startups:  Putting two in the box Over compensating a key employee, because she gets another job offer No performance management or employee feedback process Putting two in the box What do you do when you have two outstanding employees who logically both fit in the exact same place on the organizational chart? Perhaps you have a world-class architect who is running engineering, but she does not have the experience to scale the organization to the next level. You also have an outstanding operational person who is not great technically. You want to keep both in the company, but you only have one position. So, you get the bright idea to put “two in the box” and take on a little management debt. The short-term benefits are clear: a) you keep both employees, b) you don’t have to develop either because they will theoretically help each other develop, c) you instantly close the skill set gap. Unfortunately, you will pay for those benefits with interest and at a very high interest rate.  For starters, by doing this you will make every engineer’s job more difficult. If an engineer needs a decision made, which boss should she go to? If that boss decides, will the other boss be able to override it? If it’s a complex decision that requires a meeting, does she have to schedule both heads of engineering for the meeting? Who sets the direction for the organization? Will the direction actually get set if doing so requires a series of meetings?  In addition, you have removed all accountability. If schedules slip, who is accountable? If engineering throughput becomes uncompetitive, who is responsible? If the operational head is responsible for the schedule slip and the technical head is responsible for throughput, what happens if the operational head thrashes the engineers to make the schedule and kills throughput? How would you know that she did that? The really expensive part about both of these things is that they tend to get worse over time. In the very short-term you might mitigate these effects with extra meetings or by attempting to carve up the job in a clear way. However, as things get busy the mitigation will fade and the organization will degenerate. Eventually, you’ll either make a lump sum payment by making the hard decision and putting one in the box or your engineering organization will suck forever.  Over compensating a key employee because she gets another job offer An excellent engineer decides to leave the company because she gets a better offer. For various reasons, you were undercompensating her, but the offer from the other company pays more than any engineer in your company and the engineer in question is not your best engineer. Still, she is working on a critical project and you cannot afford to lose her. So you match the offer. You save the project, but you pile on the debt.  Here’s how the payment will come due. You probably think that your counteroffer was confidential because you’d sworn her to secrecy. Let me explain why it was not. She has friends in the company. When she got the offer from the other company, she consulted with her friends. One of her best friends advised her to take the offer. When she decided to stay, she had to explain to him why she disregarded his advice or lose personal credibility. So she told him and swore him to secrecy. He agreed to honor the secret, but was incensed that she had to threaten to quit in order to get a proper raise. Furthermore, he was furious that you overcompensated her. So, he told the story, but kept her name confidential to preserve the secret. And now everyone in engineering knows that the best way to get a raise is to generate an offer from another company then threaten to quit. It’s going to take awhile to pay off that debt.  No performance management or employee feedback process Your company is now 25 people and you know that you should formalize the performance management process, but you don’t want to pay the price. You worry that doing so will make it feel like a “big company”. More so, you do not want your employees to be offended by the feedback, because you can’t afford to lose anyone right now. And people are happy, so why rock the boat? Why not take on a little management debt?  The first noticeable payments will be due when somebody performs below expectations:  CEO: “He was good when we hired him, what happened?” Manager: “He’s not doing the things that we need him to do.” CEO: “Did we clearly tell him that?” Manager: “Maybe not clearly . . .” However, the larger payment will be a silent tax. Companies execute well when everybody is on the same page and everybody is constantly improving. In a vacuum of feedback, there is almost no chance that your company will perform optimally across either dimension. Directions with no corrections will seem fuzzy and obtuse. People rarely improve weakness that they are unaware of. The ultimate price you will pay for not giving feedback: systematically crappy company performance.  In the end Every really good, really experienced CEO that I know shares one important characteristic: they tend to opt for the hard answer to organizational issues. If faced with giving everyone the same bonus to make things easy or sharply rewarding performance and ruffling many feathers, they’ll ruffle the feathers. If given the choice of cutting a popular project today, because it’s not in the long-term plans or you’re keeping it around for morale purposes and to appear consistent, they’ll cut it today. Why? Because they’ve paid the price of management debt and they would rather not do that again.  Special thanks to my friend Joanne Bradford who came up with the idea for this post and coined the term “management debt”.
Early in my tenure as product manager for the web servers at Netscape, we faced a terrible crisis. We just got our hands on Microsoft’s new web server, Internet Information Server (IIS), and benchmarked against our product. Microsoft’s IIS had every feature that we had, was five times faster and we knew that they were going to give it away for free. This might not sound so bad, but we had just gone public three months earlier with a story to Wall Street that said, “Don’t worry about Microsoft giving away the browser because we will make money selling servers.” Oh snap.  I immediately went to work trying to move the playing field and pivot the server product line to something that we could sell for money. The late, great Mike Homer and I worked furiously on a set of partnerships and acquisitions that would broaden the product line and surround the web server with enough functionality that we would be able survive the attack.  As I excitedly reviewed the plan with my engineering counterpart, Bill Turpin, he looked at me as though I was a little kid who had much to learn. Bill was a long-time veteran of battling Microsoft from his time at Borland and understood what I was trying to do, but remained unconvinced. He said: “Ben, those silver bullets that you and Mike are looking for are fine and good, but our web server is five times slower. There is no silver bullet that’s going to fix that. No, we are going to have to use a lot of lead bullets.” Oh snap.  As a result of Bill’s words, we focused our engineering team on fixing the performance issues while working the other things in the background. We eventually beat Microsoft’s performance and grew the server line to become a $400M business and we would never have done it without those lead bullets.  I carried that lesson with me for many years. Six years later, when I was CEO of Opsware, our toughest competitor Bladelogic started to consistently beat us in large deals. We were a public company and the losses were all too visible. To make matters worse, we needed to win those deals in order to beat the Wall Street projections, so the company felt tremendous pressure. Many of the smartest people in my company came to me with ideas for avoiding the battle:  “Let’s build a light-weight version of the product and go down market.” “Let’s acquire a company with a simpler architecture.” “Let’s focus on service providers.” The issue with their ideas was that we weren’t facing a market problem. The customers were buying; they just weren’t buying our product. This was not a time to pivot. So I said the same thing to every one of them: “There are no silver bullets for this, only lead bullets.” They did not want to hear that, but it made things clear: we had to build a better product. There was no other way out. No window, no hole, no escape hatch, no backdoor. We had to go through the front door and deal with the big, ugly guy blocking it. Lead bullets.  After nine months of hard work on an extremely rugged product cycle, we regained our product lead and eventually built a company that was worth $1.6B. Without the lead bullets, I suspect we would have ended at about 1/10th that value.  There may be nothing scarier in business than facing an existential threat. So scary that many in the organization will do anything to avoid it. They will look for any alternative, any way out, any excuse not to live or die in a single battle. I see this often in start up pitches. The conversations go something like this:  Entrepreneur: “We have the best product in the market by far. All the customers love it and prefer it to competitor X.” Me: “Why does competitor X have five times your revenue?” Entrepreneur: “We are using partners and OEMs, because we can’t build a direct channel like competitor X.” Me: “Why not? If you have the better product, why not knuckle up and go to war?” Entrepreneur: “Ummm.” Me: “Stop looking for the silver bullet.” There comes a time in every company’s life where it must fight for its life. If you find yourself running when you should be fighting, you need to ask yourself: “If our company isn’t good enough to win, then do we need to exist at all?”
A year ago I wrote about a very special entrepreneur, Christian Gheorghe, who escaped Communist Romania, migrated to America, and—after starting here with $27 as a limo driver and construction worker—eventually became a computer scientist and an entrepreneur. I indicated that just as he broke from an oppressive, totalitarian regime, he planned to free his customers from the oppression of enterprise software. Today Christian announces his new company Tidemark and I finally get to tell you how he will redefine and reinvent enterprise performance management and, more broadly, data analytics.  As we enter the age of the cloud/mobile platform, Tidemark provides a compelling example of why future applications will be far superior to the current generation. By properly using the bursting capabilities of the cloud, Tidemark benchmarks out at 1,000 times the performance of current solutions, which sometimes take 6 or 7 days to consolidate financials across a business. By using the iPad as the primary user interface target, Tidemark is highly accessible to business people and not just data analysts.  Both of these advances turn out to be critically important. If it takes a week to consolidate financial statements, then any scenario planning will be stale by a minimum of one week. In today’s real-time business environment, that’s ridiculous and certainly uncompetitive. Anybody who has been in business for any length of time knows that the data represents a portion, but not all of the business. In the same way that a map is not the terrain, the spreadsheet is not the business. As a result, having data analysts analyze data and the managers of the business attempt to make decisions on that basis is far from optimal. By making the data and its analysis directly available to the people with the knowledge, Tidemark transforms decision quality.  Beyond these platform advantages, Tidemark changes the nature of data analytics by ditching the two fundamental and problematic questions on which the existing industry is based:  What data do I have? What reports do I want? The trouble with these questions is that a) it is highly unlikely that you’ve gathered all of the relevant data in the right schema and format prior to needing it, b) businesses are not best represented in reports and c) the reports generally say very little that’s interesting about the future. As a result, companies that analyze their businesses with off-the-shelf products tend to do a far worse job than companies like Google who use data to achieve massive competitive advantage through teams of brilliant engineers.  Christian replaced these two ancient questions with far better ones:  How does our business work? How do we want to measure it, understand it, and predict what will happen next? Tidemark’s software begins by literally capturing a blueprint of the customer’s business. If you think of a business as a series of processes executed by a variety of people designed to create specific, measurable outcomes then you get the basic idea of how Tidemark defines a blueprint and aligns itself to the business. It’s a great alignment, because when you think about it, processes cover the import aspects of a business—product development process, sales process, financial planning process, etc. Tidemark enables companies to capture their process architecture and the related key performance indicators in software. Once Tidemark understands how a business works and how the company wants to measure and understand it, it can help the company forecast future results, scenario plan, and continuously improve.  For those of us who have been around this kind of software for years, Tidemark’s breakthroughs are breathtaking. It’s a product that delivers on a 30-year vision in the same way that the iPhone finally fulfilled the dream of the Newton.  Christian is the shining example of why an open and benevolent immigration policy for oppressed peoples is the right one. Before he is done, he will make thousands of U.S. businesses more competitive, employ many Americans, and lead the way for other companies to follow and improve their approach to software. And all we had to do was give him a chance.
This post is dedicated to the late Al Davis. Rest in peace.  “Just win baby.” —Al Davis Back in the bad old days when I was running Loudcloud, I thought to myself: how could I have possibly prepared for this? How could I know that half our customers would go out of business? How could I know that it would become impossible to raise money in the private markets? How could I have figured out that there would be 221 IPOs in 2000 and 19 in 2001? Could anybody expect me to achieve a reasonable outcome given those circumstances?  As I was feely sorry for myself, I randomly watched an interview with famous football coach Bill Parcells. He was telling the story of how he had a similar dilemma when he began his Head Coaching career. In his very first season as coach, Parcell’s team, The New York Giants, was hit with a rash of injuries. He worried incessantly about the impact of the injuries on the team’s fortunes, as it is difficult enough to win with your best players let alone a bunch of substitutes. When his friend and mentor Raiders owner Al Davis called Parcells to check in, Parcells relayed his injury issues. Parcell’s: “Al, I am just not sure how we can win without so many of our best players. What should I do?” Davis replied: “Bill, nobody cares, just coach your team.”  That might be the best CEO advice ever. Because, you see, nobody cares. When things go wrong in your company, nobody cares. The press doesn’t care, your investors don’t care, your board doesn’t care, your employees don’t care, even your mama doesn’t care. Nobody cares.  And they are right not to care. A great reason for failing won’t preserve one dollar for your investors, won’t save one employee’s job, or get you one new customer. It especially won’t make you feel one bit better when you shut down your company and declare bankruptcy.  All the mental energy that you use to elaborate your misery would be far better used trying to find the one, seemingly impossible way out of your current mess. It’s best to spend zero time on what you could have done and all of your time on what you might do. Because in the end, nobody cares, just run your company.
Everyone in the technology industry seems to agree that people are paramount, yet nobody seems to be on the same page with what the people organization­—Human Resources—should look like.  The problem is that when it comes to HR, most CEOs don’t really know what they want. In theory, they want a well-managed company with a great culture. Instinctively they know that an HR organization probably can’t deliver that. As a result, CEOs usually punt on the issue and implement something that’s sub-optimal if not worthless.  Interestingly, one of the first things that you learn when you run an engineering organization is that a good Quality Assurance organization cannot build a high quality product, but it can tell you when the development team builds a low quality product. Similarly, a high quality Human Resources organization cannot make you a well-managed company with a great culture, but it can tell you when you and your managers are not getting the job done.  The Employee Lifecycle The best way to approach management quality assurance is through the lens of the employee lifecycle. From hire to retire, how good is your company? Is your management team world-class in all phases? How do you know?  A great HR organization will support, measure and help improve your management team. Some of the questions that they will help you answer:  Recruiting and hiring  Do you sharply understand the skills and talents required to succeed in every open position? Are your interviewers well prepared? Do your managers and employees do an effective job of selling your company to prospective employees? Do interviewers arrive on time? Do managers and recruiters follow up with candidates in a timely fashion? Do you compete effectively for talent against the best companies? Compensation  Do your benefits make sense for your company demographics? How do your salary and stock option packages compare to the companies that you compete with for talent? How well do your performance rankings correspond to your compensation practices? Training and Integration  When you hire an employee how long does it take them to become productive from the perspective of the employee, her peers, and her manager? Shortly after joining, how well does an employee understand what’s expected of her? Performance management  Do your managers give consistent, clear feedback to their employees? What is the quality of your company’s written performance reviews? Did all of your employees receive their reviews on time? Do you effectively manage out poor performers? Motivation  Are you employees excited to come to work? Do your employees believe in the mission of the company? Do they enjoy coming to work every day? Do you have any employees who are actively disengaged? Do your employees clearly understand what’s expected of them? Do employees stay a long time or do they quit faster than normal? Why do employees quit? Requirements to be great at running HR What kind of person should you look for to comprehensively and continuously understand the quality of your management team? Here are some key requirements:  World-class process design skills—Much like the head of quality assurance, the head of HR must be a masterful process designer. One key to accurately measuring critical management processes is excellent process design and control. A true diplomat—Nobody likes a tattle tale and there is no way for an HR organization to be effective if the management team doesn’t implicitly trust it. Managers must believe that HR is there to help them improve rather than police them. Great HR leaders genuinely want to help the managers and could care less about getting credit for identifying problems. They will work directly with the managers to get quality up and only escalate to the CEO when necessary. If an HR leader hoards knowledge, makes power plays, or plays politics, he will be useless. Industry knowledge—Compensation, benefits, best recruiting practices, et al are all fast moving targets. The head of HR must be deeply networked in the industry and stay abreast of all the latest developments. Intellectual heft to be the CEO’s trusted advisor—None of the other skills matter if the CEO does not fully back the head of HR in holding the managers to a high quality standard. In order for this to happen, the CEO must trust the HR leader’s thinking and judgment. Understanding of things unspoken—When management quality starts to break down in a company, nobody says anything about it, but super perceptive people can tell that the company is slipping. You need one of those. Acknowledgement I would like to give a very special thanks to my head of human resources, Shannon Callahan, who taught me everything that I know about this subject.  
Today, my company Ning, where I serve as chairman and cofounder, is announcing that it has agreed to merge into Glam Media.  In this post, I’d like to briefly explain the whats and whys, and to thank a lot of people who have worked very hard to get us to this point.  Ning is my third company, founded several years ago by Gina Bianchini and myself, and run for the last couple years by my close friend and colleague Jason Rosenthal.  Over the last two years, Jason and his team have brilliantly executed a dramatic transformation of the company and today Ning hosts over 100,000 social networks covering every conceivable topic and interest, from 50 Cent to Sarah Palin and beyond. Ning’s mission has always been “your own social network for anything” and the team at Ning has worked hard to achieve this.  Glam is a company founded by longtime entrepreneur and innovator Samir Arora.  I first met Samir almost 15 years ago in his role as founder and CEO of NetObjects, one of the first, and best, web and e-commerce development systems, later bought by IBM.  Before that, Samir was a longtime senior contributor at Apple, where his work led to Apple’s famous “Knowledge Navigator” vision video and then later, through a long and winding road, to the Apple iPad.  In Glam, Samir and his outstanding team have built one of the leading premium content networks on the web.  Glam’s high-end content has amazing reach: 200 million users and 2.6 billion page views across 2,500 publishers, with advertising participation by 1,000 premium brands. Combining Ning’s social technology, user base, and 100,000+ networks will immediately boost Glam’s reach to 240 million users and 3.1 billion page views, add recurring subscription revenue to Glam’s business model, and most importantly, set up the combined company to be the leading social media content company on the web.  As consumer behavior broadly moves from old media to the web—as software eats content—the opportunity for high-end online content is gigantic and our combined company will be in the pole position in this huge market.  To that end, I am also delighted to announce that I will be joining the board of directors of Glam after the completion of the merger, which we expect to occur in the fourth quarter of 2011.  I’m thrilled to be able to work with Samir and his team at Glam, as well as Jason and his team from Ning, to build an amazing combined company.  Now, I owe some people huge thank you’s.  To Jason, the management team, and all of the wonderful current and former team members at Ning who have worked so hard to get us here, as well as our extremely supportive investors along the way, thank you so much. Working with you over these last several years has been one of the highlights of my life, and I look forward to working with you for years to come.  To Samir and the Glam team, thank you for building Glam into such a great company. I’m excited to pursue the huge combined opportunity with you.  Finally, a very special thank you to Gina, my cofounder and longtime friend and colleague, for all of your insight, innovation, hard work, and commitment going back all the way to the beginning. 
When you recruit an executive, you paint a beautiful picture of her future in your company. You describe in great depth and color how awesome it will be for her to accept your offer and how much better it will be for her than joining that other company. Then one day you realize you must fire her. Reconcile that Ms. CEO.  It turns out that the actual act of firing an executive is relatively easy compared to any other firing. Executives have experience being on the other side of the conversation and tend to be quite professional. Firing an executive correctly is a bit more complicated and extremely important. If you do not learn the right lessons, you will be doing it again soon.  Like so many things, the key to correctly firing an executive is preparation. Here is a four-step process that will treat the executive fairly and improve your company.  Step 1: Root Cause Analysis While it’s possible to fire an executive for bad behavior, incompetence or laziness, those cases are rare and relatively easy.  Unfortunately, unless you have a horrible hiring process, those are probably not the reasons why you got to this point. At this level, almost every company screens for the proper skill set, motivation, and track record. Yes, the reason that you have to fire your head of marketing is not because they suck; it’s because you suck.  In other words, the wrong way to view an executive firing is as an executive failure; the correct way to view an executive firing is as an interview/integration process system failure. Therefore, the first step to properly firing an executive is figuring out why you hired the wrong person for your company.  You may have blown it for a variety of reasons:  You did a poor job defining the position in the first place—If you don’t know what you want, you will be very unlikely to get it. Far too often CEOs hire executives based on an abstract notion of what they think the executive should look and feel like. This often leads to the executive not bringing the key, necessary qualities to the table. You hired for lack of weakness rather than strength—This is especially common when you run a consensus-based hiring process. The group will often find the candidate’s weaknesses, but they won’t place a high enough value on the areas where you need the executive to be world class. As a result, you hire an executive with no sharp weaknesses, but who is mediocre where you need her to be great. If you don’t have world-class strengths where you need them, you won’t be a world-class company. You hired for scale too soon—The most consistently wrong advice that venture capitalists and executive recruiters give CEOs is to hire someone “bigger” than required. “Think about the next 3 to 5 years and how you will be a large company” is how the extremely bad advice usually sounds. It’s great to hire people who can run a large scale organization if you have one. It’s also great to hire people who know how to grow an organization very fast if you are ready to grow your organization very fast. However, if you do not or you are not, then you need someone who can do the job for the next 18 months. If you hire someone who will be great in 18 months, but will be poor for the next 18 months, the company will reject her before she ever gets a chance to show her stuff. Your other employees will wonder: why did we give her all those stock options when she’s not contributing anything? Those kinds of questions are impossible to recover from. It turns out that venture capitalists and executive recruiters are not stupid, they just learned the wrong lessons from previous failures. To learn the right lesson, see the special case of scaling and the special case of fast growth below. You hired for the generic position—There is no such thing as a great CEO, a great head of marketing or a great head of sales. There is only a great head of sales for your company for the next 12-24 months. That position is not the same as the same position at Microsoft or Facebook. Don’t look for the candidate out of central casting. This is not a movie. The executive had the wrong kind of ambition—In a previous post, I described the difference between ambition for the company and ambition for oneself. If an executive has the wrong kind of ambition, then despite her skills, the company may reject her. You failed to integrate the executive—Bringing a new person into your company in an important role is difficult. Other employees will be quick to judge, her expectations may be different than yours, and the job may be largely undefined. Be sure to review and improve your integration plan after you fire an executive. The special case of scaling A fairly common reason for firing an executive is that when the company quadruples in size, the executive no longer does the job effectively at the new size. The reason is that when a company multiplies in size, the management jobs become brand new jobs. As a result, everybody needs to re-qualify for the new job, because the new job and the old job are not the same. Running a 200 person global sales organization is not the same job as running a 25 person local sales team. If you get lucky, the person you hired to run the 25-person team will have learned how to run the 200-person team. If not, you need to hire the right person for the new job. This is neither an executive failure nor a system failure; it is life in the big city. Do not attempt to avoid this phenomenon, as you will only make things worse.  The special case of fast growth If you build a great product and the market wants it, you will find yourself needing to grow your company extremely quickly. Nothing will ensure your success like hiring the right executive who has grown an organization like yours very quickly and successfully before. Note that this is not the same as inheriting a very large organization or working your way up to running a very large organization. Make sure you hire the right kind of fast growth executive. Also, do not hire this person if you are not ready to give them lots of budget to grow their organization; expect them to do what they do. The successful fast growth executive is so important to building successful startups that recruiters and venture capitalists often advise CEOs to bring them in before the company is ready.  Once you identify the problem, then you create the basis for the next steps.  Step 2: Informing the Board Informing the board is tricky and many issues can further complicate the task:  This is the 5th or 6th executive that you had to fire This is the 3rd executive that you fired in this role The candidate was referred by a board member who recommend the exec as a superstar Realize that in any of these cases the board will be at least somewhat alarmed and there is nothing that you can do about that. But keep in mind that your choices are: a) alarm the board or b) enable an ineffective executive to remain in her position. While choice (a) is not great, it’s a heck of a lot better than choice (b). Leaving a failing leader in place will cause an entire department in your company to slowly rot. Let that happen and the board will be more than alarmed.  Your should have three goals with the board:  Get their support and understanding for the difficult task that will you execute—You should start by making sure that they understand the root cause and your plan to remedy the situation. This will give them confidence in your ability to hire and manage outside executives in the future. Get their input and approval for the separation package—This will be critical for the next step. Executive packages are larger than regular severance packages and rightly so. It takes about 10 times longer for an executive to find a new job than an individual contributor. Preserve the reputation of the fired executive—The failure was very likely a team effort and it’s best to portray it that way. You don’t make yourself look good by trashing someone who worked for you. A mature approach to this issue will help keep the board confident in your ability to be CEO. It’s also the fair and decent thing to do. Finally, this turns out to be a piece of news that’s handled better with individual phone calls than in dramatic fashion during a board meeting. It takes a bit longer, but well worth the effort. Individual calls will be particularly important if one of the board members introduced the executive to the company. Once everyone agrees individually, you can finalize the details in a board meeting or call.  Step 3: Preparing for the conversation After you know what went wrong and have informed the board, you should tell the executive as quickly as possible. In preparation for that meeting, I recommend scripting or rehearsing what you plan to say so that you do not accidentally misspeak. The executive will remember the conversation for a very long time, so you need to get it right.  As part of your preparation, you should review any performance reviews or written performance conversations to understand any inconsistencies in your prior communication.  Three keys to getting it right:  Be clear on the reasons—You have thought about this long and hard, don’t equivocate or sugar coat it—you owe it to them to be clear about what you think happened. Use decisive language—Do not leave this open. This is not a performance review; it’s a firing. Use words phrases like “I have decided” rather than “I think.” Have the severance package approved and ready—Once the executive hears the news, she will stop caring about the company and its issues—she will be highly focused on herself and her family. Be ready for this with the package. Finally, the executive will be keenly interested in how the news will be communicated to the company and the outside world. It is best to let her decide. My friend and legendary CEO Bill Campbell once gave me a critical bit of advice when I was preparing to fire an executive. He said: “Ben, you cannot let him keep his job, but you absolutely can let him keep his respect.”  Step 4: Preparing the company communication After you have informed the executive, you must quickly update the company on the change. The correct order for informing the company is 1) the executive’s direct reports—because they will be most impacted 2) the other members of your staff—because they will need to answer questions about it 3) the rest of the company. All of these communications should happen in the same day and preferably within a couple of hours. When disclosing the firing to the direct reports, make sure that you have a plan for who they will report to in the meanwhile and what’s next (executive search, re-organization, internal promotion, or something else). Generally, it’s smart for the CEO to act in the executive role in the meanwhile. If you do act in the role, you must really act—staff meetings, 1:1s, objective setting, etc. Doing so will provide excellent continuity for the team and greatly inform your thinking on whom to hire next.  When you update the company, you might worry about employees misinterpreting the news and thinking the company is in trouble. Do not try to engineer around such a reaction. When you expect your employees to act like adults, they generally do. If you treat them like children, then get ready for your company to turn into one big Barney episode.  In the end Every CEO likes to say she runs a great company. It’s hard to tell whether the claim is true until the company or the CEO has to do something really difficult. Firing an executive is a good test.  
When we meet with entrepreneurs, the two key characteristics that we look for are brilliance and courage. In my experience as CEO, I found that the most important decisions tested my courage far more than my intelligence.  The right decision is often obvious, but the pressure to make the wrong decision can be overwhelming. It starts with small things.  When founders come in to pitch our firm—one as the CEO and the other as President—the conversation often goes like this:  “Who is running the company?” “We are,” they both say. “Who makes the final decision?” “We do.” “How long do you expect to run that way?” “Forever.” “So you’ve decided to make it more difficult for every employee to get work done so that you don’t have to decide who is in charge, is that right?”  That usually results in silence.  Intellectually, it should be clear that it is easier for employees to go to one decision maker than two. It’s not really very complicated at all. Unfortunately, the clear and present social pressure often overwhelms the long-term benefits of organizing the company properly. Because the founders do not have the courage to decide who is in charge, every employee suffers the inconvenience of double approval.  More importantly, decisions only get scarier as a company grows. When we decided to take Loudcloud public with only $2M in revenue, it was not a hard choice intellectually—the alternative was to go bankrupt. It was nonetheless terrifying to do something that most employees, everyone in the press, and many investors thought was nuts.  When making the right choice requires intelligence and courage Sometimes the decision itself is rather complicated which makes the courage challenge even more difficult. CEOs possess a different set of data, knowledge and perspective than anybody else in the company. Frequently, some of the employees and board members are more experienced and more intelligent than the CEO. The only reason the CEO can make a better decision is her superior knowledge.  To make matters worse, when a CEO faces a particularly difficult decision, she may have only a slight preference for one choice over another—say 54% kill a product line, 46% keep it. If the really smart people on the board and on her staff take the other side, her courage will be severely tested. How can she kill the product when she is not even sure if the she is making the right decision and everyone is against her? If she’s wrong, she will have been wrong in the face of advice from her top advisors. If she is right, will anybody even know?  Recently, a large company offered to buy one of our portfolio companies. The deal was lucrative and compelling given the portfolio company’s progress to date and revenue level. The Founder/CEO (I’ll call him Hamlet—not his real name) thought that selling did not make sense due to the giant market opportunity that he was pursuing, but still wanted to make sure that he made the best possible choice for investors and employees. Hamlet wanted to reject the offer, but only marginally. To complicate matters, most of the management team and the board thought the opposite.  It did not help that the board and the management team were far more experienced than Hamlet. As a result, Hamlet spent many sleepless nights worrying about whether or not he was right. To make matters worse, he realized that it was impossible to know whether or not he was right. This did not help his sleep. In the end, Hamlet made the best and most courageous decision that he could and did not sell the company. I believe that will prove to be the defining moment of his career.  Interestingly, as soon as Hamlet made the decision, the entire board and executive team immediately embraced the choice. Why? If they wanted to sell the company enough to advise the CEO to give up his dream, how could they reverse themselves so quickly? It turns out that the most important data point driving their earlier preference for selling the company was Hamlet’s initial ambivalence—the team supported the decision they thought the CEO wanted. Hamlet did not realize this and interpreted their desire to sell to be the result of a thorough analysis. Luckily for everybody involved, he had the courage to make the right decision.  The general problem can be seen in the social credit matrix described below. The expected social rewards for making the crowd-influenced decision appear better than those for making the decision that you think is right:  You are right	You are wrong You decide against the crowd	Few remember that you made the decision, but the company succeeds	Everybody remembers the decision and you are down graded, ostracized or fired You decide with the crowd	Everyone who advised you remembers the decision and the company succeeds	You receive the minimum blame possible for getting it wrong, but the company suffers On the surface, it appears that if the decision is a close call, it’s much safer to go with the crowd. In reality, if you fall into this trap, the crowd will influence your thinking and make a 70/30 decision seem like a 51/49 decision. This is why courage is critical.  Courage, like character, can be developed Every fighter that ever lived had fear. A boy comes to me and tells me that he’s not afraid, if I believed him I’d say he’s a liar or there’s something wrong with him. I’d send him to a doctor to find out what the hell’s the matter with him, because this is not a normal reaction. The fighter that’s gone into the ring and hasn’t experienced fear is either a liar or a psychopath… —Cus D’Amato In all the difficult decisions that I made through the course of running Loudcloud and Opsware, I never once felt brave. In fact, I often felt scared to death. I never lost those feelings, but after much practice, I learned to ignore them. That learning process might also be called the courage development process.  In life, everybody faces choices between doing what’s popular, easy, and wrong vs. doing what’s lonely, difficult, and right. These decisions intensify when you run a company, because the consequences get magnified 1,000 fold. As in life, the excuses for CEO’s making the wrong choice are always plentiful.  Life excuse	CEO excuse Other smart people made the same mistake	It was a close call All my friends wanted to do it	The team was against me and I couldn’t go against the team All the cool kids are doing it	It was industry best practice; I didn’t realize it was illegal It wasn’t perfect, so I decided not to compete	We never achieved total product-market fit, so we never tried to sell our product Every time you make the hard, correct decision you become a bit more courageous and every time you make the easy, wrong decision you become a bit more cowardly.  If you are CEO, these choices will lead to a courageous or cowardly company.  One last thought Over the past 10 years, technological advances dramatically lowered the financial bar for starting a new company, but the courage bar for building a great company remains as high as it has ever been.  
The other day, a friend of mine asked me whether CEOs were born or made. I said, “That’s kind of like asking if Jolly Ranchers are grown or made. CEO is a very unnatural job. ” After saying it and seeing the surprised look on his face, I realized that perhaps it wasn’t as obvious as I’d originally thought. After thinking further, I realized that most people actually assume the opposite—CEOs are born not made. I often listen as other Venture Capitalists and board members rapidly evaluate a founder and conclude that she’s not “CEO material”. I am not sure how they figure these things out so fast. It generally takes years for a founder to develop the CEO skill set and it is usually extremely difficult for me to tell whether or not she will make it. In athletics, some things like becoming a sprinter can be learned relatively quickly because they take a natural motion and refine it. Others, like boxing, take much longer to master, because they require lots of unnatural motions. For example, when going backwards in boxing, it’s critically important to pick up your back foot first, because if you get hit while walking backwards the natural way—picking up your front foot first—often leads to getting knocked cold. Learning to make this unnatural motion feel natural takes a great deal of practice. If you do what feels most natural as a CEO, then you may also get knocked cold. Being CEO requires lots of unnatural motion. From an anthropological standpoint, it is natural to do things that make people like you. It enhances your chances for survival. Yet to be a good CEO, in order to be liked in the long run, you must do many things that will upset people in the short run. Unnatural things. In fact, even the most basic CEO building blocks will feel unnatural at first. If your buddy tells you a funny story, it would feel quite weird to evaluate her performance. It would be totally unnatural to say: “Gee, I thought that story really sucked. It had potential, but you were underwhelming on the build up then you totally flubbed the punch line. I suggest that you go back, rework it and present it to me again tomorrow. ” Doing so would be quite bizarre, but evaluating people’s performances and constantly giving feedback is precisely what a CEO must do. If she doesn’t, then the more complex motions such as writing reviews, taking away territory, handling politics, setting compensation and firing people will be either impossible or handled rather poorly. Giving feedback turns out to be the unnatural atomic building block atop which the unnatural skill set of the management gets built. But how does one master the unnatural?The Shit SandwichA popular and sometimes effective technique for feedback beginners is something that experienced managers call The Shit Sandwich. The technique is marvelously described in the classic management text, The One Minute Manager. The basic idea is that people open up to feedback far more if you start by complimenting them (slice of bread #1), then you give them the difficult message (the shit), then wrap up by reminding them how much you value their strengths (slice of bread #2). The shit sandwich also has the positive side effect of focusing the feedback on the behavior rather than the person, because you establish up front that you really value the person. This is a key concept in giving feedback. The shit sandwich can work well with junior employees, but has the following challenges:It tends to be overly formal. Because you have to preplan and script the sandwich to make it come out correctly, the process can feel formal and judgmental to the employee. After you do it a couple of times, it will lack authenticity. The employee will think: “Oh boy, she’s complimenting me again. I know what’s coming next, the shit. ”More senior executives will recognize the shit sandwich immediately and it will have an instant negative effect. Early in my career, I attempted to deliver a carefully crafted shit sandwich to a senior employee and she looked at me like I was a little kid and said: “Spare me the compliment, Ben, and just tell me what I did wrong. ” At that point, I thought that I was definitely not born to be a CEO. The KeysTo become elite at giving feedback, you must elevate yourself beyond a basic technique like the shit sandwich. You must develop a style that matches your own personality and values. Here are the keys to being effective:Be authentic. It’s extremely important they you believe in the feedback that you give and not say anything to manipulate the recipient’s feelings. You can’t fake the funk. Come from the right place. It’s important that you give people feedback because you want them to succeed and not because you want them to fail. If you really want someone to succeed, then make her feel it. Make her feel you. If she feels you and you are in her corner, then she will listen to you. Don’t get personal. If you decide to fire somebody, fire her. Don’t prepare her to get fired. Prepare her to succeed. If she doesn’t take the feedback, then that’s a different conversation. Don’t clown people in front of their peers. While it’s OK to give certain kinds of feedback in a group setting, you should strive never to embarrass someone in front of their peers. If you do so, then your feedback will have little impact other than to a) cause the employee to be horribly ashamed and b) cause the employee to hate your guts. Feedback is not one size fits all. Everybody is different. Some employees are extremely sensitive to feedback while others have particularly thick skin and often thick skulls. Stylistically, your tone should match the employee’s personality not your mood. Be direct, but not mean. Don’t be obtuse. If you think somebody’s presentation sucks, don’t say: “It’s really good, but could use one more pass to tighten up the conclusion. ” While it may seem harsh, it’s much better to say: “I couldn’t follow it and I didn’t understand your point and here are the reasons why. ” Watered down feedback can be worse than no feedback at all because it’s deceptive and confusing to the recipient. But don’t beat them up or attempt to show your superiority. Doing so will defeat your purpose because when done properly feedback is dialogue, not a monologue. Feedback is a dialogue, not a monologueYou may be the CEO and you may be telling somebody about something that you don’t like or disagree with, but that doesn’t mean that you’re right. Your employee should know more about her function than you. She should have more data than you. You may be wrong. As a result, your goal should be for your feedback to open up rather than close down discussion. Encourage people to challenge your judgment and argue the point to conclusion. Culturally, you want super high standards thoroughly discussed. You want to apply tremendous pressure to get the highest quality thinking, yet be open enough to find out when you are wrong. High frequency feedbackOnce you’ve mastered the keys, you should practice what you’ve mastered all the time. As CEO, you should have an opinion on absolutely everything. You should have an opinion on every forecast, every product plan, every presentation and even every comment. Let people know what you think. If you like someone’s comment, give her the feedback. If you disagree, give her the feedback. Say what you think. Express yourself. This will have two critically important positive effects:Feedback won’t be personal in your company. If the CEO constantly gives feedback, then everyone she interacts with will just get used to it. Nobody will think: “Gee, what did she really mean by that comment? Does she not like me?” Everybody will naturally focus on the issues, not an implicit random performance evaluation. People will become comfortable discussing bad news. If people get comfortable talking about what each other are doing wrong, then it will be very easy to talk about what the company is doing wrong. High quality company cultures get their cue from data networking routing protocols: bad news travels fast and good news travels slowly. Low quality company cultures take on the personality of the Wicked Witch of the East in The Wiz: “Don’t nobody bring me no bad news. ”Making the CEOBeing CEO requires also a broad set of more advanced skills—I’ve written about many in this blog—but the key to reaching the advanced level and feeling like you were born to be CEO is mastering the unnatural. If you are a founder CEO and you feel awkward or incompetent when doing some of these things and believe there is no way that you’ll be able to do it when your company is 100 or 1,000 people, welcome to the club. That’s exactly how I felt.  So did every CEO that I’ve ever met. This is the process. This is how you get made.
After I wrote A Good Place to Work, people flooded me with feedback about one-on-ones. About half the responders chastised me, saying that one-on-ones were useless and that I shouldn’t put so much emphasis on them. The other half wanted to know how to run more effective one-on-ones. It seems to me that both groups are likely talking about two sides of the same coin.  Perhaps the CEO’s most important operational responsibility is designing and implementing the communication architecture for her company. The architecture might include the organizational design, meetings, processes, email, yammer and even one-on-one meetings with managers and employees. Absent a well-designed communication architecture, information and ideas will stagnate and your company will degenerate into a bad place to work. While it is quite possible to design a great communication architecture without one-on-one meetings, in most cases one-on-ones provide an excellent mechanism for information and ideas to flow up the organization and should be part of your design.  Generally, people who think one-on-one meetings are a bad idea have been victims of poorly designed one-on-one meetings. The key to a good one-on-one meeting is the understanding that it is the employee’s meeting rather than the manager’s meeting. This is the free-form meeting for all the pressing issues, brilliant ideas and chronic frustrations that do not fit neatly into status reports, email and other less personal and intimate mechanisms.  If you are an employee, how do you get feedback from your manager on an exciting, but only 20% formed idea that you’re not sure is relevant without sounding like a fool? How do you point out that a colleague that you do not know how to work with is blocking your progress without throwing her under the bus? How do you get help when you love your job, but your personal life is melting down? Through a status report? On email? Yammer? Asana? Really? For these and other important areas of discussions, one-on-ones can be essential.  If you like structured agendas, then the employee should set the agenda. A good practice is to have the employee send you the agenda in advance. This will give her a chance to cancel the meeting if nothing is pressing. It also makes clear that it is her meeting and will take as much or as little time as she needs. During the meeting, since it’s the employee’s meeting, the manager should do 10% of the talking and 90% of the listening. Note that this is the opposite of most one-on-ones.  While it’s not the manager’s job to set the agenda or do the talking, the manager should try to draw the key issues out of the employee. The more introverted the employee, the more important this becomes. If you manage engineers, drawing out issues will be an important skill to master.  Some questions that I’ve found to be very effective in one-on-ones:  If we could improve in any way, how would we do it? What’s the No. 1 problem with our organization? Why? What’s not fun about working here? Who is really kicking ass in the company? Who do you admire? If you were me, what changes would you make? What don’t you like about the product? What’s the biggest opportunity that we’re missing out on? What are we not doing that we should be doing? Are you happy working here? In the end, the most important thing is that the best ideas, the biggest problems and the most intense employee life issues make their way to the people that can deal with them. One-on-ones are a time-tested way to do that, but if you have a better one, go ahead with your bad self.
At Opsware I used to teach a management expectations course because I deeply believed in training. In it, I made it clear that I expected every manager to meet with her people on a regular basis. I even gave instructions on how to conduct a 1:1 meeting so there could be no excuses.  Then one day while I happily went about my job, it came to my attention that one of my managers hadn’t had a 1:1 with any of his employees in over six months. While I knew to “expect what I inspect,” I did not expect this. No 1:1 in over six months? How was it possible for me to invest so much time thinking about management, preparing materials and personally training my managers and then get no 1:1s for six months? Wow, so much for CEO authority. If that’s how the managers listen to me, then why do I even bother coming to work?  I thought that leading by example would be the sure way to get the company to do what I wanted. Lord knows the company picked up all of my bad habits, so why didn’t they pick up my good habits? Had I lost the team? I recalled a conversation I’d had with my father many years ago regarding Tommy Heinsohn, the Boston Celtics basketball coach at the time. Heinsohn had been one of the most successful coaches in the world, including being named “coach of the year” and winning two NBA championships. However, he had gone downhill fast and now had the worst record in the league. I asked my father what happened. He said: “The players stopped paying attention to his temper tantrums. Heinsohn used to yell at the team and they’d respond. Now they just ignore him.” Was the team now ignoring me? Had I yelled at them one time too many?  The more that I thought about it, the more I realized that while I had told the team “what” to do, I had not been clear about “why” I wanted them to do it. Clearly, my authority alone was not enough to get them to do what I wanted. Given the large number of things that we were trying to accomplish, managers couldn’t get to everything and came up with their own priorities. Apparently, this manager didn’t think that meeting with his people was all that important and I hadn’t explained to him why it was so important.  So why did I force every manager through management training? Why did I demand that managers have 1:1s with employees? After much deliberation with myself, I settled on an articulation of the core reason and I called up the offending manager’s boss—I’ll call him Steve—and I told him that I needed to see him right away.  When Steve came into my office I asked him a question: “Steve, do you know why I came to work today?” Steve: “What do you mean, Ben?” Me: “Why did I bother waking up? Why did I bother coming in? If it was about the money, couldn’t I sell the company tomorrow and have more money than I ever wanted? I don’t want to be famous, in fact just the opposite. ” Steve: “I guess.” Me: “Well, then why did I come to work.” Steve: “I don’t know.” Me: “Well, let me explain. I came to work, because it’s personally very important to me that Opsware be a good company. It’s important to me that the people who spend 12 to 16 hours/day here, which is most of their waking life, have a good life.  It’s why I come to work.” Steve: “OK.” Me: “Do you know the difference between a good place to work and a bad place to work?” Steve: “Umm, I think so.” Me: “What is the difference?” Steve: “Umm, well…” Me: “Let me break it down for you. In good organizations, people can focus on their work and have confidence that if they get their work done, good things will happen for both the company and them personally. It is a true pleasure to work in an organization such as this. Every person can wake up knowing that the work they do will be efficient, effective and make a difference both for the organization and themselves. These things make their jobs both motivating and fulfilling. “In a poor organization, on the other hand, people spend much of their time fighting organizational boundaries, infighting and broken processes. They are not even clear on what their jobs are, so there is no way to know if they are getting the job done or not. In the miracle case that they work ridiculous hours and get the job done, they have no idea what it means for the company or their careers. To make it all much worse and rub salt in the wound, when they finally work up the courage to tell management how fucked up their situation is, management denies there is a problem, then defends the status quo, then ignores the problem.” Steve: “OK.” Me: “Are you aware that your manager Tim has not met with any of his employees in the past six months?” Steve: “No.” Me: “Now that you are aware, do you realize that there is no possible way for him to even be informed as to whether or not his organization is good or bad?” Steve: “Yes.” Me: “In summary, you and Tim are preventing me from achieving my one and only goal. You have become a barrier blocking me from achieving my most important goal.  As a result, if Tim doesn’t meet with each one of his employees in the next 24 hours, I will have no choice but to fire him and to fire you. Are we clear?” Steve: “Crystal.” Was that really necessary? You might argue that no matter how well managed a company is, it will fail without product/market fit. You might argue further that horribly managed companies that achieve massive product/market fit succeed just fine. And you would be right on both accounts. So was it really necessary for me to make such a dramatic speech and threaten one of my executives?  I think it was for the following three reasons:  Being a good company doesn’t matter when things go well, but it can be the difference between life and death when things go wrong. Things always go wrong. Being a good company is itself an end. The difference between life and death When things go well, the reasons to stay at company are many:  Your career path is wide open because as the company grows lots of interesting jobs naturally open up. Your friends and family think you are a genius for choosing to work at the “it” company before anyone else knew it was “it”. Your resume gets stronger by working at a blue chip company in its heyday. Oh, and, you are getting rich. When things go poorly, all those reasons become reasons to leave. In fact, the only thing that keeps an employee at a company when things go horribly wrong—other than needing a job, which isn’t so applicable in the current macro environment—is that she likes her job.  Things always go wrong There has never been a company in the history of the world that had a monotonically increasing stock price. In bad companies, when the economics disappear, so do the employees. In technology companies, when the employees disappear, the spiral begins: the company declines in value, the best employees leave, the company declines in value, the best employees leave. Spirals are extremely difficult to reverse.  Being a good company is an end itself When I first met my friend Bill Campbell, he was chairman of Intuit, on the board of Apple and a mentor to many of the top CEOs in the industry, including Steve Jobs and Jeff Bezos. However, those things did not impress me nearly as much as his time running a company called GO Corporation. GO essentially attempted to build an iPhone in 1992. The company raised more money than almost any other venture capital back startup in history and lost nearly all of it before selling itself for nearly nothing to AT&T in 1994.  Now that probably doesn’t sound impressive. In fact, it probably sounds like a horrible failure. But I’d met tens of GO employees in my career, including great people like Mike Homer, Danny Shader, Frank Chen and Stratton Sclavous, and the amazing thing was that every GO employee that I’d ever met counted GO as one of the greatest work experiences of their lives. The best work experience ever despite the fact that their careers stood still, they made no money and they were front-page failures. GO was a good place to work.  This made me realize what an amazingly effective CEO Bill was. Apparently, John Doerr thought that too, because when Scott Cook needed a CEO for Intuit, John recommended Bill even though Bill lost a ton of John’s money at GO. And for years, everyone who ever came into contact with GO employees knew what Bill was about. He was about building good companies.  If you do nothing else, be like Bill and build a good company.
Six months ago, I wrote a blog post called “The Future of Networking” about Nicira Inc., a company that I said would turn the data networking market upside down. Today, VMware arrived at the same conclusion and acquired Nicira for $1.26B in cash.  Since Nicira only recently shipped its first production ready systems, this acquisition may stun observers. However, those who fully understand the depth of Nicira’s technology and the implications of the combination of Nicira and VMware will recognize the brilliance of VMware’s move.  In one bold step, VMware moves from a footnote in the networking market to the clear technology leader in Software Defined Networking and more specifically—and importantly—Cloud Networking. By combining Nicira’s technology with VMware’s market-leading server virtualization and cloud products, VMware today creates a clear path to becoming the most important infrastructure company across servers, networks and storage for the next 10 years.  As current networking architectures migrate to cloud architectures, VMware has the opportunity to eat a good portion of the $37B data networking market. In that light, $1.26B is a great price.  Nonetheless, since VMware acquired primarily a product and a team—as opposed to a fully developed company and a large, cash-generating business—it’s useful to understand how a new company built such a valuable product and team.  Like many successful technology companies, Nicira started with a brilliant engineer who had the right experience to see the future more clearly than anyone else. Unlike consumer startups, where engineers tend to be their own first and best customers, most data networking engineers have never run large-scale networks. As a result, they never develop a clear picture of the real operational challenges of running a network. Most people who run large-scale networks, on the other hand, don’t have the product creation skills to solve those same problems.  Enter Martin Casado, the one man who had both the knowledge and the skill required to solve problems that vexed the networking world for three decades.  Because Martin began his career running large-scale, highly secure networks, he had the knowledge. He then took that knowledge to Stanford, where he developed the skill, working with legendary networking computer science professors Nick Mckeown and Scott Shenker.  But to build the next generation data networking company, he had to replace 30 years of functionality and needed to build a phenomenal team to do so. Martin recruited networking veteran Steve Mullaney as CEO, and together they assembled an all-star crew of the very best engineers in the business. That team brought to market a product that is so far ahead of the competition and clearly the future of data networking that VMware had to have it—and was smart enough to seize it.  In the future, all computing, networking and storage infrastructure will be infinitely elastic, totally reliable and perfectly flexible. VMware just took a giant step towards bringing the future forward.  I am grateful to have been part of the Nicira team and story. I look forward to seeing what happens next.
Every entrepreneur starts her company with a clear vision for success. You will create an amazing environment and hire the smartest people to join you. Together you will build a beautiful product that delights customers and makes the world just a little bit better. It’s going to be absolutely awesome.  Then, after working night and day to make your vision reality, you wake up to find that things did not go as planned. Your company did not unfold like the Jack Dorsey keynote that you listened to when you started. Your product has issues that will be very hard to fix. The market isn’t quite where it was supposed to be. Your employees are losing confidence and some of them have quit. Some of the ones that quit were quite smart and have the remaining ones wondering if staying makes sense. You are running low on cash and your venture capitalist tells you that it will be difficult to raise money given the impending European catastrophe. You lose a competitive battle. You lose a loyal customer. You lose a great employee. The walls start closing in. Where did you go wrong? Why didn’t your company perform as envisioned? Are you good enough to do this? As your dreams turn into nightmares, you find yourself in The Struggle.  About The Struggle Life is struggle. —Karl Marx The Struggle is when you wonder why you started the company in the first place.  The Struggle is when people ask you why you don’t quit and you don’t know the answer.  The Struggle is when your employees think you are lying and you think they may be right.  The Struggle is when food loses its taste.  The Struggle is when you don’t believe you should be CEO of your company. The Struggle is when you know that you are in over your head and you know that you cannot be replaced. The Struggle is when everybody thinks you are an idiot, but nobody will fire you. The Struggle is where self-doubt becomes self-hatred.  The Struggle is when you are having a conversation with someone and you can’t hear a word that they are saying because all you can hear is The Struggle.  The Struggle is when you want the pain to stop. The Struggle is unhappiness.  The Struggle is when you go on vacation to feel better and you feel worse.  The Struggle is when you are surrounded by people and you are all alone. The Struggle has no mercy.  The Struggle is the land of broken promises and crushed dreams. The Struggle is a cold sweat. The Struggle is where your guts boil so much that you feel like you are going to spit blood.  The Struggle is not failure, but it causes failure. Especially if you are weak. Always if you are weak.  Most people are not strong enough.  Every great entrepreneur from Steve Jobs to Mark Zuckerberg went through The Struggle and struggle they did, so you are not alone. But that does not mean that you will make it. You may not make it. That is why it is The Struggle.  The Struggle is where greatness comes from.  Some stuff that may or may not help There is no answer to The Struggle, but here are some things that helped me:  Don’t put it all on your shoulders – It is easy to think that the things that bother you will upset your people more. That’s not true. The opposite is true. Nobody takes the losses harder than the person most responsible. Nobody feels it more than you. You won’t be able to share every burden, but share every burden that you can. Get the maximum number of brains on the problems even if the problems represent existential threats. When I ran Opsware and we were losing too many competitive deals, I called an all-hands and told the whole company that we were getting our asses kicked, and if we didn’t stop the bleeding, we were going to die. Nobody blinked. The team rallied, built a winning product and saved my sorry ass. This is not checkers; this is mutherfuckin’ chess – Technology businesses tend to be extremely complex. The underlying technology moves, the competition moves, the market moves, the people move. As a result, like playing three-dimensional chess on Star Trek, there is always a move. You think you have no moves? How about taking your company public with $2M in trailing revenue and 340 employees, with a plan to do $75M in revenue the next year? I made that move. I made it in 2001, widely regarded as the worst time ever for a technology company to go public. I made it with six weeks of cash left. There is always a move. Focus on the road – When they teach you how to drive a racecar, they tell you to focus on the road when you go around a turn. They tell you that because if you focus on the wall, then you will drive straight into the wall. If you focus on how you might fail, then you will fail. Even if you only have one bullet left in the gun and you have to hit the target, focus on the target. You might not hit it, but you definitely won’t hit if you focus on other things. Play long enough and you might get lucky – In the technology game, tomorrow looks nothing like today. If you survive long enough to see tomorrow, it may bring you the answer that seems so impossible today. Don’t take it personally – The predicament that you are in is probably all your fault. You hired the people. You made the decisions. But you knew the job was dangerous when you took it. Everybody makes mistakes. Every CEO makes thousands of mistakes. Evaluating yourself and giving yourself an “F” doesn’t help. Remember that this is what separates the women from the girls. If you want to be great, this is the challenge. If you don’t want to be great, then you never should have started a company. The end When you are in The Struggle, nothing is easy and nothing feels right. You have dropped into the abyss and you may never get out. In my own experience, but for some unexpected luck and help, I would have been lost.  So to all of you in it, may you find strength and may you find peace.  
Conventional wisdom among smart technology entrepreneurs says not to hire people with Masters in Business Administration (MBAs) into startups. Aaron Patzer, founder of Mint, expressed the sentiment well when he said: “When valuing a startup, add $500k for every engineer, and subtract $250k for every MBA.” My friend Peter Thiel once warned a young entrepreneur: “Never ever hire an MBA; they will ruin your company.” I chimed in myself with this Quora answer. At Andreessen Horowitz, we believe that once everyone thinks that something is true, that might be a good time to do the opposite. So, with everyone convinced that MBAs are useless, I wonder: Is now the time to hire MBAs?  When considering this question, the first thing to understand is that MBAs have not always been the scourge of startup society. When I began my career in the late 80s and early 90s, MBAs ran most of the best new technology companies. Scott McNealy and Ed McCracken, Stanford MBAs, ran the two best new computer companies, Sun and Silicon Graphics, respectively. John Morgridge, Stanford MBA, ran Cisco, the best new networking company. Bill Campbell, Columbia MBA, ran a hot new consumer software company, Intuit, and Dave Duffield, Cornell MBA, ran the premier new enterprise software company, PeopleSoft.  So, what happened? How did startup world grow to loathe MBAs?  It turns out that the success of the MBAs from the late 80s and early 90s created an insatiable demand from startup companies and their backers to hire MBAs from top schools. With only a small number of top schools, the newly minted MBAs became the belles of the of the startup ball. Every Stanford and Harvard MBA received multiple offers from top startups and, not surprisingly, many MBAs developed a strong sense of entitlement and overconfidence.  They began to stroll into startups with insane lists of demands. They wanted lofty titles, they wanted to manage hundreds of people even though they had no management experience, and they wanted salaries that matched people with 10 years more experience. And the MBAs got what they wanted, which ironically precipitated the MBA’s long and painful fall from the penthouse to the outhouse.  It turns out, as I pointed out in my Quora post, you can’t learn management exclusively from a class or a book. It takes real world practice. Many of the MBAs who got the big management positions turned out to be some of the worst managers that Silicon Valley has ever seen. While understandable given their total lack of experience, the people assigned to work for them did not understand. When these employees asked themselves how such incompetent imbeciles could acquire such important jobs, all evidence pointed back to an all too familiar culprit: The miserable, sorry, weak manager that you suffer under got his position not by merit, but by MBA.  To make matters worse, the entitlement bug spread through the MBA community like a social game with full access to the Facebook feed controls. It got so bad that at one point an MBA employee of mine asked for a promotion because most of his classmates at Stanford had been promoted and he felt left out. Had I been a more experienced CEO, I would have fired him on the spot. Being young and naïve, I simply replied: “I’m sorry. You must have me confused with somebody who gives a crap.” In any case, the episode did not make me want to hire more MBAs.  Perhaps worst of all, many MBAs carried intense ambition for themselves, but no strong bond to the company’s mission. While everyone else in the company was “ride or die,” these MBAs could be seen carefully plotting their next career move. When you’re working 16 hours/day with a team of dedicated people driven towards achieving a nearly impossible goal, this does not sit well.  Finally, the MBA schools of the late 90s and early 2000s did a relatively poor job of preparing people for startups. MBAs learned how to analyze existing markets, but knew nothing about creating new markets. In general, the MBA education was geared towards attaining positions in large, established companies rather than new entrepreneurial ventures.  At this point, it’s probably not difficult to understand why MBAs carry little credibility in startup world. So why am I even asking the question? I think we have thrown the babies out with the bathwater. More specifically, we’ve thrown the outstanding talent out with the bad behavior of an old, irrelevant sub group. Broad categorizations usually tend to be a bad idea when it comes to people and in this case, the trends that led to the negative characterization have reversed. In my observation, there are four key reasons to consider hiring today’s MBAs.  The world largely beat the arrogance, overconfidence and sense of entitlement out of the current crop of MBAs. Most now exhibit a level of humility and willingness to learn that was unheard of 10 years ago. The course material has become much more relevant. Innovative instructors like Tom Eisenmann and Alison Wagonfeld at Harvard explore the challenges of scaling new companies. Mark Leslie and Andy Rachleff at Stanford teach key lessons in building enterprise sales channels. Bob Sutton and Huggy Rao at Stanford teach novel approaches to incentives. Today’s MBAs bring some interesting knowledge and relevant skills to the table. This is in stark contrast to the old curriculum, which focused on big company problems. The kids are still smart. Even in the late 90s and early 2000s, you had to be extremely smart and ambitious to get into the Stanford or Harvard MBA programs. That’s still true today. A different perspective can be helpful. Engineers run most technology startups and that’s great. But it is important to recognize that engineers tend to look at the world from the product out. Having a few people in the company who see the world from the market in can be enlightening. In the public equities market, everyone knows to buy low and sell high. However, the momentum of the day usually overwhelms that obvious strategy. In practice, public market investors pile into stocks as they become overvalued and abandon high quality companies at the first sign of trouble. Similarly, when it comes to hiring MBAs, technology companies have historically bought high and sold low. The current price is low.
When I started Loudcloud, I hired the best people that I knew—people whom I respected, trusted and liked. Like me, many of them did not have deep experience in the jobs that I gave them, but they worked night and day to make it work and they made great contributions to the company. Yet for many of them, there came a day when it was clear that I needed to hire someone with more experience to run the function I had previously entrusted to my loyal friend. Damn. How do you do that?  Should you do it at all? The first question that always comes to mind is: “Do I really need to do this?” Who could I possibly hire who will work this hard and bleed the company colors like this?” Sadly, if you’re asking the question, you very likely already know the answer. If you need to build a worldwide sales organization, your buddy who did the first few deals is almost certainly not the best choice. As hard as it may be, you need to take a Confucian approach. You must consider first all of the other employees and second your friend. The good of the individual must be sacrificed for the good of the whole.  How do you break the news? Once you make the decision, breaking the news will not be easy. It’s important to consider two deep emotions that the employee will feel:  Embarrassment – Do not underestimate what a large factor this will be in his thinking. All of his friends, relatives and colleagues know his current position. They know how hard he’s worked and how much he’s sacrificed for the company. How will he possibly explain to them that he will no longer be part of the executive team? Betrayal – I’ve been there from the beginning, I’ve worked side by side with you. How could you do this? It’s not like you’re perfect in your job either? How can you be so comfortable selling me out? Those are some powerful emotions, so get ready for an intense discussion. Ironically, the key to an emotional discussion is to take the emotion out of it. To do that, you must be very clear in your mind what you’ve decided and what you want to do.  The most important thing to decide is that you really want to do this. If you walk into a demotion discussion with an open decision, you will walk out with a mess: a mess of a situation and a mess of a relationship. As part of that decision, you need to be OK with the employee quitting the company. Given the intense emotions he will feel, there is no guarantee that he will want to stay. If you cannot afford to lose him, you cannot make this change.  Finally, you must decide the best role for him in your company. The obvious thing is to have him continue under his new boss, but this may not be the best thing for him, his boss, or his career. Your loyal employee will continue to have lots of knowledge about your company, competition, customers, and market that his new boss lacks. On the one hand, this can be a good thing—he can help get the new boss up to speed. On the other hand, when mixed with the intense emotions of embarrassment and betrayal, you might end up with a sabotage cocktail.  Another problem with this approach is that there is no way to paint him reporting to his old boss as anything but a demotion from a career path perspective. An alternative, if appropriate, would be to move him to another area of the company where his skills, talent, and knowledge will help. This kind of move will give him a chance to develop a new set of skills and help the company while he’s doing it. For young employees, getting experience in different areas can be super valuable.  Sadly, this is not a silver bullet since he might not want to work in another job; he might be hell bent on keeping his current job, so prepare for that as well.  Once you’ve decided to hire someone above your friend and decided on the alternatives that you’d like to offer him, you can have the conversation. Keep in mind that you cannot let him keep his job, but you can be fair and you can be honest. Some keys to doing that:  Use appropriate language – Make clear with your language that you’ve decided. In fact, use phrases like “I have decided” rather than “I think” or “I’d like.” By doing this, you will avoid putting the employee in the awkward position of wondering whether or not he should lobby for his old job. You can’t tell him what he wants to hear, but you can be honest. Admit reality – If you are a founder/CEO like I was, it probably won’t be lost on the employee that you are just as under-skilled for your job as he is for his. Don’t dodge this fact. In fact, it’s fine to admit that if you were a more experienced CEO, you might be able to develop him into the role, but two people who don’t know what they are doing is a recipe for failure. Acknowledge the contributions – If you want him to stay in the company, you should say that and make it crystal clear that you want to help him develop in his career and contribute to the company. Let him know that you appreciate what he’s done and that your decision is a result of what’s next more than what’s previous. The best way to do this, if appropriate, is to couple the demotion with an increase in compensation. Doing so will let him know that he’s both appreciated and valued going forward. Through all of this, keep in mind that it is what is and nothing you can say will change that or stop it from being deeply upsetting. Your goal should not be to take the sting out of it, but to be honest, clear, and effective. Your friend may not appreciate that in the moment, but he will appreciate it over time.
 2Two years ago we invested $250,000 in Instagram. Thanks to the spectacular vision and effort of Kevin Systrom and the Instagram team, the investment will be worth $78,000,000 when the Faceboook acquisition closes. The work that Kevin and team did will go down as legend in the industry and we thank them immensely. We also thank our co-investors Steve Anderson of Baseline and Matt Cohler of Benchmark.  Despite Instagram’s awesome performance and our monstrous return, a number of articles have come out criticizing us for not making even more money on our investment. Ordinarily, when someone criticizes me for only making 312 times my money, I let the logic of their statement speak for itself. However, in this case, the narrative that some critics put forth has the nasty side effect of casting two outstanding entrepreneurs—Kevin and Dalton Caldwell—in an unfair light and glosses over an important ethical issue that we faced. As a result, I will clarify what happened and why we didn’t make even more money.  When we invested in Instagram, it wasn’t actually Instagram. It was a company called Burbn, and the idea was roughly to build a mobile micro blogging service. Technologically, it was also different: an HTML 5 application rather than a native app. As Kevin iterated on Burbn, we made another investment in an excellent entrepreneur, Dalton Caldwell. Dalton’s company, Mixed Media Labs, initially built a product called PicPlz. PicPlz aimed to be a mobile photo sharing service built on its own social graph. Furthermore, the graph would be public like Twitter rather than private like Facebook.  Subsequently, Kevin noticed that while Burbn wasn’t taking off, the photo-sharing component of it was doing quite well. As a result, he pivoted Burbn into Instagram, which then competed directly with PicPlz. It’s important to note that Kevin did not steal Dalton’s idea—Kevin came to it organically based on the Burbn data.  Still, we needed to make a decision. Should we fund the venture round of PicPlz, Instagram, both or neither? We loved both entrepreneurs, but they were building the exact same product. Since we were less than a year old ourselves at the time, this kind of conflict—which happens frequently in the venture capital business as companies evolve—was brand new to us.  Here’s how it looked then:  We liked both entrepreneurs very much, so there was no issue there—we would gladly back either. Instagram’s numbers were much better at the time as it had already begun its rocket run. From the perspective of the entrepreneurs, we’d invested in Dalton when he planned to build a photo sharing service, but we’d invested in a different initial product from Kevin. After speaking with both entrepreneurs and much internal discussion, we concluded that funding Kevin to compete with Dalton would be a violation of the original implicit commitment we made to Dalton—to not fund competitors to PicPlz. On the other hand, funding Dalton did not violate our implicit agreement with Kevin because he changed his business—we’d funded Burbn not Instagram.  So our choices were: a) invest in Dalton b) invest in neither or c) invest in Kevin and violate our commitment to Dalton. As soon as we fully recognized those were the choices, we ruled out option c and elected option a.  However, we still had a problem: because we had invested in Kevin’s seed round, we had both information rights and pro rata rights to the series B. These are important and valuable rights, but it seemed completely unethical to us to exercise them since we funded a competitor. As a result, we unilaterally and without compensation or consideration gave Kevin back those rights and did not invest further in Instagram.  And that’s the thing that we did that many writers think was really stupid. Despite that, if we had to do it again, we would.  As an epilogue, Dalton later pivoted out of PicPlz and is now building an exciting new service called App.Net.  I’d like to make two things absolutely clear that some writers, in their zeal to find something wrong with our investment, have gotten completely wrong:  Kevin absolutely did not steal Dalton’s idea. He pivoted to Instagram because that’s where his users were—period, end of story. We are excited and enthusiastic investors in Dalton’s company. Several reporters implied that we regret funding Dalton, because he did not sell his company to Facebook for $1 billion after two years. News to world: it generally takes longer than two years to create a billion dollars in value. What Kevin and team did was special and unique. We expect great things from Dalton and look forward to another massive return from his new idea. So, write what you will about us, but please get that right.
 In it, Jim Gilliam gives us a short tour of his life’s story. I encourage you to watch the entire mind-blowing twelve minutes. In it, Jim tells the story of how after contracting life-threatening cancer, he went from following a popular movement—Jerry Falwell-branded fundamentalist Christianity—to creating two of his own. First, following the tragedy of September 11, 2001, Jim became an activist for a better America and produced a series of compelling documentary films to further his cause. In order to promote these films, Jim developed a series of techniques using the Internet to basically create a movement—i.e. to organize a group of people to do something. In this case, learn from his films and strive to improve the country. Later, we find that the cancer treatment that Jim received earlier in the story burned out his lungs requiring that he receive a double lung transplant or die. Finding a donor for two healthy lungs and a doctor willing to perform the insanely risky surgery is the mother of all long shots, so Jim had to start a new movement to get new lungs. Organizing people to save his own life profoundly impacted Jim’s view of how he should spend the rest of it. So much so that his personal domain is called 3dna.us to represent the 3 different DNAs that combine to keep him alive, a constant reminder that he cannot do it alone.  After recovering from the operation, Jim had a defining revelation. He realized that everything good comes from people working together to accomplish something important and, furthermore, that the Internet would be the great enabler of the most important endeavors. Unfortunately, harnessing the power of the Internet to start a movement turned out to be extremely complex. Nobody knew this better than Jim because he had to coordinate everything from email to social networking to blogging to rally people to his own cause. Being a world-class inventor and entrepreneur, he felt that it was up to him to step up and solve the problem. Furthermore, he believed that a company was probably the best vehicle to do it.  So Jim created a company to develop software to organize communities and get results and he called it NationBuilder. By the time NationBuilder was ready to raise money, Jim’s software implementation of his vision became ultra compelling. So much so that my friend Joe Green, who had an important history of organizing groups of people through his work as founder/CEO of causes, was so impressed that he joined NationBuilder as its president.  The product’s initial results were as impressive as the vision. Before getting to 10 employees, NationBuilder had over 300 paying customers. More importantly, the customers kept getting stunning results. Alex Torpey, a twenty-four-year-old with a breakthrough vision for using technology to improve government, ran for mayor of South Orange, New Jersey and defeated the far older incumbent. Alex is now the youngest mayor in the history of New Jersey. And he ran with no party affiliation.  But it was not really the early results that compelled me to invest in NationBuilder and go on the board; it was Jim’s vision that people connected and focused on a goal create everything great in the world. As he described the vision, I thought of every musician that needed to organize her fans, every author that needed to reach readers, every pastor that needed to encourage his members, and every person who wanted to make a difference, but didn’t know how. And then I thought of Jim’s personal story and I was in.
 When a company starts to lose its major battles, the truth often becomes the first casualty. CEOs and employees work tirelessly to develop creative narratives that help them avoid dealing with the obvious facts. Despite their intense creativity, many companies often end up with the exact same false explanations.  Some familiar lies “She left, but we were going to fire her, or give her a bad performance review” – High tech companies tend to track employee attrition in three categories:  People who quit People who got fired People who quit, but it’s OK because the company didn’t want them anyway Fascinatingly, as companies begin to struggle, the third category always seems to grow much faster than the first. In addition, the sudden wave of “semi-performance-related attrition” usually happens in companies that claim to have a “super high talent bar”. How do all these superstar employees suddenly go from great to crap? How is it possible that when you lose a top-rated employee before you can say “unwanted attrition”, the manager carefully explains how her performance fell off?   “We would have won, but the other guys gave the deal away” – “The customer selected us technically and thinks we are the better company, but our competitor just gave the product away. We would never sell so cheaply as it would hurt our reputation.” Anybody who has ever run an enterprise sales force has heard this lie before. You go into an account, you fight hard, and you lose. The Sales Rep, not wanting to shine the light on himself blames the “used car dealer” Rep from the other company. The CEO, not wanting to believe that she’s losing product competitiveness, believes the Rep. If you hear this lie, try to validate this claim with the actual customer. I’ll bet you can’t.  “Just because we missed the intermediate milestones doesn’t mean we won’t hit our product schedule” – In engineering meetings where there is great pressure to ship on time—a customer commitment, a quarter that depends on it, or a competitive imperative—everybody hopes for good news. When the facts don’t align with the good news, a clever manager will find the narrative to make everybody feel better—until the next meeting.  “We have a very high churn rate, but as soon as we turn on email marketing to our user base, people will come back” – Yes, of course. The reason that people leave our service and don’t come back is that we have not been sending them enough spam. That makes total sense to me, too.  Where do lies come from? To answer that question, I thought back to a conversation that I had years ago with the incomparable Andy Grove.  Back at the tail end of the Great Internet Bubble in 2001, as all the big technology companies began missing their quarters by giant amounts, I found myself wondering how none of them saw it coming. One would think after the great dot-com crash of April 2000, companies like Cisco, Siebel, and HP would realize that they would soon face a slowdown as many of their customers hit the wall, but despite perhaps the most massive and public early warning system of all time, each CEO reiterated strong guidance right up until the point where they dramatically whiffed their quarters.  I asked Andy why these great CEOs would lie about their impending fate.  He said they were not lying to investors, but rather, they were lying to themselves.  Andy explained that humans, particularly those who build things, only listen to leading indicators of good news. For example, if a CEO hears that engagement for her application increased an incremental 25% beyond the normal growth rate one month, she will be off to the races hiring more engineers to keep up with the impending tidal wave of demand. On the other hand, if engagement decreases 25%, she will be equally intense and urgent in explaining it away: “The site was slow that month, there were 4 holidays, we made a UI change that caused all the problems. For gosh sakes, let’s not panic!”  Both leading indicators may have been wrong, or both may have been right, but our hypothetical CEO—like almost every other CEO—only took action on the positive indicator and only looked for alternative explanations on the negative leading indicator.  So if you read this and it all sounds too familiar and you find yourself wondering why your honest employees are lying to you, the answer is they are not. They are lying to themselves.  And if you believe them, you are lying to yourself.
Major technology platforms tend to last about 25 to 30 years. This gives them time to gather sufficient developer momentum, enable a set of transformational ideas, build those ideas, and form a large industry around it. The platforms then sustain for an additional 5-10 years due to inertia and lock-in. Finally, when the shortcomings of the old platform become too much to bear — ­as with the Mainframe, Hierarchical Databases, and more recently the PC — a new platform emerges to take the old platform’s place and bring the future forward.  When I was a young man in 1990, I designed and deployed Silicon Graphics’ first wide area network using technology from a little known networking startup called Cisco Systems. The technologies and techniques that I used would prove to be the basis for the next 2 decades of networking architecture. Through the years, the platform that I grew up on has served the world extremely well, enabling the massive build out of the Internet itself. However, certain characteristics of the platform have remained remarkably closed and stagnant over the years.  The hubs and routers I first worked with did little besides forward packets. Switches have become smarter and smarter over time, but the dark side of these advances is that they have been made in an exceptionally proprietary and brittle way. As a result, only a select few companies have any ability to add new functionality and those that do, do so in a manner that makes customers wary to make even the simplest changes to their networks.  To make matters worse, the brittle nature of today’s networking platform severely hamstrings cloud computing. Amazon’s AWS, the largest cloud offering in the world, runs an embarrassingly feature poor network in order to maintain enough flexibility to support its service. Networking functionality that has been around for over twenty years such as multicasting, traffic isolation, and security isolation are absent from Amazon’s offering. When people ask me why more enterprises haven’t moved to the cloud, I point out that doing so would require reversing out the last 15 years of networking features from their applications.  This is why the data networking architecture of the past 30 years — characterized by extremely smart but highly propriety switches that are closed to 99.99% of would-be network developers — has finally run its course.  The Time is Now In order to overcome the massive inertia associated with a dominant platform technology, two conditions must exist. First, there must be new, overwhelmingly important functionality that the old platform cannot support in a reasonable way. Second, the new platform must be able to coexist and interoperate with the old. Until recently, neither of these pre-conditions held for networking, but in past few years, changes in the surrounding ecosystem have made both true:  The Rise of Cloud Computing – The current architecture was developed to deliver packets between two stationary hosts, in a network under unified administrative control. Thus, globally distributed routing protocols along with manual configuration and scripting were largely sufficient. Today’s datacenter networks must cope with multiple tenants, each requiring stringent performance and isolation guarantees for their migrating VMs. The current architecture simply cannot handle these requirements. The Rise of Server Virtualization – Previously, introducing new network functionality in a datacenter required a forklift upgrade. In a modern virtualized environment, all traffic passes through a software switch in the hypervisor before entering the physical network. By controlling these software switches at the edge, a new platform can assume control of the network without requiring a customer to change any parts of the physical networking infrastructure. Thus, the new architecture can be introduced without displacing the old platform. Clearly, the time is now.  Enter the Innovator Martin Casado began his career auditing networks at a government intelligence agency.  While trying to secure our nation against terrorist attacks, he became increasingly frustrated that current networking technology prevented him from solving mission critical problems. He needed a better platform that was so radically different that he knew that he’d have to build it himself. To do so, he journeyed to Stanford University where he connected with like-minded people in Stanford Professor Nick McKeown and UC Berkeley Professor Scott Shenker. McKeown and Shenker were equally frustrated with the current state of the networking art, but for a different reason. They taught network innovation, but it was almost impossible to innovate on the network. You see, real network innovation requires being able to work with real networks – i.e. real production traffic. Sadly, today’s networks are so fragile that no right-minded network administrator would ever allow experimental traffic and programs on her production networks. In fact, even the network administrators at Stanford said “no” to experimental traffic.  Once they joined forces, Casado, McKeown and Shenker sought a platform that:  Completely virtualized the network making the network every bit as flexible as a virtualized server Decoupled networking software from proprietary hardware, so that any company could add any kind of functionality to the network – not just the major networking companies. Was infinitely scalable using commodity hardware Building this new platform was a humongous effort – too big an effort to fund at the University level, so Casado, McKeown, and Shenker started a company, Nicira Networks.  Today Nicira Networks publicly unveiled its widely anticipated first product, the Network Virtualization Platform along with 5 major customers – AT&T, eBay, NTT, Rackspace and Fidelity Investments, who are currently deploying NVP.  I am thrilled to be a part of it and welcome all of you to the future of networking.
Since Marc and I founded Andreessen Horowitz three years ago, we have raised $2.7 billion. That statement begs a few questions. The two most obvious are:  Why did such a new venture capital firm raise so much money? How did such a new venture capital firm raise so much money? To get to the answers, it’s useful to go back to the original motivation for starting Andreessen Horowitz.  After raising our first round of funding for Loudcloud in 1999, we went to visit our new venture capital firm and meet their full team. As founding CEO, I remember being quite excited to meet our financial backers and talk about how we could partner to build a great company. That excitement took a sharp downhill turn when one of the top partners said to me, in front of my co-founders, “When are you going to get a real CEO?”  I was completely stunned—the comment knocked the wind out of me. Our largest investor had basically called me a fake CEO in front of my team. I said, “What do you mean?”—hoping he would revise his statement and enable me to save face. Instead he pressed on: “Someone who has designed a large organization, someone who knows great senior executives and brings prebuilt customer relationships, someone who knows what they are doing.”  I could hardly breathe. It was bad enough that he undermined my standing as CEO, but to make matters worse, I knew that at some level he was right. I didn’t have those skills.  I had never done those things. And I did not know those people. I was the founding CEO, not a professional CEO. I could almost hear the clock ticking in the background as my time running the company quickly ran out.  Could I learn the job and build my network fast enough or would I lose the company? That question tortured me for months.  In the years that followed, I remained CEO, for better or worse. I worked incredibly hard to close the gap between what the partner had described and where I was at the start. Thanks to a lot of effort and help from friends and mentors, especially Bill Campbell, the company survived and ultimately became quite successful and valuable.  However, not a day went by when I didn’t think about that interaction. I always wondered how long I had to grow up and how I could find help to build my skills and make the necessary connections along the way.  Marc and I discussed this often. We wondered aloud why as founders we had to prove to our investors beyond a shadow of a doubt that we could run the company, rather than our investors assuming that we would run the company we’d created. This conversation ultimately became the inspiration for Andreessen Horowitz.  Marc and I share a simple belief that became the basis for our new venture capital firm: in general, founding CEOs perform better than professional CEOs over the long term, and a venture capital firm that enables founding CEOs to succeed would help build the best companies and yield superior investment returns.  As we set out to design a venture capital firm that would enable founders to run their own companies, we began by asking: In what ways are professional CEOs superior to founder CEOs?  Professional CEOs bring two core advantages to the table:  Superior skill set – Being CEO requires vast know-how that is very difficult to gain without extensive experience actually being CEO. Founders with no CEO experience naturally make many critical mistakes during their “on the job training” period. Excellent professional CEOs already have those skills. Superior network – Great professional CEOs know lots of outstanding executives and employees. They also know key reporters and analysts, important potential customers and top industry players. Founders tend not to have enough industry experience to know all these people and need to build their networks almost from scratch. Next, we asked: How might a venture capital firm help close those gaps?  Addressing the skill set issue proved to be difficult because sadly the only way to learn how to be a CEO is to be a CEO. Sure, we might try to teach some skills, but I know from experience that learning to be a CEO through classroom training would be like learning to be an NFL quarterback through classroom training. Even if Peyton Manning and Tom Brady were your instructors, with no experience, you’d get killed the moment you took the field.  We decided that while we would not be able to give a founder CEO all the skills she needed, we would be able to provide the kind of mentorship that would accelerate the learning process. As a result, our first requirement for General Partners is to be an effective mentor for a founder striving to be a CEO. This is why so many of our General Partners are former founders or CEOs or both, and they are all highly focused on helping founders become outstanding CEOs.  Of course, not all founders want to be CEO—there are companies for which the right thing is to bring in a professional CEO. For those companies, we focus on helping the founders identify the right CEO, and then helping the CEO successfully integrate into the company and partner with the founders to retain their unique strengths.  Next, we went after the network.  Existing venture capitalists with whom we had worked with had important industry relationships, but we found them to be lacking in the following ways:  Siloed – As an entrepreneur, you can often count on the General Partner on your board to introduce you to customers or executives, but you can’t count on the venture capital firm itself. Each General Partner has his own distinct network, and it’s not really feasible or practical to access the other partners’ networks because those partners prioritize their own companies and in practice you will never see them—they are not available to help you. So, there is no firm-wide network you can plug into. Hard to access – As CEO it’s always a bit weird to say to your VC, “Please introduce me to some potential customers.” First, it seems like an inconvenience—VCs are clearly busy people with many other things to do. Second, there isn’t any easy process to execute that introduction. Where will this introduction take place? Will the VC set up the meeting? Will you have to fly out to see the prospect? Will the VC come with you? Will the prospect be qualified well enough to do that? If not, then should you even ask? To make matters worse, the need to meet customers is not a one-time event. How do you ask your VC the second, third and tenth times? And at what point does your VC start to judge you as incapable of reaching customers (or partners, distributors, suppliers, investors or acquirers) on your own? Incomplete – Finally, VC networks tend to be incomplete. A certain General Partner might know a certain type of customer like telecom carriers, but not others like pharmaceutical companies or government agencies. They may know customers, but not have deep relationships with key reporters. They may know key reporters, but not know executives you would want to hire. They might know executives, but not engineers. As founding CEO, one tends to be busy. If you spend time trying to tap a network and come up empty, you probably won’t bother trying again. To address these issues, we designed Andreessen Horowitz’s network to be firm-wide, dead simple to access and comprehensive—supported by operating partners who work full-time to develop and manage each branch of the network.  This approach has already lead to some stunning results:  In 2011, we hosted over 600 portfolio presentations to corporate customers and partners at our office in Menlo Park. These presentations resulted in more than 3,000 introductions between portfolio companies and prospective Fortune 500/Global 2000 senior executives. We’ve built relationships with over 4,000 engineers, designers and product managers, and we’ve made more than 1,300 introductions to our portfolio companies, resulting in 130 hires within the portfolio. We added over 550 executives to our network in 2011 and made more than 300 executive introductions to our portfolio companies. We’ve had nearly 400 interactions with media on behalf of our portfolio companies. Through these practices, we’ve been able to help founders develop critical CEO skills and wield networks as broad and powerful as the best professional CEOs. And that is why we have become a popular firm among founders.  Our reputation with founders has then enabled us to invest in great entrepreneurs building the great new technology companies. Interestingly, the demand from entrepreneurs has come in all stages and sizes. From seed stage entrepreneurs like JR Rivers at Cumulus Networks to entrepreneurs with fast growing enterprises like Brian Chesky at Airbnb, great founders everywhere want to be the best CEO that they can be and work with us to help them do that.  And that’s both how and why we raised $2.7 billion. We are uniquely positioned to help the greatest technology entrepreneurs in the world build the best technology companies in the world, and that’s just what we’re going to do.
Many years ago, I encountered a particularly tricky management situation. Two excellent organizations in the company, Customer Support and Sales Engineering, went to war with each other. The Sales Engineers escalated a series of blistering complaints arguing that the Customer Support team did not respond with urgency, refused to fix issues in the product, and generally inhibited sales and customer satisfaction. Meanwhile, the Customer Support group claimed that the sales engineers submitted bugs without qualification, did not listen to valid suggested fixes, and were alarmists who assigned every issue the top priority. Beyond the actual complaints, the teams genuinely did not like each other. To make matters worse, these groups had to work together constantly in order for the company to function. Both teams boasted superb personnel and outstanding managers, so there was nobody to fire or demote. I could not figure out what to do.  During this time, I miraculously happened to watch the motion picture classic Freaky Friday starring the underrated Barbara Harris and the incomparable Jodie Foster—note: there is also a high quality remake starring Jamie Lee Curtis and the troubled, but talented Lindsey Lohan. In the film, mother and daughter grow completely frustrated with each other’s lack of understanding and wish that they could switch places and they do:   Through the course of the movie, by being inside each other’s bodies, both characters develop an excellent understanding of the challenges that the other faces. As a result, the two women become great friends when they switch back. After watching both the original and the remake, I knew that I had found the answer: I would employ a Freaky Friday management technique.  The very next day I informed the head of Sales Engineering and the head of Customer Support that they would be switching jobs. I explained that, like Jodie Foster and Barbara Harris, they would keep their minds, but get new bodies. Permanently. Their initial reactions were not unlike the remake:   However, after just one week walking in the other’s moccasins, both executives quickly diagnosed the core issues causing the conflict. They then swiftly acted to implement a simple set of processes that cleared up the combat and got the teams working harmoniously. From that day to the day we sold the company, the sales engineering and support organizations worked better together than any other major groups in the company—all thanks to Freaky Friday, perhaps the most insightful management training film ever made.
	Thanks to Ward Cunningham, the metaphor technical debt is now a well-understood concept. While you may be able to borrow time by writing quick and dirty code, you will eventually have to pay it back—with interest. Often this trade-off makes sense, but you will run into serious trouble if you fail to keep the trade-off in the front of your mind. There also exists a less well-understood parallel concept, which I will call management debt.  Like technical debt, management debt is incurred when you make an expedient, short-term management decision with an expensive, long-term consequence. Also like technical debt, the trade-off sometimes makes sense, but often does not. More importantly, if you incur the management debt without accounting for it, then you will eventually go management bankrupt.  Like technical debt, management debt comes in too many different forms to elaborate entirely, but a few salient examples will help explain the concept. For this post, I choose 3 of the more popular types among startups:  Putting two in the box Over compensating a key employee, because she gets another job offer No performance management or employee feedback process Putting two in the box What do you do when you have two outstanding employees who logically both fit in the exact same place on the organizational chart? Perhaps you have a world-class architect who is running engineering, but she does not have the experience to scale the organization to the next level. You also have an outstanding operational person who is not great technically. You want to keep both in the company, but you only have one position. So, you get the bright idea to put “two in the box” and take on a little management debt. The short-term benefits are clear: a) you keep both employees, b) you don’t have to develop either because they will theoretically help each other develop, c) you instantly close the skill set gap. Unfortunately, you will pay for those benefits with interest and at a very high interest rate.  For starters, by doing this you will make every engineer’s job more difficult. If an engineer needs a decision made, which boss should she go to? If that boss decides, will the other boss be able to override it? If it’s a complex decision that requires a meeting, does she have to schedule both heads of engineering for the meeting? Who sets the direction for the organization? Will the direction actually get set if doing so requires a series of meetings?  In addition, you have removed all accountability. If schedules slip, who is accountable? If engineering throughput becomes uncompetitive, who is responsible? If the operational head is responsible for the schedule slip and the technical head is responsible for throughput, what happens if the operational head thrashes the engineers to make the schedule and kills throughput? How would you know that she did that? The really expensive part about both of these things is that they tend to get worse over time. In the very short-term you might mitigate these effects with extra meetings or by attempting to carve up the job in a clear way. However, as things get busy the mitigation will fade and the organization will degenerate. Eventually, you’ll either make a lump sum payment by making the hard decision and putting one in the box or your engineering organization will suck forever.  Over compensating a key employee because she gets another job offer An excellent engineer decides to leave the company because she gets a better offer. For various reasons, you were undercompensating her, but the offer from the other company pays more than any engineer in your company and the engineer in question is not your best engineer. Still, she is working on a critical project and you cannot afford to lose her. So you match the offer. You save the project, but you pile on the debt.  Here’s how the payment will come due. You probably think that your counteroffer was confidential because you’d sworn her to secrecy. Let me explain why it was not. She has friends in the company. When she got the offer from the other company, she consulted with her friends. One of her best friends advised her to take the offer. When she decided to stay, she had to explain to him why she disregarded his advice or lose personal credibility. So she told him and swore him to secrecy. He agreed to honor the secret, but was incensed that she had to threaten to quit in order to get a proper raise. Furthermore, he was furious that you overcompensated her. So, he told the story, but kept her name confidential to preserve the secret. And now everyone in engineering knows that the best way to get a raise is to generate an offer from another company then threaten to quit. It’s going to take awhile to pay off that debt.  No performance management or employee feedback process Your company is now 25 people and you know that you should formalize the performance management process, but you don’t want to pay the price. You worry that doing so will make it feel like a “big company”. More so, you do not want your employees to be offended by the feedback, because you can’t afford to lose anyone right now. And people are happy, so why rock the boat? Why not take on a little management debt?  The first noticeable payments will be due when somebody performs below expectations:  CEO: “He was good when we hired him, what happened?” Manager: “He’s not doing the things that we need him to do.” CEO: “Did we clearly tell him that?” Manager: “Maybe not clearly . . .” However, the larger payment will be a silent tax. Companies execute well when everybody is on the same page and everybody is constantly improving. In a vacuum of feedback, there is almost no chance that your company will perform optimally across either dimension. Directions with no corrections will seem fuzzy and obtuse. People rarely improve weakness that they are unaware of. The ultimate price you will pay for not giving feedback: systematically crappy company performance.  In the end Every really good, really experienced CEO that I know shares one important characteristic: they tend to opt for the hard answer to organizational issues. If faced with giving everyone the same bonus to make things easy or sharply rewarding performance and ruffling many feathers, they’ll ruffle the feathers. If given the choice of cutting a popular project today, because it’s not in the long-term plans or you’re keeping it around for morale purposes and to appear consistent, they’ll cut it today. Why? Because they’ve paid the price of management debt and they would rather not do that again.
Early in my tenure as product manager for the web servers at Netscape, we faced a terrible crisis. We just got our hands on Microsoft’s new web server, Internet Information Server (IIS), and benchmarked against our product. Microsoft’s IIS had every feature that we had, was five times faster and we knew that they were going to give it away for free. This might not sound so bad, but we had just gone public three months earlier with a story to Wall Street that said, “Don’t worry about Microsoft giving away the browser because we will make money selling servers.” Oh snap.  I immediately went to work trying to move the playing field and pivot the server product line to something that we could sell for money. The late, great Mike Homer and I worked furiously on a set of partnerships and acquisitions that would broaden the product line and surround the web server with enough functionality that we would be able survive the attack.  As I excitedly reviewed the plan with my engineering counterpart, Bill Turpin, he looked at me as though I was a little kid who had much to learn. Bill was a long-time veteran of battling Microsoft from his time at Borland and understood what I was trying to do, but remained unconvinced. He said: “Ben, those silver bullets that you and Mike are looking for are fine and good, but our web server is five times slower. There is no silver bullet that’s going to fix that. No, we are going to have to use a lot of lead bullets.” Oh snap.  As a result of Bill’s words, we focused our engineering team on fixing the performance issues while working the other things in the background. We eventually beat Microsoft’s performance and grew the server line to become a $400M business and we would never have done it without those lead bullets.  I carried that lesson with me for many years. Six years later, when I was CEO of Opsware, our toughest competitor Bladelogic started to consistently beat us in large deals. We were a public company and the losses were all too visible. To make matters worse, we needed to win those deals in order to beat the Wall Street projections, so the company felt tremendous pressure. Many of the smartest people in my company came to me with ideas for avoiding the battle:  “Let’s build a light-weight version of the product and go down market.” “Let’s acquire a company with a simpler architecture.” “Let’s focus on service providers.” The issue with their ideas was that we weren’t facing a market problem. The customers were buying; they just weren’t buying our product. This was not a time to pivot. So I said the same thing to every one of them: “There are no silver bullets for this, only lead bullets.” They did not want to hear that, but it made things clear: we had to build a better product. There was no other way out. No window, no hole, no escape hatch, no backdoor. We had to go through the front door and deal with the big, ugly guy blocking it. Lead bullets.  After nine months of hard work on an extremely rugged product cycle, we regained our product lead and eventually built a company that was worth $1.6B. Without the lead bullets, I suspect we would have ended at about 1/10th that value.  There may be nothing scarier in business than facing an existential threat. So scary that many in the organization will do anything to avoid it. They will look for any alternative, any way out, any excuse not to live or die in a single battle. I see this often in start up pitches. The conversations go something like this:  Entrepreneur: “We have the best product in the market by far. All the customers love it and prefer it to competitor X.” Me: “Why does competitor X have five times your revenue?” Entrepreneur: “We are using partners and OEMs, because we can’t build a direct channel like competitor X.” Me: “Why not? If you have the better product, why not knuckle up and go to war?” Entrepreneur: “Ummm.” Me: “Stop looking for the silver bullet.” There comes a time in every company’s life where it must fight for its life. If you find yourself running when you should be fighting, you need to ask yourself: “If our company isn’t good enough to win, then do we need to exist at all?”
A year ago I wrote about a very special entrepreneur, Christian Gheorghe, who escaped Communist Romania, migrated to America, and—after starting here with $27 as a limo driver and construction worker—eventually became a computer scientist and an entrepreneur. I indicated that just as he broke from an oppressive, totalitarian regime, he planned to free his customers from the oppression of enterprise software. Today Christian announces his new company Tidemark and I finally get to tell you how he will redefine and reinvent enterprise performance management and, more broadly, data analytics.  As we enter the age of the cloud/mobile platform, Tidemark provides a compelling example of why future applications will be far superior to the current generation. By properly using the bursting capabilities of the cloud, Tidemark benchmarks out at 1,000 times the performance of current solutions, which sometimes take 6 or 7 days to consolidate financials across a business. By using the iPad as the primary user interface target, Tidemark is highly accessible to business people and not just data analysts.  Both of these advances turn out to be critically important. If it takes a week to consolidate financial statements, then any scenario planning will be stale by a minimum of one week. In today’s real-time business environment, that’s ridiculous and certainly uncompetitive. Anybody who has been in business for any length of time knows that the data represents a portion, but not all of the business. In the same way that a map is not the terrain, the spreadsheet is not the business. As a result, having data analysts analyze data and the managers of the business attempt to make decisions on that basis is far from optimal. By making the data and its analysis directly available to the people with the knowledge, Tidemark transforms decision quality.  Beyond these platform advantages, Tidemark changes the nature of data analytics by ditching the two fundamental and problematic questions on which the existing industry is based:  What data do I have? What reports do I want? The trouble with these questions is that a) it is highly unlikely that you’ve gathered all of the relevant data in the right schema and format prior to needing it, b) businesses are not best represented in reports and c) the reports generally say very little that’s interesting about the future. As a result, companies that analyze their businesses with off-the-shelf products tend to do a far worse job than companies like Google who use data to achieve massive competitive advantage through teams of brilliant engineers.  Christian replaced these two ancient questions with far better ones:  How does our business work? How do we want to measure it, understand it, and predict what will happen next? Tidemark’s software begins by literally capturing a blueprint of the customer’s business. If you think of a business as a series of processes executed by a variety of people designed to create specific, measurable outcomes then you get the basic idea of how Tidemark defines a blueprint and aligns itself to the business. It’s a great alignment, because when you think about it, processes cover the import aspects of a business—product development process, sales process, financial planning process, etc. Tidemark enables companies to capture their process architecture and the related key performance indicators in software. Once Tidemark understands how a business works and how the company wants to measure and understand it, it can help the company forecast future results, scenario plan, and continuously improve.  For those of us who have been around this kind of software for years, Tidemark’s breakthroughs are breathtaking. It’s a product that delivers on a 30-year vision in the same way that the iPhone finally fulfilled the dream of the Newton.  Christian is the shining example of why an open and benevolent immigration policy for oppressed peoples is the right one. Before he is done, he will make thousands of U.S. businesses more competitive, employ many Americans, and lead the way for other companies to follow and improve their approach to software. And all we had to do was give him a chance.
Everyone in the technology industry seems to agree that people are paramount, yet nobody seems to be on the same page with what the people organization­—Human Resources—should look like.  The problem is that when it comes to HR, most CEOs don’t really know what they want. In theory, they want a well-managed company with a great culture. Instinctively they know that an HR organization probably can’t deliver that. As a result, CEOs usually punt on the issue and implement something that’s sub-optimal if not worthless.  Interestingly, one of the first things that you learn when you run an engineering organization is that a good Quality Assurance organization cannot build a high quality product, but it can tell you when the development team builds a low quality product. Similarly, a high quality Human Resources organization cannot make you a well-managed company with a great culture, but it can tell you when you and your managers are not getting the job done.  The Employee Lifecycle The best way to approach management quality assurance is through the lens of the employee lifecycle. From hire to retire, how good is your company? Is your management team world-class in all phases? How do you know?  A great HR organization will support, measure and help improve your management team. Some of the questions that they will help you answer:  Recruiting and hiring  Do you sharply understand the skills and talents required to succeed in every open position? Are your interviewers well prepared? Do your managers and employees do an effective job of selling your company to prospective employees? Do interviewers arrive on time? Do managers and recruiters follow up with candidates in a timely fashion? Do you compete effectively for talent against the best companies? Compensation  Do your benefits make sense for your company demographics? How do your salary and stock option packages compare to the companies that you compete with for talent? How well do your performance rankings correspond to your compensation practices? Training and Integration  When you hire an employee how long does it take them to become productive from the perspective of the employee, her peers, and her manager? Shortly after joining, how well does an employee understand what’s expected of her? Performance management  Do your managers give consistent, clear feedback to their employees? What is the quality of your company’s written performance reviews? Did all of your employees receive their reviews on time? Do you effectively manage out poor performers? Motivation  Are you employees excited to come to work? Do your employees believe in the mission of the company? Do they enjoy coming to work every day? Do you have any employees who are actively disengaged? Do your employees clearly understand what’s expected of them? Do employees stay a long time or do they quit faster than normal? Why do employees quit? Requirements to be great at running HR What kind of person should you look for to comprehensively and continuously understand the quality of your management team? Here are some key requirements:  World-class process design skills—Much like the head of quality assurance, the head of HR must be a masterful process designer. One key to accurately measuring critical management processes is excellent process design and control. A true diplomat—Nobody likes a tattle tale and there is no way for an HR organization to be effective if the management team doesn’t implicitly trust it. Managers must believe that HR is there to help them improve rather than police them. Great HR leaders genuinely want to help the managers and could care less about getting credit for identifying problems. They will work directly with the managers to get quality up and only escalate to the CEO when necessary. If an HR leader hoards knowledge, makes power plays, or plays politics, he will be useless. Industry knowledge—Compensation, benefits, best recruiting practices, et al are all fast moving targets. The head of HR must be deeply networked in the industry and stay abreast of all the latest developments. Intellectual heft to be the CEO’s trusted advisor—None of the other skills matter if the CEO does not fully back the head of HR in holding the managers to a high quality standard. In order for this to happen, the CEO must trust the HR leader’s thinking and judgment. Understanding of things unspoken—When management quality starts to break down in a company, nobody says anything about it, but super perceptive people can tell that the company is slipping. You need one of those.
When you recruit an executive, you paint a beautiful picture of her future in your company. You describe in great depth and color how awesome it will be for her to accept your offer and how much better it will be for her than joining that other company. Then one day you realize you must fire her. Reconcile that Ms. CEO.  It turns out that the actual act of firing an executive is relatively easy compared to any other firing. Executives have experience being on the other side of the conversation and tend to be quite professional. Firing an executive correctly is a bit more complicated and extremely important. If you do not learn the right lessons, you will be doing it again soon.  Like so many things, the key to correctly firing an executive is preparation. Here is a four-step process that will treat the executive fairly and improve your company.  Step 1: Root Cause Analysis While it’s possible to fire an executive for bad behavior, incompetence or laziness, those cases are rare and relatively easy.  Unfortunately, unless you have a horrible hiring process, those are probably not the reasons why you got to this point. At this level, almost every company screens for the proper skill set, motivation, and track record. Yes, the reason that you have to fire your head of marketing is not because they suck; it’s because you suck.  In other words, the wrong way to view an executive firing is as an executive failure; the correct way to view an executive firing is as an interview/integration process system failure. Therefore, the first step to properly firing an executive is figuring out why you hired the wrong person for your company.  You may have blown it for a variety of reasons:  You did a poor job defining the position in the first place—If you don’t know what you want, you will be very unlikely to get it. Far too often CEOs hire executives based on an abstract notion of what they think the executive should look and feel like. This often leads to the executive not bringing the key, necessary qualities to the table. You hired for lack of weakness rather than strength—This is especially common when you run a consensus-based hiring process. The group will often find the candidate’s weaknesses, but they won’t place a high enough value on the areas where you need the executive to be world class. As a result, you hire an executive with no sharp weaknesses, but who is mediocre where you need her to be great. If you don’t have world-class strengths where you need them, you won’t be a world-class company. You hired for scale too soon—The most consistently wrong advice that venture capitalists and executive recruiters give CEOs is to hire someone “bigger” than required. “Think about the next 3 to 5 years and how you will be a large company” is how the extremely bad advice usually sounds. It’s great to hire people who can run a large scale organization if you have one. It’s also great to hire people who know how to grow an organization very fast if you are ready to grow your organization very fast. However, if you do not or you are not, then you need someone who can do the job for the next 18 months. If you hire someone who will be great in 18 months, but will be poor for the next 18 months, the company will reject her before she ever gets a chance to show her stuff. Your other employees will wonder: why did we give her all those stock options when she’s not contributing anything? Those kinds of questions are impossible to recover from. It turns out that venture capitalists and executive recruiters are not stupid, they just learned the wrong lessons from previous failures. To learn the right lesson, see the special case of scaling and the special case of fast growth below. You hired for the generic position—There is no such thing as a great CEO, a great head of marketing or a great head of sales. There is only a great head of sales for your company for the next 12-24 months. That position is not the same as the same position at Microsoft or Facebook. Don’t look for the candidate out of central casting. This is not a movie. The executive had the wrong kind of ambition—In a previous post, I described the difference between ambition for the company and ambition for oneself. If an executive has the wrong kind of ambition, then despite her skills, the company may reject her. You failed to integrate the executive—Bringing a new person into your company in an important role is difficult. Other employees will be quick to judge, her expectations may be different than yours, and the job may be largely undefined. Be sure to review and improve your integration plan after you fire an executive. The special case of scaling A fairly common reason for firing an executive is that when the company quadruples in size, the executive no longer does the job effectively at the new size. The reason is that when a company multiplies in size, the management jobs become brand new jobs. As a result, everybody needs to re-qualify for the new job, because the new job and the old job are not the same. Running a 200 person global sales organization is not the same job as running a 25 person local sales team. If you get lucky, the person you hired to run the 25-person team will have learned how to run the 200-person team. If not, you need to hire the right person for the new job. This is neither an executive failure nor a system failure; it is life in the big city. Do not attempt to avoid this phenomenon, as you will only make things worse.  The special case of fast growth If you build a great product and the market wants it, you will find yourself needing to grow your company extremely quickly. Nothing will ensure your success like hiring the right executive who has grown an organization like yours very quickly and successfully before. Note that this is not the same as inheriting a very large organization or working your way up to running a very large organization. Make sure you hire the right kind of fast growth executive. Also, do not hire this person if you are not ready to give them lots of budget to grow their organization; expect them to do what they do. The successful fast growth executive is so important to building successful startups that recruiters and venture capitalists often advise CEOs to bring them in before the company is ready.  Once you identify the problem, then you create the basis for the next steps.  Step 2: Informing the Board Informing the board is tricky and many issues can further complicate the task:  This is the 5th or 6th executive that you had to fire This is the 3rd executive that you fired in this role The candidate was referred by a board member who recommend the exec as a superstar Realize that in any of these cases the board will be at least somewhat alarmed and there is nothing that you can do about that. But keep in mind that your choices are: a) alarm the board or b) enable an ineffective executive to remain in her position. While choice (a) is not great, it’s a heck of a lot better than choice (b). Leaving a failing leader in place will cause an entire department in your company to slowly rot. Let that happen and the board will be more than alarmed.  Your should have three goals with the board:  Get their support and understanding for the difficult task that will you execute—You should start by making sure that they understand the root cause and your plan to remedy the situation. This will give them confidence in your ability to hire and manage outside executives in the future. Get their input and approval for the separation package—This will be critical for the next step. Executive packages are larger than regular severance packages and rightly so. It takes about 10 times longer for an executive to find a new job than an individual contributor. Preserve the reputation of the fired executive—The failure was very likely a team effort and it’s best to portray it that way. You don’t make yourself look good by trashing someone who worked for you. A mature approach to this issue will help keep the board confident in your ability to be CEO. It’s also the fair and decent thing to do. Finally, this turns out to be a piece of news that’s handled better with individual phone calls than in dramatic fashion during a board meeting. It takes a bit longer, but well worth the effort. Individual calls will be particularly important if one of the board members introduced the executive to the company. Once everyone agrees individually, you can finalize the details in a board meeting or call.  Step 3: Preparing for the conversation After you know what went wrong and have informed the board, you should tell the executive as quickly as possible. In preparation for that meeting, I recommend scripting or rehearsing what you plan to say so that you do not accidentally misspeak. The executive will remember the conversation for a very long time, so you need to get it right.  As part of your preparation, you should review any performance reviews or written performance conversations to understand any inconsistencies in your prior communication.  Three keys to getting it right:  Be clear on the reasons—You have thought about this long and hard, don’t equivocate or sugar coat it—you owe it to them to be clear about what you think happened. Use decisive language—Do not leave this open. This is not a performance review; it’s a firing. Use words phrases like “I have decided” rather than “I think.” Have the severance package approved and ready—Once the executive hears the news, she will stop caring about the company and its issues—she will be highly focused on herself and her family. Be ready for this with the package. Finally, the executive will be keenly interested in how the news will be communicated to the company and the outside world. It is best to let her decide. My friend and legendary CEO Bill Campbell once gave me a critical bit of advice when I was preparing to fire an executive. He said: “Ben, you cannot let him keep his job, but you absolutely can let him keep his respect.”  Step 4: Preparing the company communication After you have informed the executive, you must quickly update the company on the change. The correct order for informing the company is 1) the executive’s direct reports—because they will be most impacted 2) the other members of your staff—because they will need to answer questions about it 3) the rest of the company. All of these communications should happen in the same day and preferably within a couple of hours. When disclosing the firing to the direct reports, make sure that you have a plan for who they will report to in the meanwhile and what’s next (executive search, re-organization, internal promotion, or something else). Generally, it’s smart for the CEO to act in the executive role in the meanwhile. If you do act in the role, you must really act—staff meetings, 1:1s, objective setting, etc. Doing so will provide excellent continuity for the team and greatly inform your thinking on whom to hire next.  When you update the company, you might worry about employees misinterpreting the news and thinking the company is in trouble. Do not try to engineer around such a reaction. When you expect your employees to act like adults, they generally do. If you treat them like children, then get ready for your company to turn into one big Barney episode.  In the end Every CEO likes to say she runs a great company. It’s hard to tell whether the claim is true until the company or the CEO has to do something really difficult. Firing an executive is a good test.
When we meet with entrepreneurs, the two key characteristics that we look for are brilliance and courage. In my experience as CEO, I found that the most important decisions tested my courage far more than my intelligence.  The right decision is often obvious, but the pressure to make the wrong decision can be overwhelming. It starts with small things.  When founders come in to pitch our firm—one as the CEO and the other as President—the conversation often goes like this:  “Who is running the company?” “We are,” they both say. “Who makes the final decision?” “We do.” “How long do you expect to run that way?” “Forever.” “So you’ve decided to make it more difficult for every employee to get work done so that you don’t have to decide who is in charge, is that right?”  That usually results in silence.  Intellectually, it should be clear that it is easier for employees to go to one decision maker than two. It’s not really very complicated at all. Unfortunately, the clear and present social pressure often overwhelms the long-term benefits of organizing the company properly. Because the founders do not have the courage to decide who is in charge, every employee suffers the inconvenience of double approval.  More importantly, decisions only get scarier as a company grows. When we decided to take Loudcloud public with only $2M in revenue, it was not a hard choice intellectually—the alternative was to go bankrupt. It was nonetheless terrifying to do something that most employees, everyone in the press, and many investors thought was nuts.  When making the right choice requires intelligence and courage Sometimes the decision itself is rather complicated which makes the courage challenge even more difficult. CEOs possess a different set of data, knowledge and perspective than anybody else in the company. Frequently, some of the employees and board members are more experienced and more intelligent than the CEO. The only reason the CEO can make a better decision is her superior knowledge.  To make matters worse, when a CEO faces a particularly difficult decision, she may have only a slight preference for one choice over another—say 54% kill a product line, 46% keep it. If the really smart people on the board and on her staff take the other side, her courage will be severely tested. How can she kill the product when she is not even sure if the she is making the right decision and everyone is against her? If she’s wrong, she will have been wrong in the face of advice from her top advisors. If she is right, will anybody even know?  Recently, a large company offered to buy one of our portfolio companies. The deal was lucrative and compelling given the portfolio company’s progress to date and revenue level. The Founder/CEO (I’ll call him Hamlet—not his real name) thought that selling did not make sense due to the giant market opportunity that he was pursuing, but still wanted to make sure that he made the best possible choice for investors and employees. Hamlet wanted to reject the offer, but only marginally. To complicate matters, most of the management team and the board thought the opposite.  It did not help that the board and the management team were far more experienced than Hamlet. As a result, Hamlet spent many sleepless nights worrying about whether or not he was right. To make matters worse, he realized that it was impossible to know whether or not he was right. This did not help his sleep. In the end, Hamlet made the best and most courageous decision that he could and did not sell the company. I believe that will prove to be the defining moment of his career.  Interestingly, as soon as Hamlet made the decision, the entire board and executive team immediately embraced the choice. Why? If they wanted to sell the company enough to advise the CEO to give up his dream, how could they reverse themselves so quickly? It turns out that the most important data point driving their earlier preference for selling the company was Hamlet’s initial ambivalence—the team supported the decision they thought the CEO wanted. Hamlet did not realize this and interpreted their desire to sell to be the result of a thorough analysis. Luckily for everybody involved, he had the courage to make the right decision.  The general problem can be seen in the social credit matrix described below. The expected social rewards for making the crowd-influenced decision appear better than those for making the decision that you think is right:  You are right	You are wrong You decide against the crowd	Few remember that you made the decision, but the company succeeds	Everybody remembers the decision and you are down graded, ostracized or fired You decide with the crowd	Everyone who advised you remembers the decision and the company succeeds	You receive the minimum blame possible for getting it wrong, but the company suffers On the surface, it appears that if the decision is a close call, it’s much safer to go with the crowd. In reality, if you fall into this trap, the crowd will influence your thinking and make a 70/30 decision seem like a 51/49 decision. This is why courage is critical.  Courage, like character, can be developed Every fighter that ever lived had fear. A boy comes to me and tells me that he’s not afraid, if I believed him I’d say he’s a liar or there’s something wrong with him. I’d send him to a doctor to find out what the hell’s the matter with him, because this is not a normal reaction. The fighter that’s gone into the ring and hasn’t experienced fear is either a liar or a psychopath… —Cus D’Amato In all the difficult decisions that I made through the course of running Loudcloud and Opsware, I never once felt brave. In fact, I often felt scared to death. I never lost those feelings, but after much practice, I learned to ignore them. That learning process might also be called the courage development process.  In life, everybody faces choices between doing what’s popular, easy, and wrong vs. doing what’s lonely, difficult, and right. These decisions intensify when you run a company, because the consequences get magnified 1,000 fold. As in life, the excuses for CEO’s making the wrong choice are always plentiful.  Life excuse	CEO excuse Other smart people made the same mistake	It was a close call All my friends wanted to do it	The team was against me and I couldn’t go against the team All the cool kids are doing it	It was industry best practice; I didn’t realize it was illegal It wasn’t perfect, so I decided not to compete	We never achieved total product-market fit, so we never tried to sell our product Every time you make the hard, correct decision you become a bit more courageous and every time you make the easy, wrong decision you become a bit more cowardly.  If you are CEO, these choices will lead to a courageous or cowardly company.  One last thought Over the past 10 years, technological advances dramatically lowered the financial bar for starting a new company, but the courage bar for building a great company remains as high as it has ever been.
When I ran Opsware, we had the non-linear quarter problem also known affectionately as the hockey stick. The hockey stick refers to the shape of the revenue graph over the course of a quarter. Our hockey stick was so bad that one quarter, we booked 90% of our new bookings on the last day of the quarter. Sales patterns like this make it difficult to plan the business and are particularly harrowing when you are, as we were, a public company.  Naturally, I was determined to straighten out the hockey stick and bring some sanity to the business. I designed an incentive for sales people to close deals in the first two months of the quarter by issuing bonuses for deals in those months. As a result, the next quarter became slightly more linear, and slightly smaller than anticipated – deals just moved from the 3rd month to the first two of the following quarter.  When I ran a large engineering group at Netscape, I measured one of our engineering products on schedule, quality and features. The team shipped a product with all the required features, on time and with very few bugs. Unfortunately, the product was mediocre, because none of the features were that great.  When I was at HP, we ran all the businesses by the numbers with extremely strict revenue and margin targets. Some divisions made their numbers, but did so by underfunding R&D. They dramatically weakened their long-term competitive position and set themselves up for future disaster.  In all three cases, managers got what we asked for, but not what we wanted. How does this happen? Let’s take a look.  Flattening out the hockey stick—the wrong goal In retrospect, I should never have asked the team to flatten the quarters. If that is what I wanted, I had to be willing to—at least temporarily—accept smaller quarters. We had a fixed number of sales people who were maximizing the size of each quarter. In order to deliver linear quarters, they had to modify their behavior and adjust their priorities. Unfortunately, I liked the old priority of maximizing revenue better.  Given the situation, I was actually pretty lucky. Sun Tzu in his classic work The Art of War warns that giving the team a task that it cannot possibly perform is called crippling the army. In my case, I did not cripple the team, but I screwed up my priorities. The right thing to do would have been to make the hard decision up front: what was more important a) maximizing each quarter or b) increasing predictability. The instruction only made sense if the answer was (b).  Over Focusing on the Numbers In the second example, I managed the team to a set of numbers that did not fully capture what I wanted. I wanted a great product that customers would love with high quality and on time—in that order.  Unfortunately, the metrics that I set did not capture those priorities. At a basic level, metrics are incentives. By measuring quality, features, and schedule and discussing them every staff meeting, my people intensely focused on those metrics to the exclusion of other goals. The metrics did not describe the real goals and I distracted the team as a result.  Interestingly, I see this same problem play out in many consumer Internet startups. I often see teams who maniacally focus on their metrics around customer acquisition and retention. This usually works well for customer acquisition, but not so well for retention. Why?  For many products, metrics often describe the customer acquisition goal in enough detail to provide sufficient management guidance. In contrast, the metrics for customer retention do not provide enough color to be a complete management tool. As a result, many young companies over focus their teams on their retention metrics, but do not spend enough time getting into intense depth on the actual user experience. This generally results in a frantic numbers chase that does not end in a great product.  It’s important to supplement a great product vision with a strong discipline around the metrics, but if you substitute metrics for product vision, you will not get what you want.  Managing strictly by numbers is like painting by numbers At HP, we were highly focused on results. As with the situation at Netscape, some things that you want to encourage will be quantifiable and some will not. If you report on the quantitative goals and ignore the qualitative ones, you won’t get the qualitative goals, which may be the most important goals.  Management purely by numbers is sort of like painting by numbers—it’s strictly for amateurs.  At HP, the company wanted high earnings now and in the future. By focusing entirely on the numbers, HP got them now by sacrificing the future.  Note that there were many numbers as well as more qualitative goals that would have helped:  Was our competitive win rate increasing or declining? Was customer satisfaction rising or falling? What did our own engineers think of the products? By managing the organization as though it were a black box, some divisions at HP optimized the present at the expense of their downstream competitiveness. The company rewarded managers for achieving short-term objectives in a manner that was bad for the company. It would have been better to take into account the white box qualitative and quantitative issues and reward only those managers that hit their numbers while readying the company for a strong future.  Closing thought In the examples above, it is easy to see that there are many ways to be misinterpreted. To get things right, you must recognize that anything that you measure automatically creates a set of employee behaviors. Once you determine the result you want, you need to test the description of the result against the employee behaviors that the description will likely create. Otherwise, the side-effect behaviors may be worse than the original situation.
Before my partner Marc Andreessen and his friends at the University of Illinois invented the browser in 1993, most people thought only scientists and researchers would use the Internet. The Internet was thought to be too arcane, insecure and slow to meet real business needs. Even after the team introduced Mosaic, the world’s first browser, almost nobody thought the Internet would be significant beyond the scientific community­—least of all the most important technology industry leaders who were busy building proprietary alternatives.  In fact, you’d be hard pressed to find much written arguing that the Internet would be meaningful in those days. The overwhelming favorites to dominate the race to become the Information Super Highway were competing proprietary technologies from industry powerhouses such as Oracle and Microsoft, which captured the imagination of the business press. This was not so illogical as most companies didn’t even run TCP/IP—they ran proprietary networking protocols such as AppleTalk, Netbios, and SNA. As late as November 1995, Bill Gates wrote a book entitled The Road Ahead in which he predicted that the Information Super Highway would rule the future. In the first edition, The Information Super Highway was to be the logical successor to the Internet, but definitely not using Internet technology. Gates later went back and changed the references from the Information Super Highway to the Internet, but that was not his original vision.  The implications of the propriety vision were not good. In Gates and Ellison’s minds, the corporations who owned the Information Super Highway would tax every transaction by charging a “vigorish” as Microsoft’s then Chief Technology Officer Nathan Myhrvold referred to it at the time.  It’s difficult to overstate the momentum that the proprietary Information Super Highway carried. After Mosaic, even Marc and his co-founder Jim Clark originally planned a business for video distribution to run on top of the proprietary Information Super Highway, not the Internet. It wasn’t until deep into the planning process that they decided that by improving the browser by making it secure, more functional and easier to use, they could make the Internet the network of the future.  Marc and Jim called the first Netscape browser Mozilla—meaning Mosaic Killer—to emphasize the mission to replace Mosaic and its importance. Today, if you type about:Mozilla into a Firefox browser (the Netscape derivative browser project), you still see the religious zealotry with which the team pursued the mission.  On the modern Internet, we all benefit from that passion and commitment. Had Netscape not succeeded so quickly and forced Microsoft into the browser war and out of their proprietary network agenda, the world likely would be quite different.  Even if the Internet had eventually won, it would have taken much longer and the world would have lost years of important innovation. And we all would have paid many vigorishes in the meanwhile.  After AOL acquired Netscape in 1999, the browser wars ended and browser innovation stopped for many years. Then more recently, projects like Firefox from Mozilla.org and Chrome from Google made major advances in the “under the hood” technology. It’s a testament to the fundamental importance of the browser that these invisible, but meaningful changes created major market share shifts. In the past 3 years an eye popping 500 million people have switched browsers.  Still, since 1996, the only major change to the browser’s user experience has been the addition of tabs. A truly stunning lack of innovation when you think about the underlying changes on the Internet. In 1996, there was no social networking, no video, no search that worked, no RSS, and no Twitter to name a few. It’s amazing to think that none of these advances led to any corresponding browser change.  Rockmelt and the next wave of innovation All that began to change two years ago when Tim Howes and Eric Vishria founded Rockmelt, a company with a mission to reinvent the browser’s user experience. In order to adapt the browser to the last 15 years of Internet evolution, Rockmelt focuses on four major changes:  People—Perhaps the most important change in the past five years has been the shift from a page-centric to people-centric Internet. In response, Rockmelt builds the concept of friends right into the browser making people first class citizens from a technological perspective. Information Flow—The modern web reverses the paradigm of getting information as information now flows to us. Rockmelt integrates this concept by making streams and feeds a basic part of the user interface. Search—Back in 1996 during the time of the last browser UI innovations, searching the Internet was very different. In fact, the search products of the day didn’t work very well, so people didn’t use them very much. Google changed that in the early 2000s with their breakthrough product and company. Now, more than a decade later, Rockmelt changes the browser to take advantage of modern search. Multiple Computing Devices—In the days of Mosaic and Netscape, a person was lucky to own one computer. As a result, the original browsers were all device specific. Your bookmarks, browsing history, configuration, etc. all stayed with the one device you owned. Now we have computers at home, at work, and in our pockets and the one device paradigm doesn’t work so well. With Rockmelt, the browser information lives in the cloud rather than on a device. As a result, things work the way modern people expect them to. Rockmelt’s engagement numbers through their beta period seem to confirm their thesis:  Over 6 hours of use per person per day Average of 3 chat conversations per user through RockMelt each day 60% of users 35 and under are active chatters, and they each send an average of 65 messages every day and 71% of the youngest cohort use chat. Average of 20 uses of the information flow features per person per day 80% of searches go through the browser’s search interface rather than a search site 56% of users are age 24 and under, 80% under 35. A very special group of people drove the original browser innovations and the Rockmelt team follows that tradition. Rockmelt’s CTO Tim Howes began his Internet career by inventing the Lightweight Directory Access Protocol (LDAP) with his colleagues at the University of Michigan. LDAP complemented and then ultimately replaced the previous standard, DAP (Directory Access Protocol), by simplifying, modernizing, and just plain fixing the old guard. Now Tim aims to do the same thing with the browser. His co-founder, Eric, was the best young executive that we had at Opsware and is building Rockmelt into a great company and a great place to work. It’s incredibly exciting to see them pick up where history left off.  Pouring out a little liquor for the Ultimate Browser Warrior We all live in a better world today thanks to the efforts of those who fought the original browser wars. Technology history records many of them: Marc Andreessen, Bill Gates, Steve Ballmer, Jim Barksdale to name a few, but people who were there will tell you there was none more important or impactful than the late great Mike Homer. In fact, to a large extent Mike created the war by launching a withering PR attack that Microsoft couldn’t ignore. During that period, several times a quarter Mike would assemble an entire marketing campaign or product strategy in his sleep. Or maybe he didn’t sleep, but he would definitely think them up between 3 and 5 am. Out of those middle-of-the-night monologue brainstorming sessions emerged some of the greatest marketing ideas that I have ever seen. On one such night, he developed something called the Netscape Now one button download. At the time, software was considered extremely valuable and nobody was allowed to download it without going through a complex registration process. Mike took the conventional 15 steps and collapsed them into one. A concept so brilliant that it has been copied so often that everyone forgets that nobody did it until Mike invented it.  Even better than Mike the Ultimate Browser Warrior was Mike the person. In 1995, I was becoming an important voice at Netscape, but I still didn’t have much money, so I continued to drive the car that I could afford: a 1984 Oldsmobile two toned tan and cream—ice cream paint job—Cutlass Supreme that my father helped me to purchase a decade prior for $4,500. I tried to park the car in the back where nobody would see it, so as not to diminish my standing among my peers. One day Mike heard about the Cutlass. He said, “Ben I want a ride in your car.” My heart nearly stopped. I was trying to establish myself as an important contributor and the last thing that I needed was an executive who drove a car worth hundreds of thousands of dollars riding in my car, which was worth hundreds of dollars. When I showed up for the date, I was horrified to see that Mike brought our CFO, Peter Currie with him. I sat in my car with our CFO next to me, the most important executive in the company sitting in my back seat, and I was sweating bullets. Then Mike said: “Ben, I’ve named many products in my career, but I believe that I have just come up with the most appropriate name for a product in history. I am naming your car ‘La Bamba.’” And then he laughed that Mike Homer laugh that let me know that it was OK and he’d set the whole episode up to let me know that I was OK too. That small moment changed me from a guy trying to fit in to a true member of the team and meant the world to me.  It’s been over two years since Mike passed away from Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease, but I still miss him like it was yesterday.  Heaven or Hell wherever he be that’s where I hope I’m a go.
Technology stocks currently trade at an all time low vs. industrial stocks based on forward P/E ratios. Nonetheless, the esteemed and brilliant Mr. Blank argues that we are in a technology bubble.  When I pointed this out, Mr. Blank modified his argument to say that the bubble would only be seen in the new companies. This is odd, because in the previous technology bubble of 1999-2000, the veteran companies such as Cisco, Sun, and Oracle experienced meteoric rises in their share prices.  Nonetheless, let’s look at the prices of the new technology IPOs that Mr. Blank highlights in his argument:  LinkedIn—Mr. Blank’s poster child harbinger of the bubble is down 30% since Mr. Blank quoted its stock price. Pandora—Is down 17% since its IPO. RenRen and YouKu—The Chinese Internet companies that Mr. Blank referenced are down more than 50% and 25% respectively. So, this is a technology IPO bubble in which all of the bubble companies are going down in price. Perhaps we should rename it the Incredible Sinking Bubble.  Of course, Mr. Blank’s primary argument is not logical, but rather, it’s psychological. He unspools a captivating theory with four psychological phases: stealth, awareness, mania, and blow off. He follows that up with a personification of investor categories: Smart Money, Shills, Marks, and True Believers designed to create empathy for the poor victims of the technology bubble and portray the others as sophisticated con men poised to take advantage of “your neighbors, parents, or grandparents.” I find these arguments to be most appropriate, because bubbles are not logical. They are, in fact, psychological.  Specifically, before a market can enter a bubble, the bubble psychological precondition must be met. The precondition is the same for all bubbles: the overwhelming majority of the population must believe that prices will continue to go up. In essence, in the great balance of fear and greed, there must be overwhelming greed and a vacuum of fear. Otherwise, prices will remain logical and no bubble will emerge.  Has the psychological precondition been met for the great technology bubble of 2011?  It turns out that there is plenty of fear in today’s financial markets in general and in the technology market in particular. Stocks are at their lowest point in two decades and technology stocks are at an all time low vs. industrials. I imagine the readers of the Economist are leading thinkers on these matters whose advice and inclinations will likely be followed by the larger population. As of this writing, 68% of the people who voted in this debate believe that we are already in a bubble. If 68% of Economist readers and their followers do not believe that prices will rise indefinitely, then it stands to reason that prices won’t rise and, low and behold, they haven’t. We should not be surprised by the Incredible Sinking Bubble, because it’s not really a bubble at all. In fact, it’s just the opposite: the balance has swung so far to the fear side that people believe we’re in a bubble even though we are in a boom.
Because I spend a huge portion of my time looking at new technology companies, it’s getting more and more difficult for entrepreneurs to surprise me. Nonetheless, a young entrepreneur named Ren Ng recently walked into the firm and blew my brains to bits.  You see my mind has been softened by the past 185 years of data, which left it vulnerable to Ren’s fundamental technological breakthrough. Since 1826, when French inventor Joseph Nicéphore Niépce took the first permanent image photograph, photography has worked in essentially the same way. A plane of light is captured on some medium. Now that medium has changed quite a bit over the years from paper soaked in silver chloride to silver plated copper coated with silver iodide to more recently random access computer memory, but the medium always captures a plane of light. On the front-end features like autofocus, flash, and others have been added to better capture that plane of light, but it’s still been just that plane.  It’s always been that way until right now.  Ren invented a portable technology that captures not just a plane of light, but the entire light field. A light field is defined as every beam of light in every direction at every point in space. Light field research has been going on for some time, but Ren has figured out a way to fit the technology into your pocket.  So what does this mean? People often refer to taking a picture as capturing the moment, but conventional photography does not really capture the moment. It captures one angle, one set of light, and one focus of the moment. If you are a professional photographer, you might capture the best parts of the moment. If you are someone like me, you most certainly will not. With Ren’s light field camera, you actually capture the moment or at least all of the light that visually represents the moment.  Once you have captured the moment, you can go back at any time and get the picture that you want. Specifically, after you take the picture, you can refocus, re light, and re-orient the shot.  Essentially, you can take the picture you wish you would have taken after the fact. If you are used to the old paradigm, it’s like travelling backwards through time. You can take a picture then figure out what you really wanted then go back through time and take that picture. And oh by the way, you can view the pictures in 3D. Way.  You may be thinking that this is all good and fine, but is there really a market for a magic camera? It turns out that the three biggest frustrations with conventional plane-of-light cameras are:  They are too slow—It turns out that auto focusing takes a fair amount of time. How many times have you tried to capture a moment only to have the moment disappear while you were waiting for your camera to focus? The pictures aren’t bright enough—Somehow, you didn’t actually capture enough light on the plane to get the shot you wanted. They are too complicated—Current cameras provide lots of buttons and knobs to overcome the one plane limitation, but the result is a super complicated device. With Lytro’s light field camera, you take pictures instantly. No need to focus, because you can do that later. The camera uses all of the available light in the scene, so you can take photos in very low light environments even without flash. With no buttons for special focus, the Lytro camera is dead simple.  The magic underlying magic From a technology perspective, developing the sensor that captured the light field—while requiring deep science—may have been easy part. Building software that generates a beautiful picture, or thousands of different beautiful pictures, from the light field may be the most difficult task. In fact, the software problem is so hard and so important that Lytro recruited Kurt Akeley, one of the great pioneers in computer graphics and co-founder of Silicon Graphics, to lead their software effort.  The co-founder of the most important 3D computer graphics company in history joining a camera company marks an important point of departure for the photography industry. As cameras become primarily software products in the same way that phones became primarily software products over the past several years, new industry leaders with world-class software capabilities will emerge in the same way that the phone industry has turned upside down over the past 5 years.  We are in for exciting and transformational times.  You can get a glimpse of the future right now at http://lytro.com.
We are not in a technology bubble. We have not even taken a major step towards a technology bubble. Predicting such things is a bit like predicting the end of the world; the prediction will eventually come true, but almost everyone who listens to you in the meanwhile will regret having done so.  Let us start by understanding the nature of bubbles. Warren Buffet recently made the following remarks about the housing bubble:  The only way you get a bubble is when a very high percentage of the population buys into some originally sound premise…that becomes distorted as time passes and people forget the original sound premise and start focusing solely on the price action…People overwhelmingly came to believe that house prices could not fall significantly. And since [property] was the biggest asset class in the country and it was the easiest class to borrow against it created, you know, probably the biggest bubble in our history. So let us first ask if “a very high percentage of the population” has bought into a distorted premise about the future growth prospects for technology. If they have, then we should be able to see some evidence that the dominant public technology companies are moving towards bubble valuations. Here is a telling statement from an analyst on Apple’s most recent quarter:  Apple’s stock price to earnings ratio has dropped to 16.72. Ex-cash it’s 13.5. On a forward basis (my estimates) it’s 8.3. Apple’s valuation is now a case for business historians to discuss because I don’t think there are modern precedents. —Horace Dediu, Asymco If we are in a bubble, that is a bit of an odd commentary for a company that grew revenues 83% year-over-year and grew earnings 93% year-over-year. Similarly, Google, well on its way to owning the dominant smart phone operating system and which maintains a near monopoly position in search, trades at a price/earnings (P/E) ratio (ex-cash) of around 13.7.  Amazon trades better than both with a price of 24 times last year’s cashflow. But this is still hardly a bubble multiple. For comparison, the average P/E for the Standard & Poor’s (S&P) 500 over the last 100-plus years is approximately 16x. In the last bubble, the S&P hit 44x in January 2000. Currently, the S&P is trading at 22x.  So it looks like the market leaders are trading closer to recession multiples than bubble multiples. But what about newer companies like Netflix, Salesforce.com, and LinkedIn? All of those companies trade at high multiples. Do they signal that we are moving towards a technology bubble, or are those multiples high for excellent underlying reasons (Buffet’s “sound premise”)? Before we can accurately consider the prices of these firms, we need to note the four main reasons why technology companies should be trading at higher multiples than they traded at in the past.  Generational adoption “Science advances one funeral at a time.” -Max Planck History shows that major technology cycles tend to be around 25 years long with the bulk of the purchases occurring in the last five-to-ten years. This has to do with adoption rates; this period seems about right for the oldest cohorts (less likely to adopt new technologies) to die off and for younger cohorts (quickest to use new technologies) to enter the market.  Let us look at examples of the last two major computing cycles (prior to the Internet).    As you can see, we are poised to hit the major adoption wave for the Internet technology platform over the next 8 years.  The internet is working A lot has changed since the internet bubble eleven years ago. Firstly, the cost of running an internet application has fallen 100-fold. In 2000, I was CEO of the first cloud computing company, Loudcloud, where the price for a customer running a redundant version of a basic internet application was approximately $150,000 per month. The cost of running that same application today in Amazon’s cloud costs about $1,500 per month.  Secondly, developers are more productive. In 2001, Stewart Butterfield abandoned plans to build a massively multiplayer online game (MMOG) after costs became too great; he built photo-sharing service Flickr instead. Now Stewart’s new company, Tiny Speck, is again building that MMOG, but today it is working brilliantly. Why? Because Stewart’s programmers are ten times more productive than they were in 2001 due to massive advances in programming language technology.  Thirdly, the market is far bigger. In 1998, I was working at Netscape, which owned well over half of the browser market. We had about 50 million users, more than half of them on dialup connections which could not run many interesting applications. Today, there are over 2.1 billion people on the internet, most of them using broadband connections. The true market for internet businesses is about 50 times larger than during the actual technology bubble.  With costs 100 times lower, programmer productivity ten times higher, and the market 50 times larger, it stands to reason that many more internet businesses will work today than did the last time around.  The markets for internet businesses will double in size again over the next five years International Data Corporation (IDC) estimates that there will be 1 billion mobile internet users by 2013. That estimate will prove to be low. There are currently 4.5 billion mobile phones worldwide; within five years almost all of them will be more fully featured “smart” phones offering better access to the web.  As smart phones become the volume leaders, the component costs for smart phones will fall below the corresponding component costs for low spec “feature” phones—a trend that will eventually render feature phones obsolete. As a result of smart phones replacing feature phones, the internet will double in size over the next five years.  Software is eating the world Back in 1994, very few people would have predicted that the largest bookseller in the world would be a software company. Today, not only is it a software company, but all of Amazon’s most important competitors are also software companies.  Books were just the first of many industries to be eaten by software. Some other examples:  Magazines and newspapers—really requires no explanation. Music distribution—the largest music distributor in the world is a technology company, Apple; its largest potential threat, Spotify, is a software company. Radio—the most valuable radio company in the world is Pandora, a software company. Animated film—in order for Disney to remain relevant in the animated film industry, they had to buy Pixar, a software company. Direct marketing—the largest direct marketing company in the world is a software company, Google. What is next?  Oil and gas—new finds are increasingly software driven. Financial services—many of which would be far better served by an integrated software platform. Local business—increasingly present in the online world via offerings from new companies like Groupon, Foursquare and Square. As software eats one industry after another, the market for technology business expands, rendering previous market size estimates obsolete. That is not to say that no price is too high for a technology company, but there is a fine case that the old prices are too low.  Have we taken a big step towards a bubble? So now let us look at those high multiple companies (Netflix, Salesforce and LinkedIn) in the context of these underlying trends.  First, Netflix—software is eating the world and Netflix is eating the cable industry. Much like Yahoo once lifted the valuable bits out of America Online (AOL; the US internet company), made them global, and became far more valuable than AOL, Netflix is lifting the valuable bits out of the cable business and making them global. Today, Comcast is worth $66 billion and Netflix is worth $13 billion.  Second, Salesforce.com—the internet is now working and customers like it way better than the old software model. We have over 60 companies in our portfolio and none of them use any products from the current software leader, Oracle. Nearly all of them use Salesforce.com. The company is worth $18 billion and Oracle is worth $158 billion.  Third, LinkedIn—there are now 2.1 billion people on the internet and over 100 million maintain their resumes in LinkedIn. LinkedIn is already quickly becoming the world’s recruiting database, and it seems quite logical that there will be only one (who wants to maintain their resume in more than one place?). LinkedIn has already built a series of popular recruiting products that produced $93m in revenue last quarter. The internet is growing, and LinkedIn looks like it may become a gigantic company.  I am not arguing that the above companies are not overvalued; I am simply arguing that their valuations have not become completely divorced from any rational thought. If they have not, we have not taken a major step towards a bubble.  The problem with predictions One may still argue that a bubble is coming. A bubble will almost certainly come eventually—that is the nature of human psychology and of markets.  But what is the value of predicting a bubble with no time frame? What does that even mean? If we are approaching a boom and huge growth in technology over the next several years, do you want to miss it due to the eventual bubble? If the true goal of the bubble promoters is simply to encourage caution in investing, when does that advice not apply?  For all of the reasons that I have laid out here, I urge this House to reject the motion before it.
Shortly after we started Andreessen Horowitz in mid-2009, we, along with our partners at Silver Lake Partners and Canada Pension Plan Investment Board, bought majority ownership of Skype from eBay for slightly more than $2B. The investment generated a tremendous amount of controversy for us. Marc and I were known as angel investors, so investing $50M of our new $300M fund in one deal surprised people. While consistent with our stage-agnostic strategy, it was a very big deal very early on in the fund. To make matters more exciting, other investors and writers broadly criticized the deal. Joe Nocera of the New York Times wrote:  Many people on Wall Street—and a number of telecommunications experts I spoke to this week—were stunned by the price Skype sold for, and not just because we’re in the middle of a recession. That controversy ended this morning when Microsoft announced that it was buying Skype for $8.5B 18 months after we bought it from eBay.  What it looked like back then Let’s look back at the original decision and see why it turned out well. At the time, people criticized us for two primary reasons:  1. Ebay might not have owned Skype’s underlying intellectual property.  Skype’s founders, Niklas Zennstrom and Janus Friis, held an IP claim against Skype. Many speculated that the founders would use their claim to shut down Skype and leave investors with nothing. This made the company theoretically impossible to buy. As Nocera wrote:  And so, the mystery of the Skype deal: why were the winning bidders willing to pay so a high price for a company whose very existence could be threatened by this lawsuit? One possibility is that they have nerves of steel. The other is that they know something nobody else does. 2. The shifting technology landscape would tilt the playing field away from Skype. While Skype won the original Internet telephony wars, they did so with a classic fat desktop client. From a technology standpoint, at the time, it was impossible to field a high-quality web client or mobile product, but that time wouldn’t last. Many observers believed that as the world inevitably transitioned to mobile and web, Skype would be left in the dust.  With a company as complex as Skype, investors draw different conclusions about the same facts. In this case we had the same data as everybody else, but we had a radically higher opinion of Skype’s founders and employees than the doubters and naysayers. We believed that we could work with, rather than against, the founders. And we believed that Skype’s amazing engineering team, led by the original Eastern European software wizards who created the service, could compete and win against anybody.  We specifically thought that Niklas and Janus, two of the preeminent technology entrepreneurs of our time, wanted Skype to be a huge success and would do everything in their power to make that happen. As a result, we did not think the doomsday scenario that greatly concerned other investors—that the founders would attempt to shut down the company through the courts—was an actual possibility. Based on the founders’ motivations, we felt that we’d quickly settle the IP litigation. Both sides wanted to get on with the business of making Skype more competitive and could not afford to waste time bickering about IP ownership.  We couldn’t have been more right about that. After quickly settling the litigation, both founders immediately made major contributions to the business through their energy, insight, and intellectual prowess.  And boy did we need them to do that, because we soon faced full frontal assaults from the both Google and Apple.  When giants attack In a direct attack, Google offered a free competitor to Skype’s US paid product and a heavily discounted competitor to Skype’s international product. Google then aggressively promoted these cheap products to their enormous Gmail user base by forcing every Gmail user to view Google’s Internet telephony advertisement before allowing them to access their email. What was the result of this effort? Skype new users and usage growth has accelerated since Google’s launch, culminating in:  500,000 new registered users per day 170 million connected users 30 million users communicating on the Skype platform concurrently 209 billion voice and video minutes in 2010 On the mobile front, Apple built video calling right into the iPhone, making their Facetime product the default offering for iPhone users. How did that impact Skype’s usage on the iPhone? 50 million users have downloaded Skype’s iPhone product since the release of Apple’s Facetime.  In retrospect, it was easy for people to underestimate the quality of the Skype engineering team and the power of Skype’s network effect. When we bought the company from eBay, many thought that Skype, like so many acquired technology companies, had lost its technical talent. Through our research, we found that Skype had a core group of engineers who were completely dedicated to the mission. They stayed through the eBay acquisition and were hugely determined to make Skype the communications company of the future. Over the past decade, this team consistently introduced groundbreaking technologies ranging from highly resilient and scalable peer-to-peer networking to radically higher sound quality through dramatically superior codecs. In doing so, Skype out-innovated the competition in the most important areas. When combined with its powerful network effect—how valuable is a video calling service if there is nobody to call?—Skype became a formidable competitor.  Smart move, Microsoft Today, I tip my hat to an old rival, Microsoft. By acquiring Skype, Microsoft becomes a much stronger player in mobile and the clear market leader in Internet voice and video communications. More importantly, Microsoft gets a team, ably lead by the exceptional Tony Bates, that can compete with anyone.
Great chefs find things in the style, presentation and technique used in a meal that the ordinary diner never sees. Great musicians hear things that casual listeners completely miss. CEOs evaluate other CEOs much differently than the popular press or the general population. In mainstream thinking, the absolute success of the company determines the CEO’s success. It doesn’t matter how she got there; results count and nothing else does. CEOs, by contrast, recognize that markets, circumstances and luck factor into the equation in a big way. Warren Buffet once said that he likes to invest in businesses that can be run by a ham sandwich. CEOs won’t give another CEO credit for being a ham sandwich no matter how successful her business becomes.  When you start a company, the decision about which market to pursue comes early and lasts a very long time. If you start out building automobiles, you won’t likely pivot over to become an online advertising network. As a result, the CEO’s job is to optimize the company in the current market or move to an adjacent market. Some CEOs find themselves unopposed in gigantic markets while others face brutal competition in smaller markets. A CEO who achieves a good outcome in the latter case might do a far better job than a CEO who achieves a great outcome in the former.  This is why among CEOs, people like Reed Hastings, CEO of Netflix, and Bill Campbell, former CEO of Intuit, rank far higher than their counterparts who ran bigger and more valuable companies like Jack Welch, former CEO of General Electric.  Alfred the Great In the last decade, the CEO that I admired most was Alfred Chuang. Alfred, also known as the “A” in BEA, began his career at BEA as the company’s Chief Architect. An irrepressible leader, Alfred was soon promoted to run all of engineering. In that role, he championed the acquisition of a little known company named Weblogic. When Alfred presented the acquisition to BEA’s board of directors, one prominent board member said: “if you think that this company is going to pay $150M for a company with $150K in revenue, you are out of your f&%!$n’ mind.” Alfred, a man long on courage, remained steadfast in his position and completed the acquisition.  Now personally responsible for the aforementioned massive risk, Alfred volunteered to leave his position as Vice President of Engineering and Chief Technology Officer to be the General Manager of the then tiny Weblogic division in the crowded, nascent Application Server market. Over the next several years, Alfred thrashed the competition and grew Weblogic into the category leader. He then grew Application Servers into the most important new category in enterprise infrastructure software since the Relational Database. As a direct result, Weblogic became the bulk of BEA’s revenue and profits and the Weblogic brand became more important than the BEA brand. Alfred’s tiny, expensive acquisition became the company and the company became great. In recognition of his phenomenal vision and execution, BEA named Alfred its new Chief Executive Officer in October 2001.  By revolutionizing the enterprise computing market with the Application Server category, Alfred generated ferocious competition from industry behemoths: IBM, Oracle, Sun, HP, and the new, powerful open source movement. Typically, in an intensely competitive enterprise software business, it is extremely difficult to fund important new products, as every nickel must be deployed to win the core category. This challenge proves even more difficult when the company is publicly traded and must satisfy quarterly earnings expectations. I remember watching with great admiration when Alfred, running BEA in this exact situation, redeployed more than half the resources on the dominant application server to new, strategic efforts. Only an elite CEO would dare make that kind of bet. And the bet paid off. Despite incredible head winds, BEA kept growing and kept leading the category.  In the end, being a publicly traded company proved to be the company’s Achilles heel. Impatient and shortsighted shareholders forced Alfred to sell BEA to Oracle in January of 2008 for $8.5B. On the surface, an excellent outcome, but in 2012 Oracle will exceed that number in annual revenue from the BEA product family. Sometimes only weak-kneed investors can defeat a great CEO.  The New Company Being a competent CEO requires great knowledge: knowledge of the products, the people, the market, and the competition. Acquiring this type of knowledge can be both grueling and humbling. It does not exist in boardrooms, executive off-sites or high-level customer meetings. It lives at the bottom of the company’s hierarchy where the work gets done. It lives in the code base, the individual contributors and customers who directly use the products. Most previously successful CEOs attempt to cheat this process by quickly assembling a team of people to tend to the details. So how would Alfred, coming off a role managing thousands of people, billions of dollars in revenue, and achieving an $8.5B outcome, go about starting a new company? He’d start by dusting off his compiler and architecting the first product. That’s what a CEO’s CEO does.  The transition from today’s web back-end architectures to tomorrow’s cloud computing will result in profound benefits. Specifically, application developers will be freed for the first time ever from the physical constraints of the infrastructure enabling them to develop radically better solutions. Over time, every existing application will be rewritten to take advantage of the cloud and these benefits. In addition, an incredible new class of never-before-possible applications will be developed.  So, when Alfred Chuang, the greatest CEO of my time, told me he was building a completely modern cloud-based platform for enterprises, it did not take me long to invest. I am honored and humbled to be the newest investor and board member for Magnet, Alfred’s new company.
Recently, Eric Schmidt stepped down as CEO of Google and founder Larry Page took over. Much of the news coverage focused on Page’s ability to be the “face of Google” as Page is far more shy and introverted than the gregarious and articulate Schmidt. While an interesting issue, this analysis misses the main point. Eric Schmidt was much more than Google’s front man; as Google’s peacetime Chief Executive, he led the greatest technology business expansion in the last ten years. Larry Page, in contrast, seems to have determined that Google is moving into war and he clearly intends to be a wartime CEO. This will be a profound change for Google and the entire high-tech industry.  Definitions and Examples Peacetime in business means those times when a company has a large advantage vs. the competition in its core market, and its market is growing. In times of peace, the company can focus on expanding the market and reinforcing the company’s strengths.  In wartime, a company is fending off an imminent existential threat. Such a threat can come from a wide range of sources including competition, dramatic macro economic change, market change, supply chain change, and so forth. The great wartime CEO Andy Grove marvelously describes the forces that can take a company from peacetime to wartime in his book Only The Paranoid Survive.  A classic peacetime mission is Google’s effort to make the Internet faster. Google’s position in the search market is so dominant that they determined that anything that makes the Internet faster accrues to their benefit as it enables users to do more searches. As the clear market leader, they focus more on expanding the market than dealing with their search competitors. In contrast, a classic wartime mission was Andy Grove’s drive to get out of the memory business in the mid 1980s due to an irrepressible threat from the Japanese semiconductor companies. In this mission, the competitive threat—which could have bankrupted the company—was so great that Intel had to exit its core business, which employed 80% of its staff.  In my personal experience, I was a peacetime CEO for about 9 months, then a wartime CEO for the next 7 years. My greatest management discovery through that transition was that peacetime and wartime require radically different management styles. Interestingly, most management books describe peacetime CEO techniques while very few describe wartime. For example, a basic principle in most management books is that you should never embarrass an employee in a public setting. On the other hand, in a room filled with people, Andy Grove once said to an employee who entered the meeting late: “All I have in this world is time, and you are wasting my time.” Why such different approaches to management?  In peacetime, leaders must maximize and broaden the current opportunity. As a result, peacetime leaders employ techniques to encourage broad-based creativity and contribution across a diverse set of possible objectives. In wartime, by contrast, the company typically has a single bullet in the chamber and must, at all costs, hit the target. The company’s survival in wartime depends upon strict adherence and alignment to the mission.  When Steve Jobs returned to Apple, the company was weeks away from bankruptcy—a classic wartime scenario. He needed everyone to move with precision and follow his exact plan; there was no room for individual creativity outside of the core mission. In stark contrast, as Google achieved dominance in the search market, Google’s management fostered peacetime innovation by enabling and even requiring every employee to spend 20% of their time on their own new projects.  Peacetime and Wartime management techniques can both be highly effective when employed in the right situations, but they are very different.  The Peacetime CEO does not resemble the Wartime CEO.  Peacetime CEO/Wartime CEO Peacetime CEO knows that proper protocol leads to winning. Wartime CEO violates protocol in order to win.  Peacetime CEO focuses on the big picture and empowers her people to make detailed decisions. Wartime CEO cares about a speck of dust on a gnat’s ass if it interferes with the prime directive.  Peacetime CEO builds scalable, high volume recruiting machines. Wartime CEO does that, but also builds HR organizations that can execute layoffs.  Peacetime CEO spends time defining the culture. Wartime CEO lets the war define the culture.  Peacetime CEO always has a contingency plan. Wartime CEO knows that sometimes you gotta roll a hard six.  Peacetime CEO knows what to do with a big advantage. Wartime CEO is paranoid.  Peacetime CEO strives not to use profanity. Wartime CEO sometimes uses profanity purposefully.  Peacetime CEO thinks of the competition as other ships in a big ocean that may never engage. Wartime CEO thinks the competition is sneaking into her house and trying to kidnap her children.  Peacetime CEO aims to expand the market. Wartime CEO aims to win the market.  Peacetime CEO strives to tolerate deviations from the plan when coupled with effort and creativity.  Wartime CEO is completely intolerant.  Peacetime CEO does not raise her voice. Wartime CEO rarely speaks in a normal tone.  Peacetime CEO works to minimize conflict. Wartime CEO heightens the contradictions.  Peacetime CEO strives for broad based buy in. Wartime CEO neither indulges consensus-building nor tolerates disagreements.  Peacetime CEO sets big, hairy audacious goals. Wartime CEO is too busy fighting the enemy to read management books written by consultants who have never managed a fruit stand.  Peacetime CEO trains her employees to ensure satisfaction and career development. Wartime CEO trains her employees so they don’t get their ass shot off in the battle.  Peacetime CEO has rules like “we’re going to exit all businesses where we’re not number 1 or 2.”  Wartime CEO often has no businesses that are number 1 or 2 and therefore does not have the luxury of following that rule.  Can a CEO Be Both? Can a CEO build the skill sets to lead in both peacetime and wartime?  One could easily argue that I failed as a peacetime CEO, but succeeded as a wartime one. John Chambers had a great run as peacetime CEO of Cisco, but has struggled as Cisco has moved into war with Juniper, HP, and a range of new competitors. Steve Jobs, who employs a classical wartime management style, removed himself as CEO of Apple in the 1980s during their longest period of peace before coming back to Apple for a spectacular run more than a decade later during their most intense war period.  I believe that the answer is yes, but it’s hard. Mastering both wartime and peacetime skill sets means understanding the many rules of management and knowing when to follow them and when to violate them.  Be aware that management books tend to be written by management consultants who study successful companies during their times of peace. As a result, the resulting books describe the methods of peacetime CEOs. In fact, other than the books written by Andy Grove, I don’t know of any management books that teach you how to manage in wartime like Steve Jobs or Andy Grove.  Back to the Beginning In the Search Market, Google remains dominant, but in social networking Google must come from behind. Will Google soar or struggle under Page? That depends on how effective a wartime CEO he turns out to be. It may depend even more on whether the most characteristically peacetime company in the industry can make the cultural transition into war.
By far the most difficult skill for me to learn as CEO was the ability to manage my own psychology. Organizational design, process design, metrics, hiring and firing were all relatively straightforward skills to master compared to keeping my mind in check. Over the years, I’ve spoken to hundreds of CEOs all with the same experience. Nonetheless, very few people talk about it and I have never read anything on the topic. It’s like the fight club of management: The first rule of the CEO psychological meltdown is don’t talk about the psychological meltdown.  At risk of violating the sacred rule, I will attempt to describe the condition and prescribe some techniques that helped me. In the end, this is the most personal and important battle that any CEO will face.  If I’m Doing a Good Job, Why Do I Feel So Bad? Generally, someone doesn’t become CEOs unless she has a high sense of purpose and cares deeply about the work she does. In addition, a CEO must be accomplished enough or smart enough that people will want to work for her. Nobody sets out to be a bad CEO, run a dysfunctional organization, or create a massive bureaucracy that grinds her company to a screeching halt. Yet no CEO ever has a smooth path to a great company. Along the way, many things go wrong and all of them could have and should have been avoided.  The first problem is that everybody learns to be a CEO by being a CEO. No training as a manager, general manager or any other job actually prepares you to run a company. The only thing that prepares you to run a company is running a company. This means that you will face a broad set of things that you don’t know how to do that require skills that you don’t have. Nevertheless, everybody will expect you to know how to do them, because, well, you are the CEO. I remember when I first became CEO, an investor asked me to send him the “cap table.” I had a vague idea of what he meant, but I didn’t actually know what the format was supposed to look like or what should be included or excluded. It was a silly little thing and I had much bigger things to worry about, but everything is hard when you don’t actually know what you are doing and I wasted quite a bit of time sweating over that stupid spreadsheet.  Even if you know what you are doing, things go wrong. Things go wrong, because building a multi-faceted human organization to compete and win in a dynamic, highly competitive market turns out to be really hard. If CEOs were graded on a curve, the mean on the test would be 22 out of a 100. This kind of mean can be psychologically challenging for a straight A student. It is particularly challenging, because nobody tells you that the mean is 22.  If you manage a team of 10 people, it’s quite possible to do so with very few mistakes or bad behaviors. If you manage an organization of 1,000 people it is quite impossible. At a certain size, your company will do things that are so bad that you never imagined that you’d be associated with that kind of incompetence. Seeing people fritter away money, waste each other’s time, and do sloppy work can make you feel bad. If you are the CEO, it may well make you sick.  And to rub salt into the wound and make matters worse, it’s your fault.  Nobody to Blame You can’t blame Jazz Musicians or David Stern with his NBA fashion issues —Nas, Hip Hop is Dead  When people in my company would complain about something or other being broken such as the expense reporting process, I would joke that it was all my fault. The joke was funny, because it wasn’t really a joke. Every problem in the company was indeed my fault. As the founding CEO, every hire and every decision that the company ever made happened under my direction. Unlike a hired gun that comes in and blames all of the problems on the prior regime, there was literally nobody for me to blame.  If someone was promoted for all the wrong reasons, that was my fault. If we missed the quarterly earnings target, that was my fault. If a great engineer quit, that was my fault. If the sales team made unreasonable demands on the product organization, then that was my fault. If the product had too many bugs, that was my fault. It kind of sucked to be me.  Being responsible for everything and getting a 22 on the test starts to weigh on your consciousness.  Too Much Broken Stuff Given this stress, CEOs often make the one of the following two mistakes:  They take things too personally They do not take things personally enough In the first scenario, the CEO takes every issue incredibly seriously and personally and urgently moves to fix it. Given the volume of the issues, this motion usually results in one of two scenarios. If the CEO is outwardly focused, she ends up terrorizing the team to the point where nobody wants to work at the company any more. If the CEO is inwardly focused, she ends up feeling so sick from all of the problems that she can barely make it to work in the morning.  In the second scenario, in order to dampen the pain of the rolling disaster that is the company, the CEO takes a Pollyannaish attitude: it’s not so bad. In this view, none of the problems are actually that bad and they needn’t be dealt with urgently. By rationalizing away the issues, the CEO feels better about herself. The problem is that she doesn’t actually fix any of the problems and the employees eventually become quite frustrated that the Chief Executive keeps ignoring the most basic problems and conflicts. Ultimately, the company turns to crap.  Ideally, the CEO will be urgent yet not insane. She will move aggressively and decisively without feeling emotionally culpable. If she can separate the importance of the issues from how she feels about them, she will avoid demonizing her employees or herself.  It’s a Lonely Job And this loneliness won’t leave me alone —Otis Redding, (Sittin’ On) The Dock of the Bay  In your darkest moments as CEO, discussing fundamental questions about the viability of your company with your employees can have obvious negative consequences. On the other hand, talking to your board and outside advisors can be fruitless. The knowledge gap between you and them is so vast that you cannot actually bring them fully up to speed in a manner that’s useful in making the decision. You are all alone.  At Loudcloud, when the dot com bubble burst and subsequently sent most of our customers into bankruptcy, it crippled our business and devastated our balance sheet. Or rather, that was one interpretation. Another interpretation, and necessarily the official story for the company, was that we still had plenty of money in the bank and were signing up traditional enterprise customers at an impressive rate. Which interpretation was closer to the truth? In the absence of someone to talk to, that’s a question that I asked myself about 3,000 times. As an aside, asking oneself anything 3,000 times turns out to be a bad idea. In this case, I had two specific difficult questions:  What if the official interpretation was wrong?  What if I was misleading everyone from investors to employees? In that case, I should be removed from my position immediately. What if the official interpretation was right? What if I was grinding my brain into sawdust for no reason at all? What if I was taking the company off track by questioning my own direction? In that case, I should be removed from my position immediately. As is usually the case, there was no way to know which interpretation was right until much later. It turned out that neither was actually right. The new customers didn’t save us, but we figured out another way to survive and ultimately succeed. The key to getting to the right outcome was to keep from getting married to either the positive or the dark narrative.  My friend Jason Rosenthal took over as CEO of Ning about a year ago. As soon as he became CEO, he faced a cash crisis and had to choose amongst three difficult choices: 1. Radically reduce the size of the company or 2. Sell the company or 3. Raise money in a highly dilutive way.  Think about those choices:  Lay off a large set of talented employees whom he worked very hard to recruit and, as a result, likely severely damage the morale of the remaining people. Sell out all of the employees who he had been working side-by-side with for the past several years (Jason was promoted into the position), by selling the company without giving them a chance to perform or fulfill their mission. Drastically reduce the ownership position of the employees and make their hard work economically meaningless. Choices like these separate the women from the girls. Tip to aspiring entrepreneurs: if you don’t like choosing between horrible and cataclysmic, don’t become CEO. Jason sought advice from some of the best minds in the industry, but ultimately he was completely alone in the final decision. Nobody had the answer and whatever the answer, Jason was the one who had to live with the consequences. So far his decision to reduce staff by letting go of primarily the most recent hires has paid off. Revenue at Ning is soaring and team morale is high. If it had gone worse (or ultimately goes bad), it will be all Jason’s fault and it will be up to Jason to find a new answer. Whenever I see Jason, I like to say: “welcome to the show.”  At times like the above, it’s important to understand that nearly every company goes through life-threatening moments. My partner Scott Weiss relayed that it’s so common that there is an acronym for it: WFIO which stands for We’re F#%ked, It’s Over (it’s pronounced whiff-ee-yo). As he describes it, every company goes through at least two and up to five of these episodes (although, I’m pretty sure that I went through at least a dozen at Opsware). In all cases, WFIOs feel much worse than they are—especially for the CEO.  Techniques to Calm Your Nerves The problem with psychology is that everybody’s is slightly different. With that as a caveat, over the years I developed a few techniques for dealing with myself. Hopefully, you find them useful too.  Make some friends—Although it’s nearly impossible to get high quality advice on the tough decisions that you make, it is extremely useful from a psychological perspective to talk to people who have been through similarly challenging decisions. My friend Bill Campbell was a huge help to me as CEO, but interestingly it wasn’t his great success running Intuit that I found most useful; it was his disastrous experience running Go. Through that experience and his most traumatic days at Intuit (like laying off 1/3 of the company), Bill learned a tremendous amount about how to think about excruciatingly difficult decisions from a psychological perspective.  Get it out of your head and onto paper—When I had to explain to Bill and the rest of my board that, as a public company, I thought that it would be best if we sold all of our customers and all of our revenue and changed business, it was messing with my mind. In order to finalize that decision, I wrote down a detailed explanation of my logic. The process of writing that document separated me from my own psychology and enabled me to make the decision swiftly.  Focus on the road not the wall—When they train racecar drivers, one of the first lessons is when you are going around a curve at 200 MPH, do not focus on the wall; focus on the road. If you focus on the wall, you will drive right into it. If you focus on the road, you will follow the road. Running a company is like that. There are always a thousand things that can go wrong and sink the ship. If you focus too much on them, you will drive yourself nuts and likely capsize your company. Focus on where you are going rather than on what you hope to avoid.  A Final Word of Advice—Don’t Punk Out and Don’t Quit As CEO, there will be many times when you feel like quitting. I have seen CEOs try to cope with the stress by drinking heavily, checking out, and even quitting. In each case, the CEO has a marvelous rationalization why it was OK for him to punk out or quit, but none them will ever be great CEOs. Great CEOs face the pain. They deal with the sleepless nights, the cold sweat, and what my friend the great Alfred Chuang (legendary founder and CEO of BEA Systems) calls “the torture.” Whenever I meet a successful CEO, I ask them how they did it. Mediocre CEOs point to their brilliant strategic moves or their intuitive business sense or a variety of other self-congratulatory explanations. The great CEOs tend to be remarkably consistent in their answers. They all say: “I didn’t quit.”
Lately, everybody seems to be talking about a new technology bubble. Many very smart CEOs, VCs, reporters, and analysts can’t seem to stop worrying about the second coming of the dot com bust. Are the prognosticators correct? Will we head mercilessly into another crash? I don’t think so.  A Comparison Between Today’s “Bubble” and the Last Tech Bubble Since so many distinguished people report a broad variety of qualitative bubble signs, let’s attempt to pattern match the quantitative data. As we do so, keep in mind that the relevant bubble statistic is not valuation. It’s the valuation:value ratio. High valuations are fine if the underlying value is there. Let’s look at public market comparables and venture capital flows to see if we can find a match.  1. Public market comparables In the great bubble of 1998-2000, the boom in public valuations mirrored the boom in private valuations. Similarly, in recent high profile private financing rounds for private technology companies with valuations over $1B, the valuation multiples were at or below corresponding multiples for publicly traded companies such as Google. This has generally been the case for the bulk of deals that we’ve seen at Andreessen Horowitz. If publicly traded technology companies are not at bubble-like prices, then private technology valuations aren’t either because they are roughly equivalent.  To find out whether or not today’s public technology companies have hit bubble valuations, let’s compare some companies that survived the great bubble with their bubble era valuations:     The Enterprise Value-to-Revenue multiple (EV/Rev) and Price-to-Earnings multiple (PE) are commonly used metrics to tell the valuation:value story. Companies that produce little value today might still receive high valuations due to high growth expectations. The PEG Ratio normalizes the valuation:value ratio for growth expectations by tracking the valuation:value ratio per unit of expected earnings growth.  Bubble era valuation multiples were more than 10 times higher than current comparable multiples. As you can see, not all of these multiples are comparable as some of the bubble era multiples were NM—not meaningful—due to negative earnings. This means that the valuations ascribed to these companies were not quantitatively based on the earnings they were generating or projected to generate.  The valuation:value ratio of today’s private and public technology companies look nothing like the bubble ratios.  2. Venture capital flows A basic driver for a private technology market bubble is the over-supply of venture capital into the sector. If too much venture capital hits the streets, valuations will bubble up. The inflation-adjusted data from the last bubble tells the story:  In the 3-year period from 1998-2000, venture capital firms raised more than $200 billion, which represented about 0.55% of the national GDP. To put that in perspective, that’s more money than the entire venture industry raised collectively over the prior 18 years.  Flush with lots of capital, venture capital firms naturally invested at historically high rates—from 1998-2000 alone, venture capital investments also topped $200 billion.  Again, more dollars were invested in this single 3-year period than in total over the prior 18 years.  Now let’s take a look at the current version of the same inflation-adjusted data:  Total venture capital raised from 2008-2010 was just shy of $55 billion, about 0.12% of the national GDP, with the trajectory of capital raising declining in each year. In fact, 2010 venture capital fundraising is at the same level as it was in 1995 and 1996.  Approximately $90 billion has been invested by the venture capital industry from 2008-2010—less than half of the 1998-2000 level. More significantly, total capital invested should continue to remain constrained in light of the significant reduction in new venture capital dollars raised over the last 3 years. Keep in mind that because the life of a venture capital fund is generally 10 years, it takes a while to see the impact of lesser fundraising on total dollars invested.  The inflows don’t actually look that bubblicious.  The Long Awaited Arrival of the Internet Boom Looking at the numbers in the previous section, you may be wondering: “how in the world did people get so totally out of control in the last bubble?” The short answer is that the expectations of the great Internet boom vastly outstripped the actual activity. Specifically, the market wasn’t nearly as big as anticipated and the products were not nearly as good as imagined—at the time.  When Netscape peaked in the late 90s, we had 90% market share and 50 million users. The total Consumer Internet market was 55 million people. That’s about 36X smaller than today’s 2B. Worse yet, over ½ of those 55 million were dialup users. In addition, to horrible bandwidth and latency, the technology products were very crude in other ways. Programming languages were radically less functional, hardware was literally a hundred times more expensive, and there was no virtualization or cloud computing or AJAX. Constrained by such an early and weak technology platform, companies built poor applications. As a result, the expectations of what the Internet would be radically outstripped the reality of what it was. And hence the great crash of 2000 and 2001.  Since then and over the last 10 years, everything has gotten better. Much better. Servers moved from proprietary systems made by Sun, IBM, and HP to commodity hardware at a fraction of the price while radically improving in performance. The open source movement dramatically reduced the cost and improved the quality of systems software. Average consumer bandwidth increased 100 fold due to cable modems, DSL, and high-speed wireless networks. Cloud computing, which was not available then, now enables companies to build massively scalable products with very little initial capital outlay. The combination of the Internet and open source transformed the functionality in modern programming tools, increasing developer productivity 10 fold. The resulting applications have been so easy to use that even older generations of consumers now rapidly adopt new technology like Facebook. And there are 2 billion people on the Internet. All of these factors have led to an exciting new set of leading companies, including a special few which grew to over a billion dollars in annual revenue in less than 5 years. Welcome to the great Internet Boom of 2011.  At this point, you may still be worried about the startling rise in valuations of privately held technology companies. As I mentioned before, privately held technology companies trade at reasonable valuations vs. publicly traded comparable companies. These public companies trade at reasonable valuations vs. historical precedents.  In addition, these companies are significantly more mature—in terms of revenue and profit generation—than their counterparts in the last bubble. For example, the 1998 IPO class had average revenue of $120 million (and net losses of $65 million to boot). If you just look at the tech IPOs that have been completed year to date from 2010, the average revenue of this group is north of $300 million.  What about companies with reportedly very little revenue and very high valuations such as Twitter? A good investing rule of thumb is that any company that simultaneously saves Charlie Sheen’s career and starts a revolution in Egypt may be on to something. While Twitter doesn’t make that much money yet, historically media companies that capture hundreds of millions of highly engaged users tend to be make money.  Where do we go from here? You still may be thinking that Twitter and Zynga are great, but now it’s really over—there is no new opportunity. If you think that, you’d be wrong again.  In addition to the unprecedented number of people now reachable via the Internet, we are at the very beginning a gargantuan new technology cycle: the move from Web/PC computing to cloud and mobile.  Back when I was a youngster in the early 80s, the technology landscape shifted from Mainframe to Client/Server computing. Interestingly the biggest opportunity wasn’t investing in the lighter weight computers that replaced the mainframes, but rather in new products created due to other results of the change. When you don’t have to pay for computing cycles on a MIP/minute basis, developers can change the way they program. The first major change was the move to relational database technology. Relational databases notoriously wasted CPU cycles vs. the old hierarchical databases such as IMS. However, if you didn’t care about CPU cycles, then you could easily cut your database development time by a factor of 10 or more and radically reduce the level of expertise required. By moving to the relational model, developers were released from the tedium of navigating hierarchical databases and used their new found freedom to rewrite every existing application from financial systems to HR applications and wrote a whole set of new systems like Customer Relationship Management. The relational database and application boom created hugely valuable new companies such as Oracle, Siebel Systems, and PeopleSoft. It didn’t stop there. As a result of the shift in application architecture, the old computing infrastructure became inappropriate and created new companies in Networking, Storage, and Management Software like Cisco and EMC.  The shift to cloud computing will have a more profound impact on the computing ecosystem than the shift to client/server. As with client/server, one of the first technologies to break has been the database. Application developers, no longer constrained by the massive administrative costs to set up servers, can solve previously impossible problems by seamlessly adding more hardware—except at the database layer. As a result, dozens of new exciting companies have emerged to replace the old “scale up” relational technology with new scale out solutions. Moving up the stack, everything about today’s application architectures suffers from the performance, scale, and programming model constraints of relational databases. Much like in the days of hierarchical databases, there is a large and important set of functionality that developers dare not tackle due to these limitations. New application companies like WorkDay and Proferi that take advantage of the cloud to deliver never-before-possible solutions, will devastate their old school RDBMS-based competitors.  While server virtualization enabled cloud computing on the server tier, it broke the current networking and storage architectures leading the way for the next generation of decabillion dollar companies in those categories. In the cloud, where applications have been completely decoupled from the underlying infrastructure, the old network and systems management software no longer works leading to an opportunity for a new company to grab that $30B market.  The greatest beneficiary of the mainframe->client/server shift was a software company called Microsoft which took full advantage of the switch from dumb ASCII terminals to personal computers. Microsoft broke the mold by delivering solutions to both consumers and enterprises and leading the original consumerization of the enterprise. As today’s clients move from PCs to mobile devices, a huge set of opportunities will emerge for new companies to solve important problems.  The very largest opportunities will likely come from companies for which there are no analogy or precedent. Profound new platforms open the market to ideas never before imaginable.  Conclusion While we can see many signs of a bubble these days, it’s important to keep in mind that signs of a bubble look almost exactly the same as signs of a boom. In fact, it’s usually not a bubble until everyone agrees that it’s a boom. As Warren Buffett said about the housing bubble:  The basic cause was, you know, embedded in, partly in psychology, partly in reality in a growing and finally pervasive belief that house prices couldn’t go down. And everybody succumbed, virtually everybody succumbed to that. But that’s, the only way you get a bubble is when basically a very high percentage of the population buys into some originally sound premise—and it’s quite interesting how that develops—originally sound premise that becomes distorted as time passes and people forget the original sound premise and start focusing solely on the price action. So the media, investors, mortgage bankers, the American public, me, you know, my neighbor, rating agencies, Congress, you name it. People overwhelmingly came to believe that house prices could not fall significantly. And since it was the biggest asset class in the country and it was the easiest class to borrow against it created, you know, probably the biggest bubble in our history. It’ll be a bubble that will be remembered along with South Sea bubble. Will all the excitement around the opportunities created by the Internet and the shift to cloud/mobile computing eventually lead to a bubble? Absolutely. Are we in a bubble today? I don’t think so.
Often when I meet with startups, the employees have no job titles. This makes sense, because everybody is just working to build the company. Roles needn’t be clearly defined and, in fact, can’t be, because everyone does a little bit of everything. In an environment like this there are no politics and nobody is jockeying for position or authority. It’s rather nice. So why do all organizations eventually create job titles and what is the proper way to manage them?  Why do titles matter? Two important factors drive all companies to eventually create job titles:  Employees want them—while you may plan to work at your company forever, at least some of your employees need to plan for life after your company. When your head of sales interviews for her next job, she won’t want to say that despite the fact that she ran a global sales force with hundreds of employees, her title was “Dude.” Eventually, people need to know who is whom—As companies grow, everybody won’t know everybody else. Importantly, employees won’t know what each other do and whom they should work with to get their jobs done. Job titles provide an excellent short hand for describing roles in the company. In addition, customers and business partners can also make use of this short hand to figure out how to best work with your company. Beyond these core reasons, employees will use titles to calibrate their value and compensation against their colleagues. If an employee with a title of Junior Engineer believes that she is a far better programmer than her counterpart with the title Senior Architect, this will indicate to her that she may be under paid and undervalued. Because titles will be used to calculate relative value, they must be managed carefully.  The Dangers: The Peter Principle and The Law of Crappy People The basics seem obvious, so why does almost every company eventually make serious mistakes regarding titles. If you have ever worked in a company, you have probably thought to yourself about some overly promoted executive: “How did he get to be a Vice President? I wouldn’t let him manage a lemonade stand.”  One challenge is the Peter Principle. Coined by Dr. Laurence J. Peter and Raymond Hull in their 1969 book, The Peter Principle holds that in a hierarchy, members are promoted so long as they work competently. Sooner or later they are promoted to a position at which they are no longer competent (their “level of incompetence”), and there they remain being unable to earn further promotions. As Andy Grove points out in his management classic High Output Management, the Peter Principle is unavoidable, because there is no way to know a priori at what level in the hierarchy a manager will be incompetent.  Another challenge is a phenomenon that I call The Law of Crappy People. The Law of Crappy People states:  For any title level in a large organization, the talent on that level will eventually converge to the crappiest person with the title. The rationale behind the law is that the other employees in the company with lower titles will naturally benchmark themselves against the crappiest person at the next level. For example, if Jasper is the worst Vice President in the company, then all of the Directors will benchmark themselves against Jasper and demand promotions as soon as they reach Jasper’s low level of competency.  As with the Peter Principle, the best that you can do is mitigate the Law of Crappy People and that mitigation will be critically important to the quality of your company.  Promotion Process The best way to mitigate both the Peter Principle and the Law of Crappy People is with a properly constructed and highly disciplined promotion process. Ideally, the promotion process should yield a result similar to the very best Karate Dojos. In top Dojos, in order to achieve the next level (e.g. being promoted from a brown belt to a black belt), you must defeat an opponent in combat at that level. This guarantees that a new black belt is never a worse fighter than the worst current black belt.  Frustratingly, there is no exact analog to a fistfight in business, so how can we preserve quality without actual combat?  To begin, start with an extremely crisp definition of not only the responsibilities at each level, but the skill required to perform the duties. When describing the skills, avoid the generic characterizations such as “must be competent at managing a P&L” or “must have excellent management skills.” In fact, the best leveling tools get extremely specific and even name names: “should be a superstar recruiter – as good as Jenny Rogers.”  Next, define a formal process for all promotions. One key requirement of the process should be that promotions will be leveled across groups. If you let a manager or a single chain of command determine promotions unilaterally, then it’s possible that e.g. HR will have 5 Vice Presidents and Engineering will have 1. One way to level across groups is to hold a regular promotions counsel that reviews every significant promotion in the company. When a manager wishes to promote an employee, she will submit that employee for review with an explanation of why she believes her employee satisfies the skill criteria required for the level. The committee should then compare the employee to both the level’s skill description and the skills of the other employees at that level to determine whether or not to approve the promotion. In addition to ensuring fairness and level quality, this process will serve to educate your entire management team on the skills and accomplishments of the employees being submitted for promotion.  Andreessen vs. Zuckerberg: How Big Should the Titles Be? Should your company make Vice President the top title or should you have Chief Marketing Officers, Chief Revenue Officers, Chief People Officer’s, and Chief Snack Officers? There are two schools of thought regarding this. One characterized by Marc Andreessen and the other by Mark Zuckerberg.  Andreessen argues that people ask for many things from a company: salary, bonus, stock options, span of control, and titles. Of those, title is by far the cheapest, so it makes sense to give the highest titles possible. The hierarchy should have Presidents, Chiefs, and Senior Executive Vice Presidents. If it makes people feel better, let them feel better. Titles cost nothing. Better yet, when competing for new employees with other companies, using Andreessen’s method you can always outbid the competition in at least one dimension.  At Facebook, by contrast, Mark Zuckerberg purposely deploys titles that are significantly lower than the industry standard. Senior Vice President’s at other companies must take title haircuts down to Directors or Managers at Facebook. Why does he do this? First, he guarantees that every new employee gets re-leveled as they enter his company. In this way, he avoids accidentally giving new employees higher titles and positions than better performing existing employees. This boosts morale and increases fairness. Secondly, it forces all the managers of Facebook to deeply understand and internalize Facebook’s leveling system which serves the company extremely well in their own promotion and compensation processes.  He also wants titles to be meaningful and reflect who has influence in the organization. As a company grows quickly, it’s important to provide organizational clarity wherever possible and that gets more difficult if there are 50 VPs and 10 Chiefs.  Next, he finds that business people often carry inflated titles vs. their engineering counterparts. While he recognizes that big titles help them out externally with getting meetings, he still wants to have an organization where the product people and engineers form the cultural core, so he strives to keep this in check as well.  Does Facebook ever miss out on a new hire due to its low titles? Yes, definitely. But one might argue that they miss out on precisely the employees that they don’t want. In fact, both the hiring and on-boarding processes at Facebook have been carefully designed to encourage the right kind of employees to self-select themselves in and the wrong ones to select themselves out.  So which method is better, Andreessen’s or Zuckerberg’s? The answer is that it depends. Facebook has so many advantages in recruiting employees that being disciplined about absolute title levels does not significantly impair their ability to attract the very best talent. Your company might not have these advantages, so lofty titles may be a good tactic. In either scenario, you should still run a highly disciplined internal leveling and promotion process.  Final Thought You might think that so much time spent on promotions and titles places too much importance and focus on silly formalisms. The opposite is actually true. Without a well-thought out, disciplined process for titles and promotions, your employees will become obsessed with the resulting inequities. If you structure things properly, nobody other than you will spend much time thinking about titles other than Employee of the Month.
In my career, I have never seen a position in any industry with more varying criteria than General Partner at a venture capital firm. Some firms hire pure investors, some firms hire operators, some Wall Street analysts, some firms hire sales people, some firms hire lawyers, and others hire reporters. Interestingly, many different models have worked, but in all cases the criteria by which the General Partner is selected says a lot about what you should expect as an entrepreneur from the firm. With that in mind, I will explain in detail our criteria at AH in the context of the type of firm that we strive to build and our newest general partner, Scott Weiss.  When we started Andreessen Horowitz, our vision was to build the kind of venture capital firm that we would have wanted to take money from. For us that meant a broad set of capabilities for the firm and a sharp view of what kind of general partners that we wanted. Two aspects of the original vision that deeply depend on the kind of general partners that we hire are:  We will help develop founders into CEOs We will have deep respect for the entrepreneurial process A Little Help Many VCs excel at picking companies, evaluating CEOs and bringing in professional CEOs, but generally do very little to help a promising founder develop into a CEO. We believe that founding CEOs run the very best technology companies, so naturally we wanted the firm to focus on this issue. As a founder who developed into a CEO, I know that there is no manual and it is a nearly vertical learning curve. If you have never been a CEO, the number of things that you must learn can be absolutely staggering. So staggering that you might not even be sure what to ask.  By staffing with general partners who have founded companies and run them, we can answer some of those questions without the entrepreneurs having to ask because we’ve been down the same path and made the same mistakes. Basically, our entrepreneurs can learn from our screw-ups.  Euphoria and Terror: The Entrepreneurial Process If you have ever started a company, you most certainly know the intense level of uncertainty and anxiety that’s fundamentally part of the process. When we started Loudcloud, for a time I was so unbalanced that my insides literally felt like they were boiling. One particularly challenging day, my co-founder (and current partner at AH), Marc Andreessen said to me: “Do you know the best thing about starting a company?” I looked at him in disbelief as if to say: “there is a ‘best’ part?” He replied: “You only ever experience two emotions: euphoria and terror. And I find that lack of sleep enhances them both.”  All venture capital firms claim to love entrepreneurs, but that’s different than understanding and respecting the entrepreneurial process and the associated degree of difficulty. When the only emotions you experience are euphoria and terror, your highs are very high and your lows are very low. This kind of yo-yo emotional state can rattle a VC who may hear a massively aggressive forecast for the business one day then despondency the next. We strive to sort the emotional rollercoaster from the actual progress.  Beyond that we want to build a culture that reflects this understanding. Some elements that we have put in place include:  Be on time for meetings with entrepreneurs and pay attention—When you found a company, your entire life goes into it. Venture Capitalists in Silicon Valley are notorious for both their tardiness and distractedness. Entrepreneurs often joke about VCs who show up to meetings late then spend the entire meeting on their phones and computers. At Andreessen Horowitz, if you are late to a meeting with an entrepreneur, the fine is $10 per minute. Always let entrepreneurs know where they stand—When you work around the clock working to build the company of your dreams and you present them to a venture capital firm, you deserve a clear response. 100% of the entrepreneurs who pitch us get a prompt and specific answer. If the answer is no, then we always provide the reasons why. Provide informed tactical advice—Once following a game, the great baseball manager Tommy LaSorda went on a talk radio show and was second-guessed about one of his on field decisions by a listener.  LaSorda succinctly replied:  “this fucking job is not that fucking easy.” He basically summed up how I’ve always felt about being a CEO. As CEO, you know an incredible amount of detail about all aspects of the company: every minor bit of customer feedback, the strategies of every competitor, the exact strengths and weaknesses of the engineering organization, the things that you screwed up in the product architecture, the impending performance and scale dangers, the mood of the company, and so on. All of this data gets factored in every time you make a decision, prioritize a feature or revise the product strategy. The knowledge gap between you and any board member is usually very large and growing. As a result, naïve, unsolicited product strategy advice such as “you should build an Android app right away” is both useless and annoying. On the other hand, specific advice about techniques for integrating the new executive you just hired can be exceptionally helpful. In order to give the right kind of advice and refrain from giving the wrong kind of advice, you have to realize that running a company is not that frackin’ easy.    The General Partner Criteria at Andreessen Horowitz With these things in mind, we developed our hiring criteria for General Partners. The actual list is quite long, so I will focus on 3 top criteria and how they reflect the firm that we are trying to build.  Has the candidate co-founded or been a very early member of the executive staff of a successful company? The best way to understand the entrepreneurial process is to go through it. If you haven’t been through it, it’s kind of hard to learn from a book. This is particularly true for the psychological aspects of the process.  Is the candidate an expert product picker as demonstrated by a primary role in picking winning products? In the end, regardless of our other goals, we are in the business of creating returns for our investors. It follows that we must be world class at picking investments. In venture capital, this means picking the best entrepreneurs and the best markets. An excellent proxy for those capabilities is the ability to identify and build massively successful products, because the best teams going after the biggest markets build the most successful products.  Will the smartest entrepreneurs want to work with her? In venture capital, it’s not enough to be able to pick the best entrepreneurs; you must also have access to them. There are many VCs who may be great at picking entrepreneurs, but whom no great entrepreneur will want to work with. These VCs tend not to do so well.  Why Scott Weiss Let’s see how our newest GP, Scott Weiss stacks up against the criteria.  Has Scott co-founded or been a very early member of the executive staff of a successful company? Scott co-founded and ran IronPort, the leader in messaging security appliances, until their acquisition by Cisco for $830M. Check.  Is the candidate an expert product picker as demonstrated by a primary role in picking winning products? Prior to founding IronPort, Scott was employee #13 at Hotmail. At the time, many experts in the email market dismissed hotmail as a toy/spam system. That he was able to pick a winning consumer product then move on to found company that built a winning enterprise product says a great deal about him as a product picker.  Will the smartest entrepreneurs want to work with him? This is the dimension where Scott shined the brightest. In reference checking him with entrepreneurs with whom he had worked, they were effusive in their praise. They said things like: “Investors as board members can be a toxic combination of high IQs, high insecurity, and lack of knowledge. Scott is the antidote for that poison. He is smart and confident, but has tremendous respect for what I go through and what it means.” Bottom line is that if I was an entrepreneur again, I’d want to work with Scott.  Intangibles As with any search, our criteria turned out to be a combination of implicit and explicit characteristics. To that end, we really wanted the new GP to bring an innovative and entrepreneurial mind set to our firm as well. We wanted someone who understood and embraced our values and would take them to the next level. With Scott, we got all that and more. He actually proposed several new ideas for the firm during the interview process. One idea that I particularly like and look forward to implementing with him is 360 performance reviews for General Partners. This means that we will solicit detailed feedback from the people in our firm, the other GPs, and the entrepreneurs that the GPs work with in order to improve the performance of our general partners. I can hardly wait to read Andreessen’s reviews  . In a profession where most venture capitalists work their entire careers with no explicit feedback from the companies that they are supposed to be helping, this is a great innovation.  Finally, we have a bias and perhaps even a prejudice towards technical founders, so we were impressed to see Scott’s product picking prowess despite no formal technical background. And it’s always smart to add some diversity to the team.
Today we announced a new investment in TinyCo, a new mobile games company. We further announced that my partner Marc would be joining their board of directors. Here are the three reasons:  1. A Big Frackin’ Market IDC estimates that there will be 1 billion mobile Internet users by 2013 and that estimate may very well be low. There are currently 4.5 billion mobile phones worldwide and, despite the fact that some think that there will always be a place for so-called feature phones, feature phones will be replaced entirely by smart phones over the next 5-7 years. As smart phones become the volume leaders, the component costs for smart phones will fall below the corresponding component costs for feature phones. Some people may be very happy without an intelligent phone, but in the future they will have to pay more for a dumb phone than a smart one. This trend will eventually render feature phones obsolete. The same phenomenon happened when the world moved from text-based to graphical PCs in the late 80s and early 90s despite many users claiming they would be “just fine” with their text-based computers. 4.5 billion mobile Internet users translate into an extremely large number of potential mobile gamers.  As importantly, the early data suggests that the mobile game market may be distinct from the web-based game market. Intuitively this makes sense as the screen sizes, user interaction methods, and usage models are all quite different. Thus far, the top selling mobile games have not been the same as the top performing web games. As a result, the eventual market leader may well be a new company.  2. Impressive Execution Although web-based gaming and mobile gaming may be different, much can still be learned in mobile from the explosive web gaming market and TinyCo has done just that. In their initial games, TinyCo takes the best elements of Facebook gaming—continuous product updates and content additions, virtual currency and goods, and constant, relentless review of user data to improve the overall experience—and optimizes them for mobile devices.  This approach has delivered stunning early numbers. TinyCo’s early games, Tiny Chef and Tap Resort, have been downloaded over 10 million times. They both reached the top 5 in the App Store and generated enough revenue to profitably build the company to 40 employees with no invested capital.  3. Phenomenal Entrepreneur Despite terrific early traction in what appears to be a massive market, it would be too early for us to invest in this kind of company unless we believed the entrepreneur behind it was so determined, skilled, and talented that he would likely build the team that wins the market.  Suli Ali, TinyCo’s co-founder is just that type of guy. A graduate of Georgia Tech and a veteran of the gaming business at an early age, he moved the TinyCo team from Brooklyn to San Francisco, because he understood the size of his opportunity and its implication that he could make no compromises in building his company. He knew that he would have to have direct access to the best talent, financial resources, and thinking that the industry had to offer.  Even more impressively, based on his early career experiences, Suli thought long and hard about the kind of company he wants to build and what that means for everything from TinyCo’s hiring practices to their employee on-boarding and training programs, to the principles required to construct a true meritocracy. The result is an exceptionally well-run, profitable, 40 person company with the foundation to be one of the few large companies in the world that will be a terrific place to work for extremely talented people.  And we are very excited to be a part of it.
Every good technology company needs great people. The best companies invest time, money, and sweat equity into becoming world-class recruiting machines. But how far should you take your quest to build the world’s greatest team? Is it fair game to hire employees from your friend’s company? Will you still be friends?  First, what do I mean by “friends?” There are two relevant categories:  Important business partners Friends For this discussion, friends and important business partners are roughly the same.  Most CEOs would never target a friend’s company as a source of talent. As CEO, one generally doesn’t have many true friends in business and raiding your friend’s company is a sure way to lose one. Nevertheless, almost every CEO will be faced with the decision on whether or not to hire an employee out of her friend’s company. How does it happen? When is it OK? When will it cost you a friend?  But they were already looking It always starts in the same way. Your friend Cathy has a great engineer working for her named Fred. Fred happens to be friends with one of your top engineers. Your engineer brings Fred in for an interview unbeknownst to you and he naturally sails through the process. The final step is the interview with you, the CEO. You immediately notice that Fred currently works at your good friend Cathy’s company. You check with your people to make sure that they did not approach Fred first and they assure you that Fred was already looking and will go to another company if not yours. Now what?  At this point, you might be thinking: “if Fred is leaving, then logically my friend Cathy should want him to go to my company rather than to a competitor or a company with a CEO who she doesn’t like.” Maybe Cathy will see it that way, but probably not.  People generally leave companies when things are not going well, so you should assume that Cathy is fighting for her company’s life. When in this situation, nothing will cut her deeper than losing a great employee, because she knows that the other employees will see that as a leading indicator of the company’s demise. Even more damaging for Cathy, her employees will perceive that her friend is raiding her company. In this way, a logical issue quickly becomes an emotional one.  You don’t want to lose Cathy as a friend, so you assure her that Fred is the exception and that he came to you and that he will be the first and only one of her employees that joins your company. Generally, this will work and Cathy will understand and appreciate the gesture. She will forgive, but rest assured, she will not forget.  Her memory of Fred will be important, because Fred joining will just be the first step. Since Fred is stellar, Cathy’s other strong employees will likely call Fred to understand why he left and where he is going. He will explain his reasoning and he will be compelling. And they will want to join too. By the time you become aware, promises will have been made and offers may be out.  In each case, your employees will assure you that they were approached by Cathy’s employees and not vice-versa. They will point out that the candidates have offers from other companies as well, so they will definitely leave and you might as well benefit. Cathy’s managers will almost certainly tell a different story. They will plead with her to get her friend to stop raiding their employees or they will never be able to meet their commitments. This will embarrass and enrage Cathy. In the end, the social pressure will trump all your brilliant countervailing logic.  Here’s an easy way to think about the dynamic. If your husband left you, would you want your best friend to date him? He’s going to date somebody, so wouldn’t you want your friend to have him? It seems logical, but this situation is far from logical and you just lost one friend.  So what should you do? First, keep in mind that the employees are either extremely good or you probably won’t want them in your company any way. So, you will either be recruiting top-notch employees from your friend’s company or you will be adding mediocre people. Do not assume the people you are taking will not be missed.  A good rule of thumb is the reflexive principle of employee raiding which states: “if you would be shocked and horrified if company X hired several of your employees, then you should not hire any of theirs.” The number of such companies should be small and may very well be zero.  In order to avoid these sticky situations, many companies employ written or unwritten policies that name companies where it is not OK to hire without CEO (or senior executive) approval. With such a policy in place, you will be able to give your friend one last chance to save their employee or object prior to you hiring them.  It is important to note that just about all of these kinds of policies violate the Right to Work laws in California. Specifically, if you block a hire based on this kind of policy and the employee loses their job and cannot find work, your company is liable for his wages. As a result, the business relationship with the other company must be extremely important for you to employ any kind of “hands off” policy.  With that in mind, the best way to deal with these situations is openly and transparently. Once the you become aware of the conflict between hiring the superstar employee and double-crossing your valued friend, you should get the issue onto the table by informing the employee that you have an important business relationship with his existing company and you will have to complete a reference check with the CEO prior to extending the offer. Let him know that if he does not want that to happen, then you will stop the process now and keep the process to date confidential. By speaking with your friend before making the hire, you will be able to better judge the relationship impact of hiring her employee. In addition, you may avoid making a bad hire as often candidates who do well in interviews turn out to be bad employees.  Closing thoughts In the classic movie, The Good, The Bad and The Ugly, Clint Eastwood “The Good” and Eli Wallach “The Ugly” are partners in crime. Wallach, a known criminal, has a bounty on his head and the two of them run a scam to collect the reward money. Eastwood turns Wallach in and collects the reward. Then, Wallach is sentenced to death by hanging. As Wallach sits on a horse, hands tied behind his back and about to be hanged with a rope around his neck, Eastwood shoots the rope from a distance and frees Wallach and they split the reward money. This scheme works brilliantly until one day Eastwood frees Wallach, but informs Wallach: “I don’t think you’ll ever be worth more than $3,000.” Wallach retorts: “What do you mean?” Eastwood informs him “I mean, our partnership is untied. Oh no, not you.  You remain tied. I’ll keep the money, and you can have the rope.” What follows is one of the great revenge pursuits in motion picture history.  So, when you tell your CEO friend that you don’t think she’ll ever be worth more than this employee, don’t expect to stay friends.
One of the most difficult decisions that a CEO ever makes is whether or not to sell her company. Logically, determining whether selling a company will be better in the long term than continuing to run it stand-alone involves a huge number of factors, most of which are speculative or unknown. And if you are the founder, the logical part is the easy part.  Indeed, the task would be far simpler if there were no emotion involved. But selling your company is always emotional and deeply personal.  Types of Acquisitions For the purpose of this discussion, it is useful to think about technology acquisitions in 3 categories:  Talent and/or Technology—when a company is acquired purely for its technology and or its people. These kinds of deals typically range between $5 and $50M. Product—when a company is acquired for its product, but not its business. The acquirer plans to sell the product roughly as it is, but will do so primarily with its own sales and marketing capability. These kinds of deals typically range between $25M and $250M. Business—when a company is acquired for its actual business (revenue and earnings). The acquirer values the entire operation (product, sales, and marketing) not just the people, technology, or products. These deals are typically valued (at least in part) by their financial metrics and can be extremely large (e.g. Microsoft’s $30B+ offer for Yahoo!). This post is most applicable to business acquisitions with some relevance to product acquisitions and will be fairly useless if you are selling people and/or technology.  The Logical When analyzing whether or not you should sell your company, a good basic rule of thumb is:  If: a) You are very early on in a very large market AND b) You have a good chance of being number 1 in that market  then you should remain stand-alone. The reason is that nobody will be able to afford to pay what you are worth, because nobody can give you that much forward credit. For an easy to understand example, consider Google. When they were very early, they reportedly received multiple acquisition offers for more than $1B. These were considered very rich offers at the time and they were being offered a gigantic multiple. However, given the size of the ultimate market, it did not make sense for Google to sell. In fact, it didn’t make sense for Google to sell to any suitor at any price that the buyer could have paid. Why? Because the market that Google was pursuing was actually bigger than the markets that all of the potential buyers owned and Google had built a nearly invincible product lead which enabled them to be number 1.  Contrast this situation with Pointcast. Pointcast was one of the first Internet applications to catch fire. They were the buzz of Silicon Valley and the technology industry in general. They received billion dollar acquisition offers that they passed on. Then, due to flaws in their product architecture, their customers started to turn off their application. Overnight, their market collapsed and never returned. They were ultimately sold for a relatively tiny amount.  So, the judgment that you have to make is a) is this market really much bigger (more than an order of magnitude) than has been exploited to date? b) Are we going to be number 1? If the answer to either a) or b) is no, then you should consider selling. If the answers to both are yes, then selling would literally mean selling yourself and your employees short.  Unfortunately, these questions are not as simple to answer as I’ve made them out to be. In order to get the answer right, you also have to answer the question: “what is the market really and who are the competitors going to be?” Was Google in the search market or the portal market? Clearly, in retrospect, they were in the search market. Most people thought they were in the portal market at the time. Yahoo was a tough competitor in the portal market, but not so much in the search market. If Google had really been in the portal market, then selling might have been a good idea. Pointcast thought that their market was much larger than it turned out to be. Interestingly, Pointcast’s own product execution (or lack thereof) caused their market to shrink.  Let’s look at the case of Opsware. Why did I sell Opsware? Another good question is why didn’t I sell Opsware until I did?  At Opsware, we started in the Server Automation market. When we received our first inquiries/offers for the Server Automation company, we had less than 50 customers. I believed that there were at least 10,000 target customers and that we had a decent shot at being number 1. In addition, although I knew the market would be redefined, I thought that we could expand to networks and storage (Data Center Automation) faster than the competition and win that market as well. Therefore, assuming 30% market share, somebody would have had to pay 60X what we were worth in forward credit to buy out our potential. You won’t be surprised to find that nobody was willing to pay that.  Once we grew to several hundred customers and expanded into Data Center Automation, we were still number 1 and were more valuable stand-alone than any of the prior acquisition offers. At that point both Opsware and our main competitor Bladelogic had developed into full-fledged companies (world-wide sales forces, built out professional services, etc). This was significant, because it meant that a large company could buy one of us and potentially execute successfully (big enterprise companies can’t generally succeed with small acquisitions, because too much of the important intellectual property is the sales methodology and big companies can’t build that).  At this point, it became clear that BMC was going to buy either Opsware or Bladelogic. As a result, the calculus, or whether Opsware was going to be number 1 in the market, needed to be redefined as follows:  We had to be number 1 in the Systems & Network Management market rather than the Data Center Automation market, because like the word processor market, the Data Center Automation market was going to be subsumed by a larger market that contained it. In order to be number 1, we had to beat BMC+Bladelogic which was a significantly more difficult opponent than either company stand-alone. Finally, the market itself was transforming due to an underlying technological shift: virtualization. Virtualization meant that the entire market needed to be re-tooled, so we were embarking on a new R&D race to build the best management for virtualized environments. This meant deferring earnings for a very long time.  Based on all of these factors, it made sense for us to at least consider the possibility of acquisition and run a short process to understand the interest in the M&A market. Through that process, 11 companies made acquisition offers of some form. This told me that we were at a local maxima in terms of the market price for Opsware. I.e., the set of potential buyers was convinced that the market was very important and there was no extra premium that we could hope to achieve through better awareness. In the end, based on a lot of analysis and soul searching, I determined that the current local maxima was higher than we could expect to achieve in the next 3-5 years and I sold the company to Hewlett Packard for $1.65B. I think and hope that was the right decision.  The Emotional The funny thing about the emotional part of the decision is that it’s so schizophrenic.  How can you ever sell your company after you’ve personally recruited every employee and sold them on your spectacular vision of a thriving, stand-alone business? How can you ever sell out your dream?  How can you walk away from total financial independence for yourself and every member of your close and distant family? Aren’t you in business to make money? How much money does one person need?  How can you reconcile Dr. Stay-the-Course and Mr. Sell-the-Thing? Clearly they are irreconcilable, but the key is to mute them both.  A few keys on muting the emotions:  Get paid (a salary)—Most venture capitalists like entrepreneurs that are “all in”, meaning that the entrepreneur has everything invested in the company and will have very little to show for her efforts if the company does not succeed.  As part of this, they prefer that the founding CEO have a very low salary. In general, this is a good idea, because the temptation to walk away when things go poorly is intense and total financial commitment helps one keep his other commitments. However, once the company starts to become a company rather than an idea then it makes sense to pay the CEO at market. More specifically, once the company has a business (as defined above) and becomes an attractive acquisition target, it makes sense to pay the CEO, so that the decision to keep or sell the company isn’t a direct response to the CEO’s personal financial situation as in: “I don’t think that we should sell the company, but I live in an 850 square foot apartment with my husband and two kids and it’s that or divorce.” Be clear with the company—One question that every start-up CEO gets from her employees is: “are you selling the company?” This is an incredibly difficult question. If she says nothing, the employee will likely interpret this to mean the company is for sale. If she says “at the right price,” the employee will wonder what that price is and may even ask. If the company ever reaches that price, the employee will assume the company will be sold. If she dodges the question with the standard “the company is not for sale,” the employee may feel betrayed if the company is ever sold. More importantly, the CEO may feel like she is betraying the employee and that feeling will influence her decision making process. One way to avoid these traps is to describe the analysis in the prior section: if the company achieves product/market fit in a very large market and has an excellent chance to be number 1, then the company will likely remain independent. If not, it will likely be sold. This is one good method to describe the interests of the investors in a way that’s not at odds with the interests of the employees and is true. Final Thought When faced with the decision of whether or not to sell your company, there is no easy answer. However, preparing yourself intellectually and emotionally will help.
In hi-tech, intelligence is always a critical element in any employee, because what we do is difficult and complex and the competitors are filled with extremely smart people. However, intelligence is not the only important quality. Being effective in a company also means working hard, being reliable, and being an excellent member of the team.  When I was a CEO, this was one of the most difficult lessons for me to learn. I felt that it was my job to create an environment where brilliant people of all backgrounds, personality types, and work styles would thrive. And I was right. That was my job. Companies where people with diverse backgrounds and work-styles can succeed have significant advantages in recruiting and retaining top talent over those that don’t. Still, you can take it too far. And I did.  Here are three examples of the smartest people in the company being the worst employees.  Example 1: The Heretic Any sizable company produces some number of strategies, projects, processes, promotions, and other activities that don’t make sense. No large organization achieves perfection. As a result, a company needs lots of smart, super engaged employees who can identify its particular weaknesses and help it improve them.  However, sometimes really smart employees develop agendas other than improving the company. Rather than identifying weaknesses, so that he can fix them, he looks for faults to build his case. Specifically, he builds his case that the company is hopeless and run by a bunch of morons. The smarter the employee, the more destructive this type of behavior can be. Simply put, it takes a really smart person to be maximally destructive, because otherwise nobody else will listen to him.  Why would a smart person try to destroy the company that he works for? There are actually many reasons. Here are few:  He is disempowered—She feels that she cannot access the people in charge and, as a result, complaining is her only vehicle to get the truth out. He is fundamentally a rebel—She will not be happy unless she is rebelling; this can be a deep personality trait. Sometimes these people actually make better CEOs than employees. He is immature and naïve—She cannot comprehend that the people running the company do not know every minute detail of the operation and therefore they are complicit in everything that’s broken. Often, it’s very difficult to turn these kinds of cases around. Once an employee takes a public stance, the social pressure for him to be consistent is enormous. If he tells 50 of his closest friends that the CEO is the stupidest person on the planet, then reversing that position will cost him a great amount of credibility the next time he complains. Most people are not willing to take the credibility hit.  Example 2: The Flake Some brilliant people can be totally unreliable. At Opsware, we once hired an unequivocal genius—I’ll call him Roger (not his real name). Roger was an engineer in an area of the product where a typical new hire would take 3 months to become fully productive. Roger came fully up to speed in two days. On his third day, we gave him a project that was scheduled to take one month. Roger completed the project in 3 days with nearly flawless quality. More specifically, he completed the project in 72 hours. 72 non-stop hours: No stops, no sleep, no nothing but coding. In his first quarter on the job, he was the best employee that we had and we immediately promoted him.  Then Roger changed. He would miss days of work without calling in. Then he would miss weeks of work. When he finally showed up, he apologized profusely, but the behavior didn’t stop. His work product also degraded. He became sloppy and unfocused. I could not understand how such a stellar employee could go so haywire. His manager wanted to fire him, because the team could no longer count on Roger for anything. I resisted. I knew that the genius was still in him and I wanted us to find it. We never did. It turns out that Roger was bi-polar and had two significant drug problems: 1. He did not like taking his bi-polar medication and 2. He was addicted to cocaine. Ultimately, we had to fire Roger, but even now, it pains me to think about what might have been.  One need not be bi-polar to be a flake, but flakey behavior often has a seriously problematic root cause. Causes range from self-destructive streaks to drug habits to moonlighting for other employers. A company is a team effort and, no matter how high an employee’s potential, you cannot get value from him unless he does his work in a manner in which he can be relied upon.  Example 3: The Jerk This particular smart-bad-employee type can occur anywhere in the organization, but is most destructive at the executive level. Most executives can be pricks, dicks, a-holes or a variety of other profane adjectives at times. Being dramatically impolite can be used to improve clarity or emphasize an important lesson. That’s not the behavior that I am talking about.  When used consistently, asinine behavior can be crippling. As a company grows, its biggest challenge always becomes communication. Keeping a huge number of people on the same page executing the same goals is never easy. If a member of your staff is a raging jerk, it may be impossible. Some people are so belligerent in their communication style that people just stop talking when they are in the room. If every time anyone brings up an issue with the marketing organization, the VP of marketing jumps down their throat, then guess what topic will never come up? This behavior can become so bad that nobody brings up any topic when the jerk is in the room. As a result, communication across the executive staff breaks down and the entire company slowly degenerates. Note that this only happens if the jerk in question is unquestionably brilliant. Otherwise, nobody will care when she attacks them. The bite only has impact if it comes from a big dog. If one of your big dogs destroys communication on your staff, you need to send her to the pound.  When do you hold the bus? The great football coach John Madden was once asked whether or not he would tolerate a player like Terrell Owens on his team. Owens was both one of the most talented players in the game and one of the biggest jerks. Madden answered:  “If you hold the bus for everyone on the team, then you’ll be so late that you’ll miss the game, so you can’t do that. The bus must leave on time. However, sometimes you’ll have a player that’s so good that you hold the bus for him, but only him.” Phil Jackson, the basketball coach who has won the most NBA championships, was once asked about his famously flakey superstar Dennis Rodman: “Since Dennis Rodman is allowed to miss practice, does this mean other star players like Michael Jordan and Scottie Pippen can miss practice too?” Jackson replied:  “Of course not. There is only room for one Dennis Rodman on this team. In fact, you really can only have a very few Dennis Rodmans in society as a whole; otherwise, we would degenerate into anarchy.” You may find yourself with an employee who fits one of the above descriptions, but nonetheless makes a massive positive contribution to the company. You may decide that you will personally mitigate the employee’s negative attributes and keep them from polluting the overall company culture. That’s fine, but remember: you can only hold the bus for her.
In Jim Collins’ best selling management book Good to Great, he demonstrates through massive research and comprehensive analysis that when it comes to CEO succession, internal candidates dramatically outperform external candidates. The core reason is knowledge. As I discussed in Why We Prefer Founding CEOs, knowledge of technology, prior decisions, culture, personnel, et al tend to be far more difficult to acquire than the skills required to manage a larger organization. Collins does not, however, comprehensively explain why internal candidates fail. I will attempt to do so here.  In my post How Andreessen Horowitz Evaluates CEOs, I explored two core skills for running an organization: 1. Knowing what to do and 2. Getting the company to do what you know. While being a great CEO requires both skills, most CEOs tend to be more comfortable with one or the other. I call managers who are happier setting the direction of the company Ones and those who more enjoy making the company perform at the highest level Twos.  What Ones like and don’t like Ones like spending most of their time gathering information from a broad variety of sources from employees to customers to competitors. Ones love making decisions. Although, they prefer to have comprehensive information when they make a decision, they comfortably make decisions with very little information when necessary. Ones have great strategic minds and enjoy nothing more than a good game of 8 dimensional chess against their best competitors.  Ones sometimes get bored with many of the important execution details required to run a company such as process design, goal setting, structured accountability, training, and performance management.  Most founding CEOs tend to be Ones. When founding CEOs fail, a significant reason why is they never invest the time to be competent enough in the Two tasks to direct those activities effectively. The resulting companies become too chaotic to reach their full potential and the CEO ends up being replaced.  What Twos like and don’t like Twos, on the other hand, thoroughly enjoy the process of making the company run well. They insist upon super clear goals and strongly prefer not to change goals or direction unless absolutely necessary.  Twos like to participate in strategic discussions, but often have difficulty with the strategic thinking process itself. Where a One might be perfectly comfortable spending one day a week reading, studying and thinking, doing so would make a Two very nervous, because it would not feel like work to a Two. A Two would get antsy at the thought of all the processes that might be improved, people that might be held accountable to achieving the standard, or sales calls that could be made while he was wasting time just thinking about strategy.  Big decisions worry Twos much more than they worry Ones. Circumstances often force both Ones and Twos to make critical decisions with insufficient data, but Ones generally feel fine about doing that and do not get overly anxious about the consequences. Twos, by contrast, can become highly agitated about such things and sometimes over complicate the decision-making process in order to provide a false feeling of thoroughness about the choice.  CEOs that are Twos, despite their love of action, can sometimes slow decision making in a company to a halt.  You need both characteristics to be a good CEO While people tend to be Ones or Twos, with discipline and hard work natural Twos can be competent at One tasks and Ones can be competent at Two tasks. If a CEO ignores the dimension of management she doesn’t like, she generally fails. Ones end up in chaos and Twos fail to pivot when necessary.  Functional Ones Often Two executives act as Ones for their functions, but Twos as members of the executive team. For example, the head of sales might easily make all the decisions that are local to the sales organization, but prefer to take direction with respect to the overall company plans. This is the best kind of multi-layer leadership possible, because directions are clear and decisions are made rapidly with precision.  How organizations tend to be constructed The primary purpose of the organizational hierarchy in a company is decision-making efficiency. It follows then that most CEOs tend to be Ones. If the person at the top of the decision-making hierarchy doesn’t like making extremely complex decisions, the company’s processes will be slow and unwieldy.  If you’re a One, it can be counter productive to have another One on your staff, because she will want to set her own direction rather than follow yours. This kind of strategic contention can confuse the organization and send employees in opposing directions. As a result, many great One CEOs employ primarily Twos and Functional Ones on their staff.  What happens at succession? This brings us to the question of succession. Since most organizations are run by Ones and have a team of Twos (sometimes Functional Ones) reporting to them, replacing the CEO can be extremely tricky. Do you promote someone from the executive staff even though they are likely a Two? Microsoft did this in 2000 when they replaced Bill Gates, a prototypical One, with Steve Ballmer, literally his number two. Or do you reach deep into the organization and pull a One from a level lower where they are likely to exist? GE famously did this with Jack Welch in 1981. It was an incredibly bold move by GE—not only did they promote an executive two levels down in the organizational chart past all of his superiors, but in doing so they named the youngest CEO in the history of GE. It’s difficult for most board members to even conceive of the possibility that there is a One deep in the organization that is more qualified to run the company than anyone on the executive staff.  Both methods can be problematic. The first approach leaves the company in the charge of a Two. As the company faces forks in the road, decision-making may slow down and the company may lose its edge. In addition, the natural Ones (in Microsoft’s case, stellar executives such as Paul Maritz and Brad Silverberg) will eventually leave.  In scenario two, by promoting someone past everyone on the executive team and making them CEO (as GE did), you will likely cause massive turnover of the executive staff. In fact, in very short order, almost none of the original GE executives remained under Welch. In a diversified conglomerate like GE, this kind of rough transition is possible. For companies in the highly dynamic technology business, the super high-turnover scenario is more dangerous.  The big conclusion The big conclusion will be a big disappointment for those looking for an answer. The answer is there is no easy answer. CEO transition is hard. If you bring people in from the outside, you lower your chances for success. If you promote from within, you must deal with the One/Two phenomenon. Ideally, you’ll promote a One and the rest of the executive team will be glad you did. Too bad things are rarely ideal.
Gaurav Dhillon was one of the great enterprise entrepreneurs of the ‘90s and early 2000s. He founded and ran the premier integration company of the era, Informatica, took it public and built it into the number one company in the market. Informatica is currently worth over $4B.  Ordinarily, we would automatically disqualify an entrepreneur with such a massive financial success from funding, so when he came into pitch us on his new company SnapLogic I was skeptical. At this point, you are probably thinking: “Ben, you are an idiot. Why are you against hiring successful people?” It is a long story, but in summary, one general rule of mine is don’t hire or fund rich people. The reason? Building a technology company is hard. It’s really frackin’ hard. Many of the tasks that you do when building one are no fun. When things go wrong as they always do, it’s no fun at all. Rich people tend to like to work on things that they enjoy, because if they don’t enjoy it, well, they are already rich. When the going gets tough, the rich get going . . . to their vacation homes and their yachts.  As a result, much of the time that I spent evaluating Gaurav’s new company, SnapLogic, was dedicated to analyzing Gaurav’s personal motives. I wanted to know if there was some new force that could be stronger than the strong force of rich-people’s laziness. John Reed, the former CEO of Citigroup once said to me: “Ben, the only reason to start a company is because you have an irrational desire to do so, because it’s not worth the money.” I had to find out if Gaurav was irrational enough to fund. After much investigation, I found Gaurav to be completely irrational—in a good way. Although, Informatica is considered a great success, it isn’t a great success for Gaurav, because he deeply believes that both the idea and his ability to execute it exceed the outcome that he achieved. So much so that our diligence found him working round the clock, running a hyper-intense environment and looking very much like a 20 year old entrepreneur on a mission from God. When my partner Marc asked me whether we should be backing an entrepreneur who is already rich, I replied: “it depends on whether we should believe my beautiful theory or my lying eyes.” He said, “let’s go with your lying eyes.”  Integration 2.0 Since Gaurav’s first attempt at solving the generalized integration problem, one market change and two changes in his approach have dramatically expanded the size of the target market and the quality of his solution.  The market change: Software as a Service With the advent of SaaS, applications have become radically easier to both build and adopt. Prior to SaaS applications becoming available, the bottleneck for adopting new software applications was the time required to deploy, update, and adopt the applications. With these costs radically reduced, companies today deploy 10X as many applications as they did just 10 years ago. This explosion of applications creates a strong need for better integration.  The Metaphor King and his breakthrough approach The value of an integration platform is the number and depth of systems that one can integrate. The challenge is building, maintaining, and distributing integrations for every pair-wise set of every version of every application in the world. In the past, this problem has rendered integration platforms underwhelming and isolated them to the highest-value applications only.  I affectionately refer to Gaurav as the Metaphor King, because he loves to describe everything with a metaphor. Once when we were discussing pricing, he nonchalantly replied with no pause or extra thought: “Yes, we looked at one set of prices and the porridge was too cold, then another and the porridge was too hot, so we are still searching for Goldilocks.” Given his proclivity for metaphors, it shouldn’t be surprising that he solved the explosive pair-wise integration problem with a pair of metaphors. In the first, SnapLogic uses a Federal Express approach to integration. Rather than integrating systems directly, all versions of all products integrate to a canonical format (Memphis for those of you following the metaphor), reducing the number of total integrations from n2 to 2n-1. In the second metaphor, he adopts Apple’s innovative AppStore into the enterprise software world with something that he quite naturally calls the SnapStore. In the SnapStore, SnapLogic, a broad set of 3rd party developers and customers provide integrations from systems such as Salesforce.com and SAP to SnapLogic’s canonical format. SnapLogic then aggressively stress tests, security screens, and quality tests the snaps. Customers can then easily purchase the integrations that they need. Today, only 8 months after launch, the SnapStore has 63 supported snaps representing around 2000 integrations.  Results The early results for SnapLogic have been remarkable in their diversity. In particular, customers of widely varying technical capabilities, ages, and business models have been keen to deploy SnapLogic. Their early customers range from small, primarily online technology focused shops such as Canonical—makers of Ubuntu Linux—all the way up to diverse, geographically disperse meat and potatoes businesses like OSI Restaurant Partners, owners of Outback Steakhouse (who is quite literally in the meat and potatoes business).  Conclusion I am proud to announce that we are leading a $10M investment round in SnapLogic and participating in Gaurav Dhillon 2.0.
Every day I hear from entrepreneurs, angel investors and venture capitalists about an exciting new movement called “the consumerization of the enterprise.”  They tell me how the old expensive Rolex wearing sales forces are a thing of the past and, in the future, companies will “consume” enterprise products proactively like consumers pick up Twitter. But when I talk to the most successful new enterprise companies like WorkDay, Apptio, Jive, Zuora, and Cloudera, they all employ serious and large enterprise sales efforts that usually include expensive people some of who indeed wear Rolex watches. In fact, companies like Yammer who originally started with new age models have transitioned to more traditional enterprise sales approaches after experiencing the market without them. So what gives? Are all these smart people out of their minds?  Has nothing changed since the early days of IBM? Some things have changed, but others are exactly as they were.  The Order of Adoption Has Changed 20 years ago, the technology adoption curve generally conformed to the following order:  Government—specifically Defense and Intelligence organizations Businesses—with large businesses going first and smaller businesses adopting later Consumers Today things have completely reversed. The latest technology goes to consumers first, followed by small enterprises that behave like consumers, then larger ones, then the military. The stunning reversal is one of many profound side effects of broad scale Internet adoption.  In the old days (before the Internet), no technology products were free, because distribution costs made it impossible to offer anything without some commitment from the end customer. As a result, new technology adoption generally started with the deepest pockets (the military) and worked its way down to the shallowest pockets (the consumer). Since the introduction of the Internet, many technology products can be distributed for free, and therefore have some free or free trial version. Interestingly, the order of adoption now follows decision-making speed rather than deep pockets. That is, consumers who can decide very quickly adopt first and the military—which has a notoriously complex decision making process—adopts last.  This reversal first initially stunned businesses. I remember dozens of CIOs at large companies being shocked that it was easier to find things on the Internet via Google than it was to find things in their own companies. We’ve seen the phenomenon repeat many times with the most recent being that it’s far easier to get background information on complete strangers via LinkedIn than it is to know the skill sets and backgrounds of your co-workers.  Encouraged by the new trend, innovative entrepreneurs imagine a world where consumers find great solutions to help their employers in the same way that they find great products to help themselves. In the imaginary enterprise, these individuals will then take the initiative to convince their collegues to buy the solution. Through this method, if the product is truly great, there will be little or no need to actually sell it.  The actual enterprise works a bit differently. Meet the new enterprise customer. He’s a lot like the old enterprise customer.  Meet The New Enterprise Customer At the D8 technology conference, Steve Jobs made a statement about selling to enterprise customers that many missed but was extremely insightful and revealing:  “We want to make better products than them. What I love about the marketplace is that we do our products, we tell people about them, and if they like them, we get to come to work tomorrow. It’s not like that in enterprise . . . the people who make those decisions are sometimes confused.” Why are the enterprise people so confused? Why don’t they just quickly adopt the best products without requiring these complex sales processes?  Big Companies Don’t Have Credit Cards Purchasing anything in a large organization requires a rigorous justification process that generally culminates in a purchase order (PO). They do not allow their employees to use their credit cards to buy technology off of the Internet. In fact, at many companies, doing so and attempting to expense it after the fact is a fire-able offense.  If you work in a startup, you might wonder why large organizations don’t just trust their people to make smart purchasing decisions. If an employee needs a new technology, why wouldn’t the company just let him do the right thing? There are many reasons.  The employee may not know what’s appropriate in the context of the larger organization.  The more people in an organization, the more diverse the set of needs. If the organization purchases, for example, social networking software it must attempt to take these needs into account. The company may already own the technology or a similar technology. If you work with 100,000 people, how do you know what the other 99,999 have already purchased? When EDS was a customer of ours, they had a $1B annual credit with Computer Associates. Computer Associates sells hundreds of products and is constantly developing new products (many of which can only be learned about via special meetings with the company). How would any employee at EDS possibly know about potential conflicts without a formal process? The employee may be corrupted by side incentives – If an employee of a large organization can make significant purchases without review or proper process, it’s quite possible that he will be corrupted by an agent of a vendor. For example, an enterprise sales rep might buy a network engineer a new Porsche in exchange for a $10 million order. Public companies must comply with Sarbanes-Oxley compliant expense controls. Generally, when a company designs its expense controls, it must have in place a method for approving significant expenses before they are made. If a company lets an employee make significant purchase or even a small purchase that leads to a significant purchase on his credit card, that will violate the company’s financial controls, because the purchase was not pre-approved. As a result of these and other factors, large companies employ complex processes to ensure that major purchases make sense. These processes generally span many different organizations and stakeholders. It is not unusual for a purchasing decision to include people from many different IT departments (e.g. development, security, operations) and business functions (e.g. Finance, IT, Legal). The decision often involves technical decision makers, economic decision makers, and risk management decision makers.  Often these processes are so complex that almost nobody inside the company knows how they work. Excellent enterprise sales reps will guide a company through their own purchasing processes. Without an enterprise sales rep, many companies literally do not know how to buy new technology products. A top notch enterprise sales person not only knows her customer’s process better than the customer, but will be skilled at characterizing the value of her product to each decision maker independently. This will involve product demonstrations, proof of concepts, complete return on investment analysis and even competitive positioning. The sales rep will work with the various constituents to help characterize the value proposition their management teams.  Large Enterprises Like Their Old Products One thing that all large businesses have in common is that they have purchased a huge amount of technology over time. In fact, many of these technologies enabled the companies to become big in the first place. Naturally, the technology deployed in an enterprise varies widely in age. Some of the systems are outdated, complex, and downright arcane.  Nonetheless, once deployed, enterprises develop great affection for the technology that runs their companies. They may complain about it, but like an old woman speaking of her spouse, the underlying love is far stronger than the criticism. And big companies expect you to love their old products too—by integrating with them.  But how do you figure out which old systems you need to integrate with and which ones you can afford to ignore? Like most things in the enterprise, it’s complicated. Great enterprise sales forces sort through the myriad of existing systems and help guide their companies to find the essential few.  People in Big Companies Work to Live If you work in the technology industry and particularly in Silicon Valley, you become used to employees who work tirelessly to improve their companies. It is not difficult to imagine one of these employees independently finding a new technology then championing it inside of her company simply because she wants her company to become great. Outside of technology and especially in very large companies, people generally don’t do things like that. Most large company employees like to stay within the scope of their defined job. If they must make a choice between potentially advancing the efficiency of their employer via new technology or getting home to see their 8 year old’s pee wee baseball game, it’s not a difficult decision. As a result, expecting them to adopt your product with no help is probably not a good idea.  Final Thoughts If you are selling to consumers or companies that behave like consumers, then moving away from the old channel models may make perfect sense. However, if you plan to sell to a large enterprise, keep in mind that the new boss is the same as the old boss.
Andreessen Horowitz just raised $650,000,000 for our second fund. Through the process, people asked us three questions consistently and I will answer them here.  Why raise $650M? Isn’t smaller better? As a matter of core philosophy, we invest in companies not stages. We want to be in business with the best entrepreneurs going after the biggest markets and we do not care whether they need seed money, venture money or growth money. We believe in great entrepreneurs and the products and companies they build. We do not focus on special return profiles for various stages of investment.  As result, our fund is stage agnostic. As in fund 1, we are excited about investing $50,000 in exciting new seed deals and we are excited about investing $50,000,000 in companies like Skype. While $650M would be a large venture fund, it is a moderately sized seed, venture, and growth fund.  Why raise $650M? I heard you guys could raise at least $1.5B? Interestingly, we get the opposite question as well. Why so small? We do not want the fund size to dictate our investment pace. We have seen other firms raise so much money that they lower their quality bar in order to “put the money to work.” We would strongly prefer to run out of money sooner and be forced to raise a third fund than to have that problem.  Why only one fund? Why not separate growth and venture funds? First, from a returns perspective, we do not want to attempt to predetermine where the good investments will be. In our experience, the quality of companies in each investment stage varies wildly over time. It’s possible that the right strategy for this fund will be to invest $550M in venture, $50M in seed, and $50M in growth. It may also be the case that $400M in growth, $150M in venture, and $100M in seed is the right mix. One thing is certain; we won’t know until we see the companies.  Second, one of the founding principles of the firm is to have general partners who are skilled in helping companies at all three stages of development. As former entrepreneurs, we believe this is ideal. When you are raising seed money, you need an investor who can help you grow. When you are the founding CEO of a growth company, you want an investor who understands the value of a founder running the company and who can help you develop into a skilled CEO. As a general partner who has founded, grown, taken public, and run companies at scale, do I belong in the seed fund, the venture fund, or the growth fund? With one fund, I don’t have to choose and neither do our entrepreneurs.  Finally, we believe in being totally aligned with our investors. In venture capital, general partners are paid a percentage of the return on investments. This percentage is called carry. Firms that break their funds into separate vehicles for growth and venture typically separate the carry incentives as well. For example, if their growth fund loses 50% and their venture fund gains 50%, the general partners will be paid carry for a 50% gain on the growth fund, and will not be paid anything or pay back anything on the venture fund. So, if you are an investor in both funds, even though you might lose money on your investment, you will still have to pay the general partners for making you money. That structure does not seem fair to us, so we elected to have one fund. If our investors don’t make money, we don’t make money.  Gee, that was fast. Have you even invested fund 1 yet? We raised $300M for Andreessen Horowitz Fund I 16 months ago. Typically, firms invest venture capital funds in between 2 and 3 years. Why did we invest fund I so quickly? Two core reasons:  Prior to raising fund I, Marc and I were angel investors for three years. Many of those angel investments turned out to be outstanding venture-stage startups. As importantly, the entrepreneurs who ran them wanted us to invest in their venture rounds. As a result, we made investments in great companies like RockMelt, Nicira, and Apptio rapidly after raising the fund. And we are incredibly glad that we did. We invested $50M in Skype. Companies that can become primary, important, long lasting consumer franchises generally do not come up for sale. When they have already reached over 100M users, are generating hundreds of millions of dollars in annual revenue and are deeply profitable, an opportunity to buy them is even more unusual. So when we learned that Skype would be available, we jumped at the opportunity to be a part of one of the world’s most important companies. Looking forward Having raised fund II, we are now prepared to be a major investor in the very best companies. If you believe that you are building one of those, we can’t wait to meet you. And that’s regardless of stage.
The biggest difference between being a great functional manager and being a great  general manager—and particularly a great CEO—is that as a general manager, you must hire and manage people who are far more competent at their jobs than you would be at their jobs. In fact, often you will have to hire and manage people to do jobs that you have never done. How many CEOs have been head of HR, Engineering, Sales, Marketing, Finance and Legal? Probably none.  So, with no experience, how do you hire someone good?  Step 1: Know what you want Step 1 is definitely the most important step in the process and also the one that gets skipped most often. As the great self-help coach Tony Robbins says: “if you don’t know what you want, the chances that you’ll get it are extremely low.” If you have never done the job, how do you know what to want?  First, you must realize how ignorant you are and resist the temptation to educate yourself simply by interviewing candidates. While the interview process can be highly educational, using that as the sole information source is extremely dangerous. In particular, doing so will make you susceptible to the following traps:  Hiring on look and feel—It sounds silly that anyone would hire an executive based on the way they look and sound in an interview, but in my experience look and feel is the top criteria for most executive searches. When you combine a CEO that doesn’t know what she wants and a board of directors that hasn’t thought much about the hire, what do you think the criteria are? Looking for someone out of central casting—This is the moral equivalent of looking for the Platonic Form of a head of sales. You imagine what the perfect sales executive might be like then you attempt to match real-world candidates to your model. This is a really bad idea for several reasons. First, you are not hiring an abstract executive to work at an arbitrary company. You must hire the right person for your company at this particular point in time. The head of sales at Oracle in 2010 would likely have failed in 1989. The VP of engineering at Apple might be exactly the wrong choice for FourSquare. The details and the specifics matter. Second, your imaginary model is almost certainly wrong. What is your basis for creating this model? Finally, it will be incredibly difficult to educate an interview team on such an abstract set of criteria. As a result, everybody will be looking for something different. Valuing lack of weakness rather than strength—The more experience you have, the more you realize that there is something seriously wrong with every employee in your company (including you). Literally, nobody is perfect. As a result, it is imperative that you hire for strength rather than lack of weakness. Everybody has weaknesses; they are just easier to find in some people. Hiring for lack of weakness just means that you’ll optimize for pleasantness. Rather, you must figure out the strengths you require and find someone who is world class in those areas despite their weaknesses in other, less important domains. The very best way to know what you want is to act in the role. Not just in title, but in real action—run the team meeting, hold 1:1s with the staff, set objectives, etc. In my career, I’ve been acting VP of HR, CFO, and VP of Sales. Often CEOs resist acting in functional roles, because they worry that they lack the appropriate knowledge. This worry is precisely why you should act—to get the appropriate knowledge. In fact, acting is really the only way to get all of the knowledge that you need to make the hire, because you are looking for the right executive for your company today not a generic executive.  In addition to acting in the role, it helps greatly to bring in domain experts. If you know a great head of sales, interview them first and learn what they think made them great. Figure out which of those strengths most directly match the needs of your company. If possible, include the domain expert in the interview process.  Finally, be clear in your own mind on your expectations for this person upon joining your company. What will this person do in the first 30 days? What do you expect their motivation to be for joining? Will they instantly have 10 reqs to hire or will they have 1?  Step 2: Run a process that figures out the right match In order to find the right executive, you must now take the knowledge that you have gathered and translate it into a process that yields the right candidate. Here is the process that I like to use.  Write down the strengths you want and the weaknesses that you are willing to tolerate The first step is to write down what you want. In order to ensure completeness, I find it useful to include criteria from the following sub-divisions when hiring executives:  Will the executive be world class at running the function? Is the executive outstanding operationally? Will the executive make a major contribution to the strategic direction of the company? This is the “are they smart enough?” criteria. Will the executive be an effective member of the team? Effective is the key word. It’s possible for an executive to be well liked and totally ineffective with respect to the other members of the team. It’s also possible for an executive to be highly effective and profoundly influential while being totally despised. The latter is far better. These functions do not carry equal weight for all positions. Make sure that you balance them appropriately. Generally, operational excellence is far more important for a VP of Engineering or a VP of Sales than for a VP of Marketing or CFO.  Develop questions that test for the criteria This step is important even if you never ask the candidate any of the pre-prepared questions. By writing down questions that test for what you want, you will get to a level of specificity that will be extremely difficult to achieve otherwise. As examples, below I include questions that I wrote for running the enterprise sales function and operational excellence.  Questions for head of enterprise sales force  Is she smart enough?  Can she effectively pitch me on her current company? How articulate is she on the company and market opportunity that you are presenting to her now? Will she be able to contribute to the strategic direction of your company in a meaningful way? Does she know how to hire sales people?  What is her profile? Ask her to describe a recent bad hire How does she find top talent? What percentage of her time is spent recruiting? How does she test for the characteristics she wants with her interview process? How many of her current people want to sign up? Can you reference them and validate that? Could you pass her sales interview test? Should you be able to pass? Does she know how to hire sales managers? Can she define the job? Can she test for the skills? Is she systematic and comprehensive on how she thinks about sales process?  Does she understand the business and the technical sales processes? Does she understand benchmarking, lockout documents, POCs, demos? Does she know how to train people to become competent in the process? Can she enforce the process? What is her expectation of her team’s use of the CRM tools? How good is her sales training program?  How much process training vs product training? Can she describe it in detail? Does she have materials? How effective is her sales rep evaluation model?  Can she get beyond basic performance? Can she describe the difference between a transactional rep and an enterprise rep in a way that teaches you something? Does she understand the ins and outs of setting up a comp plan?  Accelerators, spiffs, etc, etc Does she know how to do big deals?  Has she made existing deals much larger? Will her people be able to describe that? Has she accelerated the close of a large deal? Does she have customers that will reference this? Does she understand marketing?  Can she articulate the differences between brand marketing, lead generation, and sales force enablement without prompting? Does she understand channels?  Does she really understand channel conflict and incentives? Is she intense enough?  Will the rep in Wisconsin wake up at 5 am and hit the phones or will they wake up at noon and have lunch? Can she run international?  Is she totally plugged into the industry, how quickly can she diagnose?  Does she know your competition? Does she know what deals you are in right now? Has she mapped your organization? Operational excellence questions  Managing direct reports  What do you look for in the people working for you? How do you figure that out in the interview process? How do you train them for success? What is your process for evaluating them? Decision making  What methods do you use to get the information that you need in order to make decisions? How do you make decisions (what is the process)? How do you run your staff meeting? What is the agenda? How do you manage actions and promises How do you systematically get your knowledge? Of the organization Of the customers Of the market Core management processes—please describe how you’ve designed these and why?  Interview Performance management Employee integration Strategic planning Metric design  Describe the key leading and lagging indicators for your organization. Are they appropriately paired?  E.g. do you value time, but not quality? Are there potentially negative side effects? What was the process that you used to design them? Organizational design  Describe your current organizational design What are the strengths and weaknesses? Why? Why did you opt for those strengths and weaknesses (why were the strengths more important)? What are the conflicts? How do they get resolved? Confrontation  If your best executive asks you for more territory, how do you handle it? Describe both your process for promotion and firing  How do you deal with chronic bad behavior from a top performer? Less tangible  Does she think systematically or one off? Would I want to work for her? Is she totally honest or is she bull shitty? Does she ask me spontaneous incisive questions or only pre-prepared ones? Can she handle diverse communication styles? Is she incredibly articulate? Has she done her homework on the company? Assemble an appropriate interview team and conduct the interviews The next step is to assemble the interview team. In assembling the team, you should keep two questions in mind:  Who will best help you figure out whether or not the candidate meets the criteria? These may be internal or external people. They can be board members, other executives or just experts. Who do you need to support the decision once the executive is on board? This group is just as important as the first. No matter how great an executive is, they will have trouble succeeding if the people around them sabotage everything they do. The best way to avoid that is to understand any potential issues before the person is hired. Clearly, some people will be in both groups 1 and 2. The opinions of both groups will be very important: group 1 will help you determine the best candidate and group 2 will help you gauge how easily each candidate will integrate into your company. Generally, it’s best to have group 2 interview finalist candidates only.  Next, assign specific questions to interviewers based on their talents. Specifically, make sure that the interviewer who asks the questions deeply understands what a good answer will sound like.  As you conduct the interviews, be sure to discuss each interview with the interviewer. Use this time to drive to a common understand of the criteria, so that you will get the best information possible.  Backdoor and front door references For the final candidates, it’s critically important that the CEO conduct the reference checks herself. The references need to be checked against the same hiring criteria that you tested for during the interview process. Backdoor reference checks (checks from people who know the candidate, but were not referred by the candidate) can be an extremely useful way to get an unbiased view. However, do not discount the front door references. While they clearly have committed to giving a positive reference (or they wouldn’t be on the list), you are not looking for positive or negative with them. You are looking for fit with your criteria. Often, the front door references will know the candidate best and will be quite helpful in this respect.  Step 3: Make a lonely decision Despite many people being involved in the process, the ultimate decision should be made solo. Only the CEO has comprehensive knowledge of the criteria, the rationale for the criteria, all of the feedback from interviewers and references and the relative importance of the various stakeholders. Consensus decisions about executives almost always sway the process away from strength and towards lack of weakness. It’s a lonely job, but somebody has got to do it.
Disclaimer: my business partner, Marc Andreessen, is on the board of directors of Hewlett-Packard. I note that I have no inside information, and this blog post is based purely on published material. In 2007, I sold Opsware, the company that I founded and ran to Hewlett-Packard for $1.6B. I worked at Hewlett-Packard from 2007 to 2008 as an executive in the software business.  Recently, my old company Hewlett-Packard has been in the news—and not in a good way. I’ve been watching the coverage from the sidelines up to this point, but felt increasingly compelled to join the conversation and share my point of view. So here goes.  After firing their CEO, Mark Hurd, the HP board has been accused of everything from incompetence to being prudes. The criticism comes from credible, important journalists and bloggers such as Joe Nocera from the New York Times, prominent economics blogger Felix Salmon, and former GE CEO Jack Welch. In addition, HP competitor Larry Ellison lambasted the board and even went so far as to hire Mark Hurd to be President of Oracle.  So why in the world did the HP board fire such a high performing CEO? Don’t they care about profits and shareholder value? Aren’t those the most important things? Who cares about his personal shenanigans? Did Mark and his marketing contractor even have sex?  While I am pretty sure that there is much more going on behind the scenes than has been broadly reported, as there often is, let’s look at what has been reported:  Mark Hurd falsified expense reports. The false expense reports are related to a contractor named Jodie Fisher, a former softcore porn movie actress and Playboy model with no relevant marketing experience, who HP was paying up to $5,000 per marketing event. At the time of his departure from HP, Hurd issued a public statement saying that he’d violated HP’s Standards of Business Conduct: “As the investigation progressed, I realized there were instances in which I did not live up to the standards and principles of trust, respect and integrity that I have espoused at HP and which have guided me throughout my career. After a number of discussions with members of the board, I will move aside and the board will search for new leadership. This is a painful decision for me to make after five years at HP, but I believe it would be difficult for me to continue as an effective leader at HP and I believe this is the only decision the board and I could make at this time. I want to stress that this in no way reflects on the operating performance or financial integrity of HP.” Let’s start with the issue of falsifying expense reports. This factor has been largely dismissed in the press with characterizations like this from Joe Nocera of the New York Times:  “When pressed, H.P. said that Mr. Hurd had fudged some expense reports.” Nocera goes on to argue that there must have been an alternate motivation to dismiss Hurd, because clearly no CEO would be fired simply for “fudging” an expense report.  When I first read of the expense report issue, my reaction was the opposite of Nocera’s. If the Chief Executive Officer of a public company falsifies any official financial statement, he must be fired. In my mind, this is non-negotiable. We are not talking about a low-level employee tossing an extra receipt into his expense report. We are talking about a public company CEO who is paid tens of millions of dollars a year and is responsible for the integrity of the company’s financial statements fraudulently reporting his own expenses. Why is this a problem?  Every person who invests in Hewlett-Packard does so on the basis of HP’s financial statements. Every pension fund, every retiree, every charitable organization, every employee who joins and is compensated via stock options. When they do so, they trust that the statements are true and that the numbers are accurate. The person they trust to ensure accuracy is the CEO.  If the Chief Executive is willing to compromise the integrity of the company’s financials for any reason, then it is impossible to trust any statement. Every day, there are many potential reasons to falsify financial statements. Here are four examples:  If you miss the quarter, shareholders will lose money. If revenues aren’t high enough, you’ll be forced to lay-off hard working, valued employees. If you grow slower than a competitor, you may jeopardize your job. A shareholder that you’ve been having an illicit affair with doesn’t want the stock price to go down and threatens to tell your wife. If a CEO is prone to compromise for any reason, he will have every reason. This time it was his expense report. Next time will it be a marginal accrued liability? A deal that came in at 12:01 am on the last day of the quarter? This is a slippery slope that a public board simply cannot tolerate.  What reason was so powerful that it caused Mark Hurd to break his ethical standard, falsify an official financial statement, mislead the board, and ultimately be fired? It seems that this was done to cover up a “close personal relationship” with a woman named Jodie Fisher, who later accused him of sexual harassment, then subsequently withdrew her claim after Hurd personally paid Fisher a large sum of money.  Who is Jodie Fisher? According to press reports, Fisher is a former Playboy model, reality show contestant, and softcore porn movie actress with no work history relevant to her job with HP. She was hired by Hewlett-Packard and paid up to $5,000 per meeting to meet with Fortune 50 CEOs.  The mainstream press has reported these facts as mundane, ordinary, and hardly worth concern. I disagree. HP employs over 300,000 people. Every single one of HP’s employees is keenly interested in the qualities, skill sets, and behaviors that HP values most. Financial compensation and access to the CEO are the most important ways that HP communicates what it values to its employees. Jodie Fisher had more access to the CEO and was paid more than 99.9% of HP’s workforce, despite having no traditional qualifications.  It’s important to note that this was not Hurd paying for his personal extracurricular activity out of his own pocket. This was the Hewlett-Packard Corporation paying a softcore porn movie star with no relevant work experience more than it pays Harvard graduates with 20 years of industry experience. This was the company spitting in the face of the people who worked hard and sacrificed every day to help the company win in the market. It was completely and categorically unacceptable.  Finally, Hurd admitted in a press release to violating the company’s standards of ethics and integrity. So what? Why do companies have standards and ethics anyway? Shouldn’t they just be concerned with profits? Do we want choir boys or shareholder value?  There are many who take the view that business is singular in purpose—to increase shareholder value. They further take the position that constraining that purpose in any way is inefficient and counterproductive. The mainstream press seems to have broadly adopted this position in its attacks on HP. The Wall Street Journal Op Ed page even complained that businesses were being held to an unfair standard when compared to politicians.  I do not subscribe to this view. Running our companies with no moral or ethical standards is bad for society, bad for the country, and ultimately leads to criminal behavior.  Companies should not merely be thought of as money generating machines. Business can represent human society at its best. A business is a group of people working together to deliver value to the world and improve people’s lives. When done ethically, business quite literally changes the world for the better. However, if the dark side of human motivation is not mitigated with standards and ethics, business can destroy.  We saw this unfold at Enron, a company that was, in its time, celebrated for its impressive profits. Underneath the profits was a culture designed from the ground up to completely ignore any ethical standard including a dazzling display of ethically questionable sexual activity among its executives. These activities, such as promoting secretaries to executive positions in exchange for sexual favors, parallel Hurd’s behavior with Jodie Fisher. In Enron’s case, the bad behavior bled over into first line employees who conspired to create blackouts in California in the name of profits and in the absence of ethics. Ultimately, Enron imploded in a swirl of criminal behavior that bankrupted the company, but not before destroying tens of thousands of peoples’ life savings and damaging millions of innocent victims. After the fact, the press bemoaned the culture that lead to the destruction. However, the same reporters instantly forgot the cause as they cavalierly dismissed Hurd’s ethical breach.  In closing, I point out the impressive courage of the HP board of directors to ignore popular opinion and do the right thing. It is not an easy thing to fire a popular, highly successful CEO. It’s even more difficult when you know that you will be roundly criticized for tolerating that same CEO’s failure to develop internal successors. Despite those factors, Hewlett-Packard’s board of directors stood tall and protected the company, its shareholders and all of us from a dark and destructive journey. As a member of the business community and as a citizen, I am extremely proud of and grateful for their actions.
A few months ago, Aneel Bhusri offered to introduce me to one his favorite entrepreneurs. Since Aneel is, for my money, the best enterprise venture capitalist in the world, I immediately agreed and Aneel did not disappoint. He introduced me to Christian Gheorghe, founder of TIAN Software, a predictive analytics company acquired by OutlookSoft, where, as Chief Technology Officer, he introduced important and innovative Enterprise Performance Management applications into the market. OutlookSoft was eventually acquired by SAP.  Christian grew up under a totalitarian communist government in Romania during the 1970s and 80s. He first journeyed to the US in 1989 when he arrived knowing no English, almost nothing about capitalism, and with $27 in total assets. He began his new life working in construction before moving into the more lucrative limousine driving business. Through these efforts he was able to generate enough money to put himself through school, learn English and re-enter the workforce using his original field of study, computer science. Eventually, he founded his own company and completed the remarkable journey from Communism to Entrepreneur in one lifetime.  After hearing Christian’s background, and prior to hearing anything about his new company, I was ready to co-fund him with Aneel. Still, I was curious to learn about Christian’s latest invention upon which he was founding his new company Tidemark, because the funny thing about inventors is that it’s often difficult to see where they stop and where their inventions begin. My friend Marc Andreessen invented the web browser and it is as though he invented it exclusively for his own personal use. Marc absorbs more information than anyone I’ve ever known or even heard about. He owns over 10,000 music albums, thousands of DVDS, reads every major newspaper, economics blog, technology blog, political blog, major magazine and several hundred books a year. He had to invent the browser, because otherwise there wouldn’t have been nearly enough information for him to absorb. With this as a background, I couldn’t wait to hear what Christian had created.  Tidemark is still in stealth mode, so the easiest way for me to describe them is through the lens of their inventor. Tidemark is to enterprise software applications as the United States is to Communist Romania. Historically, like Communist Romania, enterprise software has been highly restrictive, inflexible, slow-to-change, slow in general and, quite frankly, oppressive. In addition, customers have been forced to conform their business processes to the underlying data models, limiting the software’s general usefulness. As he did with his own life, Christian has completely re-imagined the category from top to bottom.  With Tidemark, the solution resides in the cloud, but this is only the beginning. Christian throws out the old data models, databases, and data restrictions. He then ejects the scale restrictions, broken user interaction paradigms, and performance bottlenecks. Rather than defining their business by their data model, customers define their business by the real people and processes that they use. And the resulting applications perform 1000X faster than their communist, excuse me, enterprise software counterparts.  Tidemark is a stunning vision from a stunning entrepreneur and I can’t wait until we can share everything that they are doing.
Shortly after we sold Opsware to Hewlett-Packard, I had a conversation with the legendary venture capitalist Doug Leone of Sequoia Capital. He wanted to hear the story of how we went from doomed in the eyes of the world to a $1.6B outcome with no recapitalization. After I took him through the details including several near bankruptcies, a stock price of $0.35/share, unlimited bad press and 3 separate layoffs where we lost a total 400 employees, he was most amazed by the layoffs. He said that during his over 20 years in the venture capital business, he’d never seen a company recover from consecutive layoffs and achieve a billion dollar plus outcome. He said that he’d bet against that every time and wanted to know how I did it. Since my only experience was the great exception, I needed more information. I asked him why all the other startups failed. He replied that the layoffs inevitably broke the company’s culture. After seeing their friends laid off, employees were no longer willing to make the requisite sacrifices needed to build a company. He said that although it was possible to survive an isolated layoff, it was hugely unlikely that a company would experience great success. He added that building a highly valuable business after 3 consecutive giant lay offs accompanied by horrible prominent press coverage (we got taken apart with cover stories in both the Wall Street Journal and Business Week) was a complete violation of the laws of venture capital physics. Naturally, he wanted to know how we did it. After thinking about it for the last couple of years, here’s my answer Doug. In retrospect, we were able to keep cultural continuity and retain our best employees despite multiple massive layoffs, because we laid people off the right way. This may sound nutty—how can you do something that’s fundamentally wrong in “the right way?” Here’s how.  Step 1: Get your head right When a company fails to hit its financial plan so severely that it must fire the employees that it went to great time and expense to hire, it weighs heavily on the chief executive. During the first layoff at our company, I remember being forwarded an email exchange amongst a group of employees. In the exchange one of our smarter employees wrote: “Ben is either lying or stupid or both.” I remember reading that and thinking: “definitely stupid.” During a time like this, it is difficult to focus on the future, because the past overwhelms you—but that’s exactly what you must do.  Step 2: Don’t delay Once you decide that you will have to lay people off, the time elapsed between making that decision and executing that decision should be as short as possible. If word leaks (which it will inevitably do if you delay), then you will be faced with an additional set of issues. Employees will question managers and ask whether or not a layoff is coming. If the managers don’t know, they will look stupid. If the managers do know, they will either have to lie to their employees, contribute to the leak, or remain silent, which will create additional agitation. At Loudcloud/Opsware, we badly mismanaged this on our first layoff, but sharply corrected things on the next two.  Step 3: Be clear in your own mind about why you are laying people off Going into a layoff, board members will sometimes try to make you feel better by putting a positive spin on things. They might say: “this gives us a great opportunity to deal with some performance issues and simplify the business.” That may be true, but do not let that cloud your thinking or your message to the company. You are laying people off because the company failed to hit its plan. If individual performance were the only thing at issue, then you’d be taking a different measure. Company performance failed. This distinction is critical, because the message to the company and the laid off individuals should not be: “this is great, we are cleaning up performance.” The message must be: “the company failed and in order to move forward, we will have to lose some excellent people.” Admitting to the failure may not seem like a big deal, but trust me, it is. “Trust me.” That’s what a CEO says every day to her employees. Trust me, this will be a good company. Trust me, this will be good for your career. Trust me, this will be good for your life. A layoff breaks that trust. In order to rebuild trust, you have to come clean.  Step 4: Train your managers The most important step in the whole exercise is training the management team. If you send managers into this super uncomfortable situation with no training, most of them will fail.  Training starts with a golden rule: managers must lay off their own people. They cannot pass the task to HR or a more sadistic peer. You cannot hire an outsourcing firm like the one in the movie Up in the Air. Every manager must layoff his own people.  Why so strict? Why can’t the more confrontational managers just handle this task for everyone? Because people won’t remember every day that they worked for your company, but they will surely remember the day that you laid them off. They will remember every last detail about that day and the details will matter greatly. The reputations of your company and your managers depend on you standing tall, facing the employees who trusted you and worked hard for you. If you hired me and I busted my ass working for you, I expect you to have the courage to lay me off yourself.  Once you make it clear that managers must layoff their own people, be sure to prepare them for the task:  They should explain briefly what happened and that it is a company rather than a personal failure. They should be clear that the employee is impacted and that the decision is non-negotiable. They should be fully prepared with all of the details of the benefits and support that the company plans to provide. Step 5: Address the entire company Prior to executing the lay off, the CEO must address the company. The CEO must deliver the overall message that provides the proper context and air cover for the managers. If you do your job right, the managers will have a much easier time doing their jobs. When you do this, keep in mind what Intuit founder Bill Campbell told me—the message is for the people who are staying. The people who stay will care deeply about how you treat their colleagues. Many of the people that you lay off will have closer relationships with the people who stay than you do, so treat them with the appropriate level of respect. Still, the company must move forward, so be careful not to apologize too much.  Step 6: Be visible, be present After you make the speech telling your company that you will be letting go of many them, you will not feel like hanging out and talking to people. You will probably feel like going to a bar and drinking a fifth of tequila. Do not do this. Be present. Be visible. Be engaging. People want to see you. They want to see whether or not you care. The people who you laid off will want to know if they still have a relationship with you and the company. Talk to people. Help them carry their things to their car. Let them know that you appreciate their efforts.  Acknowledgements I would like to say that I came up with all of this on my own, but in truth there is no way that I could have done it without the help of my dear friend Bill Campbell. Bill’s help during these times saved the company. Finally, I again thank all of the wonderful and dedicated people who worked for Loudcloud that we laid off or transferred to EDS. I am sure that I speak for everyone who ever worked at Opsware, when I say “thank you for saving our butts.”
In my last post, I mentioned that you should strive to hire people with the right kind of ambition. Surprisingly to me, I received a large number of responses from readers questioning whether or not this was good advice. Here’s how one commenter phrased it:  I agree with much of this post but I disagree with the following: “As defined by Andy Grove, the right kind of ambition is ambition for the company’s success with the executive’s own success only coming as a by-product of the company’s victory.” That may have worked in the past but I believe today, the company’s success and the executive’s success should go hand in hand, not one coming as a by-product of the other, particularly as described above. Curious why should an employee be motivated first by a company’s success? Would this work in all departments—i.e. sales? In addition to comments like the one above, my business partner Marc Andreessen suggested that I write a post on how to screen for the right kind of ambition. In response, this post aims to clarify why you should care about senior managers having the right kind of ambition and give some tips on how to screen for them in an interview.  Why should senior managers have the right kind of ambition? At a macro level, a company will be most successful if the senior managers optimize for the company’s success (think of this as a global optimization) as opposed to their own personal success (local optimization). No matter how well the CEO designs the personal incentive programs, they will never be perfect. In addition, career incentives like promotions and territory ownership fall outside the scope of bonus plans and other a priori management tools. In an equity-based compensation structure, optimizing for the company’s success should yield better results for individuals as well. As my Opsware head of sales Mark Cranney used to say, “2% of 0 is 0.”  It is particularly important that managers have the right kind of ambition, because anything else will be exceptionally de-motivating for their employees. As an employee, why would I want to work long hours to advance the career of my manager? If the manager cares about his career more than the company, then that’s what I’d be doing. Nothing motivates a great employee more than a mission that’s so important that it supersedes everyone’s personal ambition. As a result, managers with the right kind of ambition tend to be radically more valuable than those with the wrong kind. For a complete explanation of the dangers of managers with the wrong kind of ambition, I strongly recommend Dr. Suess’s management masterpiece Yertle the Turtle.  Screening for the right kind of ambition As with any complex character trait, there is no way to perfectly screen for the right kind of ambition in an interview, but hopefully some of these thoughts will prove useful.  At a macro-level, everybody views the world through her own personal prism. When interviewing candidates, it’s helpful to watch for small distinctions that indicate whether they view the world through the “me” prism or the “team” prism.  People who view the world through the me prism might describe a prior company’s failure in an interview as follows: “My last job was my e-commerce play.  I felt that it was important to round out my resume.” Note the use of “my” to personalize the company in a way that it’s unlikely that anyone else at the company would agree with. In fact, the other employees in the company might even be offended by this usage. People with the right kind of ambition would not likely use the word “play” to describe their effort to work as a team to build something substantial. Finally, people who use the “me” prism find it natural and obvious to speak in terms of “building out my resume” while people who use the “team” prism find such phrases to be somewhat uncomfortable and awkward, because they clearly indicate an individual goal which is separate from the team goal.  On the other hand, people who view the world purely through the team prism will very seldom use the words “I” or “me” even when answering questions about their accomplishments. Even in an interview, they will deflect credit to others on their previous team. They will tend to be far more interested in how your company will win than how they will be compensated or what their career path will be. When asked about a previously failed company, they will generally feel such great responsibility that they will describe in detail their own misjudgments and bad decisions.  When we hired the head of worldwide sales for Opsware, using this screen proved to be quite valuable. We interviewed over 20 candidates for the position before hiring the aforementioned Mark Cranney. Since this was a sales position, I should mention (in reference to the commenter above) that ambition for the company above ones own goals is particularly important for the head of sales. The reasons are many:  The local incentives in sales are particularly strong and difficult to balance without the right kind of leadership The sales organization is the face of the company to the outside world. If that group optimizes for itself, your company will have a major problem In hi-tech companies, fraud generally starts in sales due to managers attempting to perfect the ultimate local optimization Throughout our interview process, candidates would take sole credit for landing extremely large deals, achieving impressive goals, and generating company success. Invariably, the candidates who claimed the most credit for deals would have the most difficult time describing the details of how the deal was actually won and orchestrated. During reference checks, others involved in the deals would tell a much different story.  When I spoke to Mark, on the other hand, it was difficult to get him to discuss his personal accomplishments. In fact, some of the other interviewers felt that Mark was standoffish and even obnoxious in the way he bristled at certain questions. One interviewer complained: “Ben, I know that he increased the size of the Nike deal from $1M to $5M, because our contact at Nike told me that, but Mark wouldn’t go into any detail on it.” When I interviewed Mark, he really only wanted to discuss how his old company PTC won. He went into great detail about how his team diagnosed weaknesses vs. the competition and how he worked with the CTO Hugh Hempleman to advance the product. He then talked about how he worked with the CEO Dick Harrison to revise the way the sales force was trained and organized.  When the conversation turned to Opsware, Mark had already interviewed sales reps at our number 1 competitor’s company and knew what deals they were in. He relentlessly questioned me on how we were going to win the deals that they were in and how we planned to get into the deals that we weren’t in. He wanted to know the strengths and weaknesses of everyone else on the team. He wanted to know the game plan for winning. The topics of his potential compensation and career advancement didn’t come up until the very end of the process. And then he only wanted assurances that compensation was performance and not politically based. It was clear that Mark was all about the team.  During Mark’s tenure, sales increased more than tenfold and our market capitalization increased twentyfold. More to the point, voluntary attrition in the sales organization was extremely low, customers were managed fairly and honestly, and our legal and finance teams often commented that first and foremost, Mark protected the company.  Final Thought While it may work to have individual employees who optimize for their own careers, counting on senior managers to do all the right things for all the wrong reasons is a dangerous idea.
